The Project Gutenberg eBook, Dave Darrin's Fourth Year at Annapolis, by H.
Irving Hancock


This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.net





Title: Dave Darrin's Fourth Year at Annapolis

Author: H. Irving Hancock

Release Date: June 29, 2004  [eBook #12775]

Language: English


***START OF THE PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK DAVE DARRIN'S FOURTH YEAR AT
ANNAPOLIS***


E-text prepared by Jim Ludwig



DAVE DARRIN'S FOURTH YEAR AT ANNAPOLIS

Headed for Graduation and the Big Cruise

H. IRVING HANCOCK







CONTENTS

CHAPTERS
    I. Wanted---A Doughface!
   II. Some One Pushes the Tungsten
  III. Bad News from West Point
   IV. Dave's Work Goes Stale
    V. Dan Hands Himself Bad Money
   VI. The "Forgot" Path to Trouble
  VII. Dan's Eyes Jolt His Wits
 VIII. The Prize Trip on the "Dodger"
   IX. The Treachery of Morton
    X. "We Belong to the Navy, Too!"
   XI. A Quarter's Worth of Hope
  XII. Ready to Trim West Point
 XIII. When "Brace Up, Army!" was the Word
  XIV. The Navy Goat Grins
   XV. Dan Feels as "Sold" as He Looks
  XVI. The Day of Many Doubts
 XVII. Mr. Clairy Deals in Outrages
XVIII. The Whole Class Takes a Hand
  XIX. Midshipman Darrin Has the Floor
   XX. Dan Steers on the Rocks Again
  XXI. In the Thick of Disaster
 XXII. The Search at the Bottom of the Bay
XXIII. Graduation Day---At Last
 XXIV. Conclusion




CHAPTER I

WANTED---A DOUGHFACE!


"Now, then, Danny boy, we-----"

First Classman Dave Darrin, midshipman at the United States Naval
Academy, did not finish what he was about to say.

While speaking he had closed the door behind him and had stepped
into the quarters occupied jointly by himself and by Midshipman
Daniel Dalzell, also of the first or upper class.

"Danny boy isn't here.  Visiting, probably," mused Dave Darrin,
after having glanced into the alcove bedroom at his right hand.

It was a Saturday night, early in October.  The new academic year
at the Naval Academy was but a week old.  There being no "hop"
that night the members of the brigade had their time to spend
as they pleased.  Some of the young men would need the time sadly
to put in at their new studies.  Dave, fortunately, did not feel
under any necessity to spend his leisure in grinding over text-books.

Dave glanced at his study desk, though he barely saw the pile of
text-books neatly piled up there.

"No letters to write tonight," he thought "I was going to loan
Danny boy one of my two new novels.  No matter; if he'd rather visit
let him do so."

In the short interval of recreation that had followed the evening
meal Dave had missed his home chum and roommate, but had thought
nothing of it.  Nor was Dave now really disappointed over the
present prospect of having an hour or two by himself.  He went
to a one-shelf book rack high overhead and pulled down one of
his two recent novels.

"If I want Danny boy at any time I fancy I have only to step as
far as Page's room," mused Dave, as he seated himself by his desk.

An hour slipped by without interruption.  An occasional burst
of laughter floated down the corridor.  At some distance away,
on the same deck of barracks in Bancroft Hall, a midshipman was
industriously twanging away on a banjo.  Darrin, however, absorbed
in his novel, paid no heed to any of the signs of Saturday-night
jollity.  He was a third of the way through an exciting tale when
there came a knock on the door---a moment later a head was thrust in.

Midshipman Farley's head was thrust inside.

"All alone, Darry?" called Mr. Farley.

"Yes," Dave answered, laying his novel aside after having thrust
an envelope between pages to hold the place.  "Come in, Farl."

"Where's Dalzell?" inquired Farley, after having closed the door
behind him.

"Until this moment I thought that he was in your room."

"I haven't seen him all evening," Farley responded.  "Page and I
have been yawning ourselves to death."

"Danny boy is visiting some other crowd, then," guessed Darrin.
"He will probably be along soon.  Did you want to see him about
anything in particular?"

"Oh, no.  I came here to escape being bored to death by Page,
and poor old Pagey has just fled to Wilson's room to escape being
bored by me.  What are these Saturday evenings for, anyway, when
there's no way of spending them agreeably?"

"For a good many of the men, who want to get through," smiled
Dave, "Saturday evening is a heaven-sent chance to do a little
more studying against a blue next week.  As for Danny boy, I imagine
he must have carried his grin up to Wilson's room.  Or, maybe,
to Jetson's.  Danny has plenty of harbors where he's welcome to
cast his anchor."

"May I sit down?" queried Mr. Farley.

"Surely, Furl, and with my heartiest apologies for having been
too dull to push a chair toward you."

"I can easily help myself," laughed the other midshipman, "since
there's only one other chair in the room."

"What have you and Page been talking about tonight?" asked Dave.

"Why do you want to know?"

"So that I won't run the risk of boring you by talking oh the same
subject."

"Well," confessed Midshipman Farley, "we've been talking about
this season's football."

"Oh, dear!" sighed Darrin.  "That's the only topic really worth
talking about."

"Speaking of football," resumed Farley, "don't you believe that
we have a stronger eleven than we had last year!"

"If we haven't we ought to walk the plank," retorted Dave.  "You
remember how the Army walloped us last year?"

"That was because the Army team had Prescott and Holmes on it,"
rejoined Farley quickly.

"Well, they'll have 'em this year, too, won't they?

"So Prescott and Holmes are to be out for the Army this year!"

"I haven't heard anything definite on that head," Dave answered.
"But I take it as a matter of course that Prescott and Holmes
will play once more with the Army.  They're West Point men, and
they know their duty."

"What wonders that pair are!" murmured Farley with reluctant admiration
for the star players of the United States Military Academy.  "Yet,
after all, Darry, I can't for the life of me see where Prescott
and Holmes are in any way superior to yourself and Dan Dalzell."

"Except," smiled Dave, "that Prescott and Holmes, last year, got
by us a good deal oftener than we got by them---and so the Army
lugged off the score from Franklin Field."

"But you won't let 'em do it this year, Darry!"

"Dan and I will do all we can to stop our oldtime chums, now of the
Army," agreed Dave.  "But they're a hard pair to beat.  Any one who
saw Prescott and Holmes play last year will agree that they're a
hard pair of nuts for the Navy to crack."

"We've got to beat the Army this year," Farley protested plaintively.

"I certainly hope we shall do so."

"Darry, what is your candid opinion of Wolgast?"

"As a man?"

"You know better!"

"As a midshipman?"

"Darry, stop your nonsense!  You know well enough that I'm asking
your opinion of Wolgast as captain of the Navy eleven."

"He seems inclined to be fair and just to every member of the
squad, so what more can you ask of him."

"But do you think he's any real good, Darry, as captain for the
Navy?"

"I do."

"We ought to have had you for captain of the team, Darry," insisted
Farley.

"So two or three other fellows thought," admitted Dave.  "But I
refused to take that post, as you know, and I'm glad I did."

"Oh, come, now!

"Yes; I'm glad I refused.  A captain should be in mid-field.  Now,
if Dalzell and I are any good at all on the gridiron-----"

"Oh, Mr. Modesty!"

"If we're of any use at all," pursued Darrin, "it's only on the
flank.  Now, where would the Navy be with a captain directing from
the right or left flank."

"Darry, you funker, you could play center as well as Wolgast does."

"Farl, you're letting your prejudices spoil your eyesight."

"Oh, I've no prejudice at all against Wolgast," Farley hastened
to rejoin.  "Only I don't consider him our strongest man for captain.
Now, Wolgast-----"

"Here!" called a laughing voice.  The door had opened, after a
knock that Darrin had not noticed.

"Talking about me?" inquired Midshipman Wolgast pleasantly, as
he stopped in the middle of the room.

Midshipman Farley was nothing at all on the order of the backbiter.
Service in the Brigade of Midshipmen for three years had taught him
the virtue of direct truth.

"Yes, Wolly," admitted Farley without embarrassment.  "I was
criticizing your selection as captain of the eleven."

"Nothing worse than that?" laughed First Classman Wolgast.

"I was saying---no offense, Wolly---that I didn't consider you the
right man to head the Navy eleven."

Midshipman Wolgast stepped over to Farley, holding out his right
hand.

"Shake, Farl!  I'm glad to find a man of brains on the eleven.
I know well enough that I'm not the right captain.  But we couldn't
make Darry accept the post."

Midshipman Wolgast appeared anything but hurt by the direct candor
with which he had been treated.  He now threw one leg over the
corner of the study table, though he inquired:

"Am I interrupting anything private?"

"Not in the least," Dave assured him.

"Am I intruding in any way?"

"Not a bit of it," Darrin answered heartily "We're glad to have
you here with us."

"Surely," nodded Farley.

"Now, then, as to my well known unfitness to command the Navy
football team," continued First Classman Wolgast, "do either of
you see any faults in me that can be remedied?"

"I can't," Dave answered.  "I believe, Wolly, that you can lead
the team as well as any other man in the squad.  On the whole,
I believe you can lead a little better than any other man could do."

"No help from your quarter, then, Darry," sighed Midshipman Wolgast.
"Farl, help me out.  Tell me some way in which I can improve
my fitness for the post of honor that has been thrust upon me.
I assure you I didn't seek it."

"Wolgast, my objection to you has nothing personal in it," Farley
went on.  "With me it is a case simply of believing that Darry
could lead us on the gridiron much better than you're likely to."

"That I know," retorted Wolgast, with emphasis.  "But what on
earth are we going to do with a fellow like Darrin?  He simply
won't allow himself to be made captain.  I'd resign this minute,
if we could have Darry for our captain."

"You're going to do all right, Wolgast.  I know you are," Dave
rejoined.

"Then what's the trouble?  Why don't I suit all hands?" demanded
the Navy's football captain.

Darrin was silent for a few moments.  The midshipmen visitors waited
patiently, knowing that, from this comrade, they could be sure of a
wholly candid reply.

"Have you found the answer, Darry?" pressed Wolgast at last.

"Yes," said Dave slowly; "I think I have.  The reason, as I see
it, is that there are no decidedly star players on this year's
probable eleven.  The men are all pretty nearly equal, which doesn't
give you a chance to tower head and shoulders above the other
players.  Usually, in the years that I know anything of, it has
been the other way.  There have been only two or three star players
in the squad, and the captain was usually one of the very best.
You're plenty good enough football man, Wolgast, but there are
so many other pretty good ones that you don't outshine the others
as much as captains of poorer teams have done in other years."

"By Jupiter!  Darry has hit it!" cried Farley, leaping from his
seat.  "Wolly, you have the luck to command an eleven in which
most of the men are nearly, if not quite, as good as the captain.
You're not head and shoulders over the rest, and you don't
tower---that's all.  Wolly, I apologize for my criticisms.  Darry has
shown me the truth."

"Then you look for a big slaughter list for us this year, Darry?"
Wolgast asked.

"Yes; unless the other elevens that we're to play improve as much
as the Navy is going to do."

At this moment Page and Jetson rapped and then entered.  Ten minutes
later there were fully twenty midshipmen in the room, all talking
animatedly on the one subject at the United States Naval Academy in
October---football.

So the time sped.  Dave lost his chance to read his novel, but
he did not mind the loss.  It was Jetson who, at last, discovered
the time.

"Whew, fellows!" he muttered.  "Only ten minutes to taps."

That sent most of the midshipmen scuttling away.  Page and Farley,
however, whose quarters were but a few doors away on the same
deck, remained.

"Farl," murmured Darrin, "for the first time tonight I'm feeling a
bit worried."

"Over Danny?"

"The same."

"What's up?" Page wanted to know.

"Why, he hasn't been around all evening.  Surely Dalzell would
be coming back by this time, unless-----"

"Didn't he have leave to visit town?" demanded Midshipman Page.

"Not that I've heard of," Dave Darrin answered quickly.  "Nor
do I see how he could have done so.  You see, Wednesday he received
some demerits, and with them went the loss of privileges for October."

"Whew!" whistled Page.

"What?" demanded Dave, his alarm increasing.

"Why, not long after supper I saw Danny heading toward the wall on
the town side."

"I have been afraid of that for the last two or three minutes,"
exclaimed Dave Darrin, his uneasiness now showing very plainly.
"Dan didn't say a word to me about going anywhere, but-----"

"You think, leave being impossible, Danny has Frenched it over
the wall?" demanded Farley.

"That's just what I'm afraid of," returned Dave.

"But why-----"

"I don't know any reason."

"Then-----"

"Farl", broke in Dave hurriedly, almost fiercely, "has anyone a
doughface?"

"Yes."

"Who has it?"

"I don't know."

"Find it---on the jump!"

"But-----"

"There's no time for 'buts,'" retorted Darrin, pushing Farley
toward the door.  "Find it!"

"And I-----" added Page, springing toward the door.

"You'll stay here," ordered Dave.

Darrin was already headed toward his friend's alcove, where Dalzell's
cot lay.  Page followed.

"The dummy," explained Darrin briefly.

Every midshipman at Annapolis, doubtless, is familiar with the
dummy.  Not so many, probably, are familiar with the doughface,
which, at the time this is written, was a new importation.

Swiftly Dave and Page worked.  First they turned down the clothing,
after having hurriedly made up the cot.  Now, from among the garments
hanging on the wall nearby the two midshipmen took down the garments
that normally lay under others.  With these they rigged up a figure
not unlike that of a human being.  At least, it looked so after
the bed clothes had been drawn up in place.

Then, glancing at the time, Dave Darrin waited---breathless.

Farley hastened into the room without losing time by knocking.
Under one arm he bore, half hidden, some roundish object, wrapped
in a towel.

Without a word, but with a heart full of gratitude, Dave Darrin
snatched out from its wrapping the effigy of a male human head.
It was done in wax, with human hair on the head.

Dave Darrin neatly fitted this at the top of the outlines of a figure
under the bed clothing.

Under the full light the doughface looked ghostly.  In a dimmer
light it would do very well.

"Thank you a thousand times, fellows," trembled Dave Darrin.  "Now
hustle to your own quarters before the first stroke of taps sounds."

The two useful visitors were gone like a flash.  Ere they had
quite closed the door, Dave Darrin was removing his own uniform
and hanging up trousers and blouse.  Next off came the underclothing
and on went pajamas.

Just then taps sounded.  Out went the electric light, turned off
at the master switch.

Dave Darrin dived under the bed clothes on his own cot and tried to
still the beating of his own heart.

Two minutes later a brisk step sounded on the corridor of the "deck."

Door after door was opened and closed.  Then the door to Dave's
room swung open, and a discipline officer and a midshipman looked
into the room.

"All in?" the midshipman called.

A light snore from Dave Darrin's throat answered.  In his left
hand the discipline officer carried an electric pocket light.
A pressure of a button would supply a beam of electric light
that would explore the bed of either midshipman supposed to be
in this room.

But the officer saw Midshipman Darrin plainly enough, thanks to
beams of light from the corridor.  Over in the opposite alcove
the discipline officer made out, more vaguely, the lay figure
and the doughface intended to represent Midshipman Dan Dalzell.

"Both in.  Darrin and Dalzell never give us any trouble, at any
rate," thought the discipline officer to himself, then closed the
door, and his footsteps sounded further down the corridor.

"Oh, Danny boy, I wish I had you here right at this minute!" muttered
Dave Darrin vengefully.  "Maybe I wouldn't whang your head off
for the fright that you've given me!  I'll wager half of my hairs
have turned gray in the last minute!"

However, Midshipman Dan Dalzell was not there, as Darrin knew
to his own consternation.  Dave did not go to sleep.  Well enough
he knew that he was on duty indefinitely through the hours until
Dan should return.  If Midshipman Darrin fell into a doze this
night he would be as bad as any sentry falling asleep on any other
post.

So Darrin lay there and fidgeted.  Twenty times he tried to solve,
in his own mind, the riddle of why Dalzell should be away, and where
he was.  But it was a hopeless puzzle.

"Of course, Danny didn't hint that he was going to French it tonight,"
thought Dave bitterly.  "Good reason why, too!  He knew that,
if I got wind of his intention, I'd thrash him sooner than let
him take such a chance.  Oh, Dan!  Dan, you idiot!  To take such
a fool chance in your last year here, when detection probably
means your being dropped from brigade, and your career ended!"

For Dave Darrin knew the way of discipline officers too well to
imagine that that one brief inspection of the room was positively
all the look-in that would be offered that night.  Some discipline
officers have a way of looking in often during the night.  Being
themselves graduates of the Naval Academy, officers are sure to
know that the inspection immediately after taps does not always
suffice.  Midshipmen have been known to be in bed at taps, and
visiting in quarters of other midshipmen ten minutes later.  True,
the electric light in rooms is turned off at taps---but midshipmen
have been known to keep candles hidden, and to be experts in clouding
doors and windows so that no ray of light gets through into a
corridor after taps.

Just how often discipline officers were accustomed to look in
through the night, Dave Darrin did not know from his own knowledge.
Usually, at the times of such extra visits, Darrin was too blissfully
asleep.

Tonight, however, despite the darkness of the room at present, Dave
lay wide awake.  No sleep for him before daylight---perhaps not
then---unless Dan turned up in the meantime.

After an interval that seemed several nights long, the dull old
bell of the clock over on academic Hall began tolling.  Dave listened
and counted.  He gave an almost incredulous snort when the total
stopped at eleven.

Then another long period of waiting.  Darrin did not grow drowsy.
On the contrary, he became more wide awake.  In fact, he began
to imagine that he was becoming possessed of the vision of the
cat.  Dark as it was in the room, Dave began to feel certain that
he could distinguish plainly the ghostly figure of the saving
doughface in the alcove opposite.

Twelve o'clock struck.  Then more waiting.  It was not so very
long, this time, however, before there came a faint tapping at the
window.

Dave Darrin was out of bed as though he had been shot out.  Like a
flash he was at the window, peering out.  Where, after all, was the
cat's vision of which he had thought himself possessed?  Some one
was outside the window.  Dave thought he recognized the Naval
uniform, but he could not see a line of the face.

Tap-tap-tap! sounded softly.  Dave threw the window up stealthily.

"You, Dan?" he whispered.

"Of course," came the soft answer.  "Stand aside.  Let me in---on
the double-quick!"

Dave pushed the window up the balance of the way, then stepped
aside.  Dan Dalzell landed on his feet in the room, cat-like,
from the terrace without.  Then Dave, without loss of an instant,
closed the window and wheeled about in the darkness.

"Hustle!" commanded Dave.

"What about?"

"Get off your uniform!  Get into pajamas.  Then I'll-----"

Dave's jaws snapped together resolutely.  He did not finish, just
then, for he knew that Midshipman Dalzell could be very stubborn
at times.

"I'll have a light in a jiffy," whispered Dan "I brought back
a candle with me."

"You won't use it---not in here," retorted Dave.  "The dark is light
enough for you.  Hustle into your pajamas."

Perhaps Midshipman Dalzell did not make all the speed that his
roommate desired, but at last Dan was safely rid of his uniform,
underclothing and shoes, and stood arrayed in pajamas.

"Now, I'll hide this doughface over night," whispered Darrin,
going toward Dalzell's bed.  "At the same time you get the articles
of your equipment out from under your bed clothes and hang them
up where they belong."

"I'll have to light the candle for that," muttered Dan.

"If you do, I'll blow it out.  There's a regulation against running
lights in the rooms after taps."

"Do you worship the little blue-covered volume of regulations, Dave?"
Dan demanded with a laugh.

"No; but I don't propose to take any chances in my last year here.
I don't intend to lose my commission in the Navy just because I can't
control myself."

Dan sniffed, but he silently got his parts of uniform out from
between the sheets and hung up the articles where they belonged,
in this going by the sense of feeling.

Then, all in the dark as they were, Midshipman Dave Darrin seized
his chum and roommate by the shoulders.

"Danny boy," he commanded firmly, "come over with an account of
yourself!  Why this mad prank tonight---and what was it?"




CHAPTER II

SOME ONE PUSHES THE TUNGSTEN


You don't have to know every blessed thing that I do, do you?"
demanded Dan Dalzell, in an almost offended tone.

"No; and I have no right to know anything that you don't tell me
willingly.  Are you ready to give me any explanation of tonight's
foolishness?

"Seeing that you kept awake for me, and were on hand to let me in,
I suppose I'll have to," grumbled Dan.

"Well, then?

"Dave, for the first time tonight, I struck my flag."

"Struck to whom?"

"Oh---a girl, of course," grunted Dan.

"You?  A girl?" repeated Dave in amazement.

"Yes; is it any crime for me to get acquainted with a girl, and
to call on her at her home?"

"Certainly not.  But, Dan, I didn't believe that you ever felt
a single flutter of the pulse when girls were around.  I thought
you were going to grow up into a cheerful, happy old bachelor."

"So did I," sighed Dan.

"And now you've gone and met your fate?"

"I'm not so sure about that," Dalzell retorted moodily.

"Do you mean that you don't stand any real show in front of the pair
of bright eyes that have made you strike your colors?"

"I'm afraid I don't."

"Dan, is the game worth the candle," argued Darrin.

"You're mightily interested in Belle Meade, aren't you?"

"Yes; but that's different, Danny boy."

"How is it different, I'd like to know?"

"Well, in the first place, there's no guesswork in my case.  Belle
and I are engaged, and we feel perfectly sure each of the other.
I'm so sure of Belle that I dream about her only in my leisure
moments.  I don't ever let her face come between myself and the
pages of a textbook.  I am here at the Naval Academy working for
a future that Belle is to share with me when the time comes, and
so, in justice to her, I don't let the thought of her get between
myself and the duties that will lead to the career she is to share
with me."

"Humph!" commented Midshipman Dalzell.

"Above all, Dan, I've never Frenched it over the wall.  I don't take
any disciplinary chances that can possibly shut me off from the
career that Belle and I have planned.  Belle Meade, Danny boy, would
be the first to scold me if she knew that I had Frenched it over the
wall in order to meet her."

"Well, Miss Preston doesn't know but what I had regular leave
tonight," Danny replied.

"Miss Preston?" repeated Dave his interest taking a new tack.
"I don't believe I know her."

"I guess you don't," Dan replied.  "She's new in Annapolis.  Visiting
her uncle and aunt, you know.  And her mother's with her."

"Are your intentions serious in this, Danny?" Darrin went on.

"Blessed if I know," Dalzell answered candidly.  "She's a mighty
fine girl, is May Preston.  I don't suppose I'll ever be lucky
enough to win the regard of such a really fine girl."

"Then you aren't engaged?"

"Hang it, man!  This evening is only the second time that I've
met Miss Preston."

"And you've risked your commission to meet a girl for the second
time?" Dave demanded almost unbelievingly.

"I haven't risked it much," Dan answered.  "I'm in safe, now, and
ready to face any discipline officer."

"But wouldn't this matter wait until November, when you're pretty
sure to have the privilege of town leave again?" pressed Midshipman
Darrin.

"By November a girl like Miss Preston might be married to some one
else," retorted Dan Dalzell.

"It was a fool risk to take, Dan!"

"If you look at it that way."

"Will you promise me not to take the risk again, Danny boy?"

"No."

"It's a serious affair, then, so far as you are concerned," grinned
Dave, though in the dark Dan could not see his face.  "For your sake,
Danny, I hope Miss Preston is as much interested in you as you
certainly are in her."

"Are you going to lecture me?"

"Not tonight, Dan."

"Then I'm going to get in between sheets.  It's chilly here in
the room."

"Duck!" whispered Dave with sudden energy.

Footsteps could be heard coming down the corridor.  It was a noise
like a discipline officer.

Three doors above that of the room occupied by our midshipman friends
were opened, one after the other.  Then a hand rested on the knob of
the door to Dave and Dan's room.  The door was opened, and the rays
of a pocket electric light flashed into the room.

Dan lay on one side, an arm thrown out of bed, his breathing regular
but a trifle loud.  Dave Darrin had again found recourse to a snore.

In an instant the door closed.  Any discipline officer ought to
be satisfied with what this one had seen.

"Safe!" chuckled Dalzell.

"An awfully close squeak," whispered Dave across the intervening
room.

"What if he had started his rounds ten minutes earlier?"

"He didn't, though," replied Dan contentedly.

Now another set of footsteps passed hurriedly along the "deck" outside.

"What's that?" questioned a voice sharply.  "You say that you saw
some one entering a room from the upper end of the terrace?"

"Oh, by George," groaned Dan Dalzell, now beginning to shiver
in earnest.  "Some meddling marine sentry has gone and whispered
tales."

"Keep a stiff upper lip," Dave whispered hoarsely, encouragingly.
"If the officer returns don't give yourself away by your shaking."

"But if he asks me?"

"If you're asked a direct question," sighed Dave mournfully, "you'll
have to give a truthful answer."

"And take my medicine!"

"Of course."

That annoying discipline officer was now on his way back, opening
doors once more.  Moreover, the two very wide-awake midshipmen
could hear him asking questions in the rooms further along the
"deck."

"He's questioning each man," whispered Dave.

"Of course," nodded Dan gloomily.

"It'll be our turn soon."

"D-D-Dave!"

"What?"

"I---I'm feeling ill---or I'm going to."

"Don't have cold feet, old fellow.  Take your dose like a man---if
you have to."

"D-Dave, I wonder if I couldn't have a real sickness?  Couldn't
it be something so you'll have to jump up and help me to hospital?
Couldn't I have---a---a fit?"

"A midshipman subject to fits would be ordered before a medical
board, and then dropped from the brigade," Dave replied thoughtfully.
"No; that wouldn't do."

That meddling discipline officer was getting closer and closer.
Dave and Dan could hear him asking questions in each room that
he visited.  And there are no "white lies" possible to a midshipman.
When questioned he must answer truthfully.  If the officers over
him catch him in a lie they will bring him up before a court-martial,
and his dismissal from the service will follow.  If the officers
don't catch him in a lie, but his brother midshipmen do, they
won't report him, but they'll ostracize him and force him to resign.
A youngster with the untruthful habit can find no happiness at the
Naval Academy.

"He---he's in the next room now," whispered Dan across the few
feet of space.

"Yes," returned Dave Darrin despairingly, "and I can't think of
a single, blessed way of getting you out of the scrape."

"Woof!" sputtered Midshipman Dan Dalzell, which was a brief way
of saying, "Here he comes, now, for our door."

Then a hand rested on the knob and the door swung open.  Lieutenant
Adams, U.S.N., entered the room.

"Mr. Darrin, are you awake?" boomed the discipline officer.

Dave stirred in bed, rolled over so that he could see the lieutenant,
and then replied:

"Yes, sir."

"Rise, Mr. Darrin, and come to attention."

Dave got out of bed, but purposely stumbled in doing so.  This
might give the impression that he had been actually awakened.

"Mr. Darrin," demanded Lieutenant Adams, "have you been absent from
this room tonight?"

"Yes, sir."

"After taps was sounded?"

"No, sir."

"You are fully aware of what you have answered?"

"Yes, sir."

"Very good."

That was all.  A midshipman's word must be taken, for he is a
gentleman---that is to say, a man of honor.

"Mr. Dalzell!"

Poor Dan stirred uneasily.

"Mr. Dalzell!" This time the Naval officer's voice was sharper.

Dan acted as though he were waking with difficulty.  He had no
intention, in the face of a direct question, of denying that he
had been absent without leave.  But he moved thus slowly, hoping
desperately that the few seconds of time thus rained would be
sufficient to bring to him some inspiration that might save him.

"Mr Dalzell, come to attention!"

Dan stood up, the personification of drowsiness, saluted, then
let his right hand fall at his side and stood blinking, bracing
for them correct military attitude.

"It's too bad to disturb the boy!" thought Lieutenant Adams.
"Surely, this young man hasn't been anywhere but in bed since taps."

None the less the Naval officer, as a part of his duty, put the
question:

"Mr. Dalzell, have you, since taps, been out of this room?  Did
you return, let us say, by the route of the open window from the
terrace?"

Midshipman Dalzell stiffened.  He didn't intend to betray his own
honor by denying, yet he hated to let out the admission that would
damage him so much.

Bang!  It was an explosion like a crashing pistol shot, and it
sounded from the corridor outside.

There could be no such thing as an assault at arms in guarded
Bancroft Hall.  The first thought that flashed, excitedly, through
Lieutenant Adams's mind was that perhaps the real delinquent guilty
of the night's escapade had just shot himself.  It was a wild
guess, but a pistol shot sometimes starts a wilder guess.

Out into the corridor darted Lieutenant Adams.  He did not immediately
return to the room, so Dave Darrin, with rare and desperate presence
of mind, closed the door.

"Get back into the meadow grass, Danny boy," Darrin whispered,
giving his friend's arm a hard grip.  "If the 'loot'nant' comes
back, get up fearfully drowsy when he orders you.  Gape and look
too stupid to apologize!"

Lieutenant Adams, however, had other matters to occupy his attention.
There was a genuine puzzle for him in the corridor.  Just out,
side the door of Midshipmen Farley and Page there lay on the floor
tiny glass fragments of what had been an efficient sixty-candle-power
tungsten electric bulb.  It was one of the lights that illuminated
the corridor.

Now one of these tungsten bulbs, when struck smartly, explodes
with a report like that of a pistol.

At this hour of the night, however, there were none passing save
Naval officers on duty.  None other than the lieutenant himself
had lately passed in the corridor.  How, then, had this electric
light bulb been shattered and made to give forth the sound of the
explosion?

"It wouldn't go up with a noise like that," murmured the lieutenant
to himself.  "These tungsten lights don't explode like that, except
when rapped in some way.  They don't blow up, when left alone.
At least, that is what I have always understood."

So the puzzle waxed and grew, and Lieutenant Adams found it too big
to solve alone.

"At any rate, I've questioned all the young gentlemen about the
window episode, and they all deny knowledge of it," Lieutenant
Adams told himself.  "So I'll just report that fact to the O.C.,
and at the same time I'll tell him of the blowing up of this tungsten
light."

Two minutes later Lieutenant Adams stood in the presence of
Lieutenant-Commander Henderson, the officer in charge.

"So you questioned all of the midshipmen who might, by any chance,
have entered by a window?" asked the O.C.

"Yes, sir."

"And they all denied it?"

"Yes, sir."

"Did you see signs of any sort to lead you to believe that any of
the midshipmen might have answered in other than the strict truth?"
continued the O.C.

"No, sir," replied Lieutenant Adams, and flushed slightly, as he
went on: "Of course, sir, I believe it quite impossible for a
midshipman to tell an untruth."

"The sentiment does you credit, Lieutenant," smiled the O.C.
Then he fell to questioning the younger discipline officer as
to the names of the midshipmen whom he had questioned.  Finally
the O.C. came to the two names in which the reader is most interested.

"Darrin denied having been out after taps?" questioned Lieutenant-Commander
Henderson.

"He did, sir."

"Did Mr. Dalzell also deny having been out of quarters after taps?"

"He did, sir."

Lieutenant Adams answered unhesitatingly and unblushingly.  In
fact, Lieutenant Adams would have bitten off the tip of his tongue
sooner than have lied intentionally.  So firmly convinced had
Adams been that Dan was about to make a denial that now, with
the incident broken in two by the report of the tungsten bulb,
Lieutenant Adams really believed that had so denied.  But Dan
had not, and had Dave Darrin been called as a witness he would
been compelled to testify that Dan did not deny being out.

The explosion of the tungsten bulb was too great a puzzle for
either officer to solve.  A man was sent with a new bulb, and
so that part of the affair became almost at once forgotten.

Dan finally fell into a genuine sleep, and so did Dave Darrin.
In the morning Dave sought out Midshipman Farley to inquire to whom
the doughface should be returned.

"Give it over to me and I'll take care of it," Farley replied.
"Say, did you hear a tungsten bulb blow up in the night!"

"Did It" echoed Darrin devoutly.  Then a sudden suspicion crossed
his mind.

"Say, how did that happen, Farl?" demanded Dave.

"If anyone should ask you-----" began the other midshipman.

"Yes-----?" pressed Darrin.

"Tell 'em---that you don't know," finished Farley tantalizingly,
and vanished.

It was not until long after that Darrin found out the explanation
of the accident to the tungsten bulb.  Farley, during Dan's absence,
had been almost as much disturbed as had Dave.  So Mr. Farley
was wide awake.  When he heard Lieutenant Adams receive the message
in the corridor Farley began to wonder what he could do.  Presently
he was made to rise, with Page, stand at attention, and answer
the questions of the discipline officer.

Soon after Dave and Dan were called up, Farley, listening with
his door ajar half an inch, slipped out and hit the tungsten
burner a smart rap just in the nick of time to save Dan Dalzell's
Navy uniform to that young man.




CHAPTER III

BAD NEWS FROM WEST POINT


Bump!  The ball, hit squarely by the toe of Wolgast's football
shoe, soared upward from the twenty-five-yard line.  It described
an arc, flying neatly over and between the goal-posts at one end
of the athletic field.

"That's the third one for you, Wolly," murmured Jetson.  "You're
going to be a star kicker!"

"Shall I try out the rest of the squad, sir?" asked Wolgast, turning
to Lieutenant-Commander Parker, this year's new coach.

"Try out a dozen or so of the men," nodded coach, which meant,
in effect: "Try out men who are most likely to remain on the Navy
team."

"Jetson!" called Wolgast.

Jet tried, but it took his third effort to make a successful kick.

"You see, Wolly, who is not to be trusted to make the kick in a
game," remarked Jetson with a rueful smile.

"It shows me who may need practice more than some of the others---that's
all," answered Wolgast kindly.

With that the ball went to Dave.  The first kick he missed.

"I can do better than that, if you'll give me the chance," observed
Darrin quietly.

At a nod from Coach Parker, Dave was allowed five more trials, in
each one of which he made a fair kick.

"Mr. Darrin is all right.  He won't need to practice that very
often, Mr. Wolgast," called coach.

Then Dan had his try.  He made one out of three.

"No matter, Danny Grin," cried Page solacingly, "we love you for
other things that you can do better on the field."

Farley made two out of three.  Page, though a rattling good man
over on the right flank, missed all three kicks.

"I'm a dub at kicking," he growled, retiring in much disgust with
himself.

Other midshipmen had their try, with varying results.

"Rustlers, forward!" shouted Lieutenant-Commander Parker.

Eleven young fellows who had been waiting with more or less patience
now threw aside their blankets or robes and came running across
the field, their eyes dancing with keen delight.

"Mr. Wolgast, let the Rustlers start the ball---and take it
away from 'em in snappy fashion!" admonished coach.

The game started.  In the second team at Annapolis there were
some unusually good players---half a dozen, at least, who were
destined to win a good deal of praise as subs. that year.

Tr-r-r-r-ill! sounded the whistle, and the ball was in motion.

Yet, try as he did, the captain of the Rustlers made a side kick,
driving the ball not far out of Dave Darrin's way.  It was coming,
now, in Dan's path, but Dalzell muttered in a barely audible undertone:

"You, Davy!"

So Darrin, playing left end on the Navy team, darted in and caught
the ball.  He did not even glance sideways to learn where Dan
was.  He knew that Dalzell would be either at his back or right
elbow as occasion demanded.

"Take it away from Darry!" called Pierson, captain of the Rustlers.
"Block him!"

The scores of spectators lining the sides of the field were watching
with keenest interest.

It was rumored that Dave and Dan had some new trick play hidden up
their sleeves.

Yet, with two men squarely in the path of Darrin it seemed incredible
that he could get by, for the Rustlers had bunched their interference
skillfully at this point.

"Darry will have to stop!" yelled a score of voices at once, as
Dave bounded at his waiting opponents.

"Yah, yah, yah!"

"Wow!"

"Whoop!"

The spectators had been treated to a sight that they never forgot.

Just as Dave reached those who blocked him he seemed to falter.
It was Dan Dalzell who bumped in and received the opposition alone.
Dan went down under it, all glory to him!

But Dave, in drawing back as he had done, had stepped aside like
lightning, and now he had gone so far that he had no opposing end
to dodge.

Instead, he darted straight ahead, leaving all of the forward
line of the Rustlers behind.

But there was the back field to meet!

As Dave shot forward, Jetson, too, smashed over the line, blocking
the halfback who got in his way.

Straight over the line charged Dave Darrin, and laid the ball down.

Now the athletic field resounded with excited yells.  Annapolis
had seen "a new one," and it caught the popular fancy like lightning.

Back the pigskin was carried, and placed for the kick.

"You take it, Darry," called Wolgast.  "You've earned it!"

"Take it yourself, Wolly," replied Dave Darrin.  "This is your
strong point."

So Wolgast kicked and scored.  The Rustlers at first looked dismayed
over it all, but in another instant a cheer had broken loose from
them.

It was the business of the Rustlers to harry the Navy team all they
could---to beat the Navy, if possible, for the Rustlers received
their name from the fact that they were expected to make the team
members rustle to keep their places.

Just the same the Rustlers were delighted to find themselves beaten
by a trick so simple and splendid that it fairly took their breath
away.  For it was the Navy team, not the Rustlers, who met the enemy
from the colleges and from West Point.  Rustlers and team men alike
prayed for the triumph of the Navy in every game that was fought out.

"You never told me that you had that trick, Darry," muttered Wolgast,
in the rest that followed this swift, brilliant play.

"I wanted to show it to you before telling you about it" laughed
Dave.

"Why?"

"Because I didn't know whether it were any good."

"Any good?  Why, Darry, if you can get up one or two more like
that you'll be the greatest gridiron tactician that the Navy has
ever had!"

"I didn't get up that one," Dave confessed modestly.

"You didn't, Mr. Darrin?" interposed Coach Parker.  "Who did?"

"Mr. Jetson, sir."

"I helped a bit," admitted Jetson, turning red as he found himself
the center of admiring gazes.  "Dalzell and Darrin helped work it
out, too."

"Have you any more like that one, Mr. Darrin?" questioned Coach
Parker.

"I think we have a few, sir," Dave smiled steadily.

"Are you ready to exhibit them, Mr. Darrin?"

"We'll show 'em all, if you order it, sir," Darrin answered
respectfully.  "But we'll undoubtedly spring two or three of 'em,
anyway, in this afternoon's practice."

"I'll be patient, then," nodded coach.  "But I want a brief talk
with you after practice, Mr. Darrin."

"Very good, sir."

"I just want you to sketch out the new plays to me in private, that
I may consider them," explained the lieutenant-commander.

"Yes, sir.  But I am not really the originator of any of the new
plays.  Mr. Dalzell and Mr. Jetson have had as much to do with
all of the new ones as I have, sir."

"And this is Darrin's last year!  The Navy will never have his
like again," groaned one fourth classman to another.

"Ready to resume play!" called coach.  "Navy to start the ball."

The play was on again, in earnest, but this time it fell to the
right flank of, the Navy team to stop the onward rush of the Rustlers
as they charged down with the ball after the Navy's kick-off.

In fact, not during the team practice did Dave or Dan get a chance
to show another of their new tricks.

"Just our luck!" grunted many of the spectators.

Meanwhile Dave, Dan and Jet got out of their togs, and through with
their shower baths as quickly as they could, for Lieutenant-Commander
Parker was on hand, awaiting them impatiently.

Until close to supper call did the coach hold converse with these
three men of the Navy's left flank.  Then the lieutenant-commander
went to Midshipman Wolgast, who was waiting.

"Mr. Wolgast, I see the Army's banner trailed low in the dust
this year," laughed coach.  "These young gentlemen have been explaining
to me some new plays that will cause wailing and gnashing of teeth
at West Point."

"I'm afraid, sir, that you forget one thing," smiled Darrin.

"What is that, sir?" demanded coach.

"Why, sir, the Army has Prescott and Holmes, beyond a doubt, for
they played last year."

"I saw Prescott and Holmes last year," nodded Mr. Parker.  "But
they didn't have a thing to compare with what you've just been
explaining to me."

"May I remark, sir, that that was last year?" suggested Dave.

"Then you think that Prescott and Holmes may have developed some
new plays."

"I'd be amazed, sir, if they hadn't done so.  And I've tried to
have the Navy always bear in mind, sir, that Dalzell and myself
learned everything we know of football under Dick Prescott, who,
for his weight, I believe to be the best football player in the
United States!"

"You're not going to get cold feet, are you, Mr. Darrin?" laughed
Lieutenant-Commander Parker.

"No, sir; but, on the other hand, I don't want to underestimate
the enemy."

"You don't seem likely to commit that fault, Mr. Darrin.  For
my part," went on coach, "I'm going to feel rather satisfied that
Prescott and Holmes, of the Army, won't be able to get up anything
that will equal or block the new plays you've been describing
to me."

Dave and Dan were more than usually excited as they lingered in
their room, awaiting the call to supper formation.  Farley and
Page, all ready to respond to the call, were also in the room.

"I hope old Dick and Greg haven't got anything new that will stop
us!" glowed Dan Dalzell.

"It's just barely possible, of course," assented Darrin, "that
they haven't."

"If they haven't," chuckled Farley gleefully, "then we scuttle
the Army this year."

"Wouldn't it be truly great," laughed Page, "to see the great
Prescott go down in the dust of defeat.  Ha, ha!  I can picture,
right now, the look of amazement on his Army face!"

"We mustn't laugh too soon," Dave warned his hearers.

"Don't you want to see the redoubtable Prescott shoved into the
middle of next year?" challenged Midshipman Page.

"Oh, yes; of course.  Yet that's not because he's Prescott, for
good old Dick is one of the most precious friends I have in the
world," Dave answered earnestly.  "I want to see Prescott beaten
this year, and I want to have a hand in doing it---simply for
the greater glory of the Navy!"

"Well," grunted Page, "that's good enough for me."

"We'll trail Soldier Prescott in the dust!" was a gleeful boast
that circulated much through the Naval Academy during the few
succeeding days.

Even Dave became infected with it, for he was a loyal Navy man
to the very core.  He began to think much of every trick of play
that could possibly help to retire Dick Prescott to the
background---all for the fame of the Navy and not for the hurt of
his friend.

Dave even dreamed of it at night.

As for Dalzell, he caught the infection, proclaiming:

"We're out, this year, just to beat old Prescott and Holmes!"

Yet readers of the High School Boys' Series, who know the deep
friendship that had existed, and always would, between Prescott
and Holmes on the one side, and Darrin and Dalzell, on the other,
do not need to be told that this frenzied feeling had in it nothing
personal.

"If you two go on," laughed Midshipman Farley, one evening after
release, "you'll both end up with hating your old-time chums."

"Don't you believe it!" retorted Dave Darrin almost sharply.
"This is just a matter between the two service academies.  What
we want is to show the country that the Navy can put up an eleven
that can walk all around the Army on Franklin Field."

"A lot the country cares about what we do!" laughed Page.

"True," admitted Dare.  "A good many people do seem to forget
that there are any such American institutions as the Military
and the Naval Academies.  Yet there are thousands of Americans
who are patriotic enough to be keenly interested in all that we do."

"This is going to be a bad year for Army friends," chuckled Farley.

"And for the feelings of Cadets Prescott and Holmes," added Page
with a grimace.

As the practice went on the spirits of the Navy folks went up to
fever heat.  It was plain that, this year, the Navy eleven was to
make history in the world of sports.

"Poor old Dick!" sighed Darrin one day, as the members of the
squad were togging to go on to the field.

"Why?" Dan demanded.

"Because, in spite of myself, I find that I am making a personal
matter of the whole business.  Dan, I'm obliged to be candid with
myself.  It has come to the point that it is Prescott and Holmes
that I want to beat!"

"Same case here," Dan admitted readily.  "They gave us a trouncing
last year, and we're bound to pass it back to 'em."

"I believe I'd really lose all interest in the game, if Dick and
Greg didn't play on the Army this year."

"I think I'd feel the same way about it," agreed Dan.  "But never
fear---they will play."

Two days later Dan finished his bath and dressing, after football
practice, to find that Dave had already left ahead of him.  Dan
followed to their quarters in Bancroft Hall, to find Dave pacing
the floor, the picture of despair.

"Dan!" cried Darrin sharply.  "This letter is from Dick.  He doesn't
play this year!"

"Don't tell me anything funny, like that, when I've got a cracked
lip," remonstrated Midshipman Dalzell.

"Dick doesn't play, I tell you---which means that Greg won't,
either.  A lot of boobs at the Military Academy have sent Dick
to Coventry for something that he didn't do.  Dan, I don't care
a hang about playing this year---we can't beat Prescott and Holmes,
for they won't be there!"




CHAPTER IV

DAVE'S WORK GOES STALE


"Aye, you're not---not joking?" demanded Dan Dalzell half piteously.

"Do you see any signs of mirth in my face?" demanded Dave Darrin
indignantly.

Rap-tap!  Right after the summons Midshipman Farley and Page entered
the room.

"Say, who's dead?" blurted out Farley, struck by the looks of
consternation on the faces of their hosts.

"Tell him, Dave," urged Dan.

"Prescott and Holmes won't play on this year's Army team," stated
Darrin.

"Whoop!" yelled Farley gleefully.  "And that was what you're looking
so mighty solemn about?  Cheer up, boy!  It's good news."

"Great!" seconded Midshipman Page with enthusiasm.

"I tell you, fellows," spoke Dave solemnly, "it takes all the joy
out of the Army-Navy game."

"Since when did winning kill joy?" demanded Farley aghast.  "Why,
with Prescott and Holmes out of it the Navy will get a fit of
crowing that will last until after Christmas!"

"It makes the victory too cheap," contended Darrin.

"A victory is a victory," quoth Midshipman Page, "and the only
fellow who can feel cheap about it is the fellow who doesn't win.
Cheer up, Davy.  It's all well enough to wallop a stray college,
here and there, but the one victory that sinks in deep and does
our hearts good is the one we carry away from the Army.  Whoop!
I could cry for joy."

"But why won't Prescott and Holmes play this year?" asked Farley,
his face radiant with the satisfaction that the news had given him.

"Because the corps has sent Prescott to Coventry for something that
I'm certain the dear old fellow never did," Darrin replied.

"Lucky accident!" muttered Farley.

"But the corps will repent, when they find their football hope
gone," predicted Page, his face losing much of its hitherto joyous
expression.

"No!  No such luck," rejoined Midshipman Darrin.  "If the brigade,
here, sent a fellow to Coventry for what they considered cause,
do you mean to tell me that they'd take the fellow out of Coventry
just to get a good player on the eleven?"

"No, of course, not," Page admitted.

"Then do you imagine that the West Point men are any more lax in
their views of corps honor?" pressed Dave.

"To be sure they are not---they can't be."

"Then there's only a chance in a thousand that Dick Prescott will,
by any lucky accident, be restored to favor in the corps---at
least, in time to play on this year's eleven.  If he doesn't play,
Holmes simply won't play.  So that takes all the interest out of
this year's Army-navy game."

"Not if the Navy wins," contended Midshipman Page.

"Bosh, there's neither profit nor honor in the Navy winning, unless
it's against the best men that the Army can put forth," retorted
Dave Darrin stubbornly.  "By the great Dewey, I'm afraid nine
tenths of my enthusiasm for the game this year has been killed by
the miserable news that has come in."

Within less than five minutes after the midshipmen had seated
themselves around the scores of tables in the mess hall, the news
had flown around that Prescott and Holmes were to be counted as
out of the Army eleven for this year.

Here and there suppressed cheers greeted the announcement The
bulk of the midshipmen, however, were much of Dave Darrin's opinion
that there was little glory in beating less than the best team
that the Army could really put forth.

"Darry looks as though he had just got back from a funeral," remarked
one member of the third class to another youngster.

"I don't blame him," replied the one so addressed.

"But he's all the more sure of winning over the Army this year."

"I don't believe either of you youngsters know Darrin as well
as I do," broke in a second classman.  "What I'm afraid of is,
if Prescott and Holmes don't play with the soldiers, then Darry
will lose interest in the game to such a degree that even Army
dubs will be able to take his shoestrings away from him.  Danny
doesn't enjoy fighting fourth-raters.  It's the big game that
he enjoys going after.  Why, I'm told that he had simply set his
heart on pushing Prescott and Holmes all the way across Franklin
Field this year."

Readers who are anxious to know why Dick Prescott, one of the
finest of American youths, had been sent to Coventry by his comrades
at the United States Military Academy, will find it all set forth
in the concluding volume of the West Point Series, entitled _"Dick
Prescott's Fourth Year At West Point."_

Strangely enough, the first effect of this news from West Point
was to send the Navy eleven somewhat "to the bad."  That is to
say, Dave Darrin, despite his best endeavors, seemed to go stale
from the first hour when he knew that he was not to meet Dick
Prescott on the gridiron.

"Mr. Darrin, what ails you?" demanded coach kindly, at the end
of the second practice game after that.

"I don't know, sir."

"You must brace up."

"Yes, sir."

"You seem to have lost all ambition.  No; I won't just say that.
But you appear, Mr. Darrin, either to have lost some of your snap
or ambition, or else you have gone unaccountably stale."

"I realize my defects, sir, and I am trying very, very hard to
overcome them."

"Are you ill at ease over any of your studies?" persisted coach.

"No, sir; it seems to me that the fourth year studies are the
easiest in the whole course."

"They are not, Mr. Darrin.  But you have had the advantage of three
hard years spent in learning how to study, and so your present
course appears rather easy to you.  Are you sleeping well?"

"Yes, sir."

"Eating well?"

"Splendid appetite, sir."

"Hm!  I shall soon have a chance to satisfy myself on that point,
Mr. Darrin.  The day after to-morrow the team goes to training
table.  Have you any idea, Mr. Darrin, what is causing you to
make a poorer showing?"

"I have had one very great disappointment, sir.  But I'd hate to
think that a thing like that could send me stale."

"Oh, a disappointment?"

"Yes, sir," Dave went on frankly.  "You see, sir, I have been
looking forward, most eagerly, to meeting Prescott and downing
him with the tricks that Jetson, Dalzell and I have been getting
up."

"Oh!  Prescott of the Army team?"

"Yes, sir."

"I think I heard something about his having been sent to Coventry at
the Military Academy."

"But, Mr. Darrin, you are not going to fail us just because the
Army loses a worthy player or two?" exclaimed Lieutenant-Commander
Parker in astonishment.

"Probably that isn't what ails me, sir," Dave answered flushing.
"After all, sir, probably I'm just beginning to go stale.  If
I can't shake it off no doubt I had better be retired from the
Navy eleven."

"Don't you believe it!" almost shouted coach.  "Mr. Darrin, you
will simply have to brace!  Give us all the best that's in you,
and don't for one instant allow any personal disappointments to
unfit you.  You'll do that, won't you?"

"Yes, sir."

Darrin certainly tried hard enough.  Yet just as certainly the
Navy's boosters shook their heads when they watched Darrin's work
on the field.

"He has gone stale," they said.  "The very worst thing that could
happen to the Navy this year!"

Then came the first game of the season---with Lehigh.  Darrin
roused himself all he could, and his playing was very nearly up
to what might have been expected of him---though not quite.

The visitors got away with a score of eight to five against the Navy.

Next week the Lehighs went to West Point and suffered defeat at
the hands of the Army.

The news sent gloom broadcast through the Naval Academy.

"We get beaten by one of the smaller colleges, that West Point can
trim," was the mournful comment.

It did, indeed, look bad for the Navy!




CHAPTER V

DAN HANDS HIMSELF BAD MONEY


As the season went on it was evident that Dave Darrin was slowly
getting back to form.

Yet coach was not wholly satisfied, nor was anyone else who had
the triumph of the Navy eleven at heart.

Three more games had been played, and two of them were won by
the Navy.  Next would come Stanford College, a hard lot to beat.
The Navy tried to bolster up its own hopes; a loss to Stanford
would mean the majority of games lost out of the first five.

True, the news from West Point was not wholly disconcerting to
the Navy.  The Army that year had some strong players, it was
true; still, the loss of Prescott and Holmes was sorely felt.
Word came, too, in indirect ways, that there was no likelihood
whatever that the Coventry against Cadet Dick Prescott would be
lifted.  It was the evident purpose of the Corps of Cadets, for
fancied wrongs, to ostracize Dick Prescott until he found himself
forced to resign from the United States Military Academy.

November came in.  Stanford came.  Coach talked to Dave Darrin
steadily for ten minutes before the Navy eleven trotted out on
to the field.  Stanford left Annapolis with small end of the score,
in a six-to-two game, and the Navy was jubilant.

"Darrin has come back pretty close to his right form," was the
general comment.

For that Saturday evening Dan Dalzell, being now "on privilege"
again, asked and received leave to visit in town---this the more
readily because his work on the team had prevented his going out
of the Yard that afternoon.

Dave, too, requested and secured leave to go into town, though
he stated frankly that he had no visit to make, and wanted only
a stroll away from the Academy grounds.

Darrin went most of the way to the Prestons.

"Come right along through, and meet Miss Preston," urged Dan.

"If you ask it as a favor I will, old chap," Dave replied.

"No; I thought the favor would be to you."

"So it would, ordinarily," Darrin replied gallantly.  "But to-night
I just want to stroll by myself."

"Ta-ta, then." The grin on Dan Dalzell's face as he turned away
from his chum was broader than usual.  Dan was thinking that,
this time, though his call must be a short one, he would be in
no danger on his return.  He could report unconcernedly just before
taps.

"No doughface need apply to-night," chuckled Dan.  "But Davy was
surely one awfully good fellow to get me through that other scrape
as he did."

All thought of football fled from Dan Dalzell's brain as he pulled
the bellknob at the Preston house.

After all this was to be but the third meeting.  Dan fancied,
however, that absence had made his heart fonder.  Since the night
when he had Frenched it over the wall Dan had received two notes
from Miss Preston, in answer to his own letters, but the last
note was now ten days' old.

"May I see Mrs. Preston?" asked Dan, as a colored servant opened
the door and admitted him.

This was Dan's correct idea of the way to call on a young woman
to whom he was not engaged, but half hoped to be, some day.

The colored maid soon came back.

"Mrs. Preston is so very busy, sah, that she asks to be excused,
sah," reported the servant, coming into the parlor where Dan sat
on the edge of a chair.  "But Mistah Preston will be down right
away, sah."

A moment later a heavier step was heard on the stairway.  Then
May Preston's uncle came into the parlor.

"You will pardon Mrs. Preston not coming down stairs to-night,
I know, Mr. Dalzell," said the man of the house, as he and the
midshipman shook hands.  "The truth is, we are very much occupied
to-night."

"I had not dreamed of it, or I would not have called," murmured
Dan reddening.  "I trust you will pardon me."

"There is no need of pardon, for you have not offended," smiled
Mr. Preston.  "I shall be very glad to spare you half an hour,
if I can interest, you."

"You are very kind, sir," murmured Dan.  "And Miss Preston----"

"My niece?"

"Yes, sir."

"It is mainly on my niece's account that we are so busy to-night,"
smiled the host.

"She is not ill, sir?" asked Dan in alarm.

"Ill!  Oh, dear me, no!"

Mr. Preston laughed most heartily.

"No; she is not in the least ill, Mr. Dalzell, though, on Monday,
she may feel a bit nervous toward noon,"

"Nervous---on Monday?" asked Dan vaguely.  It seemed rank nonsense
that her uncle should be able to predict her condition so definitely
on another day.

"Why, yes; Monday is to be the great day, of course."

"Great day, sir?  And why 'of course'?" inquired Dan, now as much
interested as he was mystified.

"Why, my niece is to be married Monday at high noon."

"Married?" gasped Midshipman Dalzell, utterly astounded and discomfited
by such unlooked-for news.

"Yes; didn't you know Miss Preston was engaged to be married?"

"I---I certainly did not," Dan stammered.

"Why, she spoke to you much of 'Oscar'-----"

"Her brother?"

"No; the man who will be her husband on Monday," went on Mr. Preston
blandly.  Being quite near-sighted the elder man had not discovered
Dan's sudden emotion.  "That is what occupies us to-night.  We
leave on the first car for Baltimore in the morning.  Mrs. Preston
is now engaged over our trunks."

"I---I am very certain, then, that I have come at an unseasonable
time," Dan answered hastily.  "I did not know---which fact, I
trust, will constitute my best apology for having intruded at
such a busy season, Mr. Preston."

"There has been no intrusion, and therefore no apology is needed,
sir," replied Mr. Preston courteously.

Dan got out, somehow, without staggering, or without having his
voice quiver.

Once in the street he started along blindly, his fists clenched.

"So that's the way she uses me, is it?" he demanded of himself
savagely.  "Plays with me, while all the time the day for her
wedding draws near.  She must be laughing heartily over---my greenness!
Oh, confound all girls, anyway!"

It was seldom that Midshipman Dalzell allowed himself to get in
a temper.  He had been through many a midshipman fight without
having had his ugliness aroused.  But just now Dan felt humiliated,
sore in spirit and angry all over---especially with all members
of the gentler sex.

He even fancied that Mr. Preston was at that moment engaged in
laughing over the verdant midshipman.  As a matter of fact, Mr.
Preston was doing nothing of the sort.  Mr. Preston had not supposed
that Dan's former call had been intended as anything more than
a pleasant social diversion.  The Prestons supposed that every
one knew that their niece was betrothed to an excellent young
fellow.  So, at this particular moment, Mr. Preston was engaged
in sitting on a trunk, while his wife tried to turn the key in
the lock.  Neither of them was favoring Midshipman Dalzell with
as much as a thought.

"Why on earth is it that all girls are so tricky?" Dan asked himself
savagely, taking it for granted that all girls are "tricky" where
admirers are concerned.

"Oh, my, what a laugh Davy will have over me, when he hears!" was
Dan's next bitter thought, as he strode along.

Having just wronged all girls in his own estimation of them, Dan
was now proceeding to do his own closest chum an injustice.  For
Dave Darrin was too thorough a gentleman to laugh over any unfortunate's
discomfiture.

"What a lucky escape I had from getting better acquainted with
that girl!" was Dalzell's next thought.  "Why, with one as wholly
deceitful as she is there can be no telling where it would all have
ended.  She might have drawn me into troubles that would have
resulted in my having to leave the service!"

Dan had not the least desire to do any one an injustice, but just
now he was so astounded and indignant that his mind worked violently
rather than keenly.

"Serves me right!" sputtered Dalzell, at last.  "A man in the
Navy has no business to think about the other sex.  He should
give his whole time and thought to his profession and his country.
That's what I'll surely do after this."

Having reached this conclusion, the midshipman should have been
more at peace with himself, but he wasn't.  He had been sorely,
even if foolishly wounded in his own self esteem, and it was bound
to hurt until the sensation wore off.

"You'll know more, one of these days, Danny boy," was his next
conclusion.  "And what you know will do you a lot more good, too,
if it doesn't include any knowledge whatever of girls---except
the disposition and the ability to keep away from 'em!  I suppose
there are a few who wouldn't fool a fellow in this shameless way
but it will be a heap safer not to try to find any of the few!"

Dan's head was still down, and he was walking as blindly as ever,
when he turned a corner and ran squarely into some one.

"Why don't you look out where you're going?" demanded that some
one.

"Why don't you look out yourself?" snapped Midshipman Dalzell,
and the next instant a heavy hand was laid upon him.




CHAPTER VI

THE "FORGOT" PATH TO TROUBLE


"Here, confound you!  I'll teach you to-----"

"Teach me how to walk the way you were going when I stopped you?"
demanded the same voice, and a harder grip was taken on Dalzell's
shoulder.

In his misery Dan was not at all averse to fighting, if a good
excuse were offered.  So his first move was not to look up, but
to wrest him self out of that grip, haul away and put up his guard.

"Dave Darrin!" gasped Midshipman Dan, using his eyes at last.

Dave was laughing quietly.

"Danny boy, you shouldn't cruise without lights and a bow watch!"
admonished Dave.  "What sent your wits wool gathering?  You look
terribly upset over something."

"Do I?" asked Dan, looking guilty.

"You certainly do.  And see here, is this the way to the Preston
house?"

"No; it's the way away from it."

"But you had permission to visit at the Prestons."

"That isn't any news to me," grunted Dalzell.

"Then---pardon me---but why aren't you there?"

"Are you the officer of the day?" demanded Dan moodily.

"No; merely your best friend."

"I beg your pardon, Dave.  I am a grouch tonight."

"Wasn't Miss Preston at home."

"I---I don't know."

"Don't know?  Haven't you been there?"

"Yes; but I didn't ask-----"

As Dan hesitated Dave rested both hands on his chum's shoulders,
looking sharply into that young man's eyes.

"Danny, you act as though you were _loco_.  (crazy).  What on
earth is up?  You went to call on Miss Preston.  You reached the
house, and evidently you left there again.  But you don't know
whether Miss Preston was in; you forgot to ask.  Let me look in
at the answer to the riddle."

"Dave---Miss Preston is going to be married!"

"Most girls are going to be," Darrin replied quietly.  "Do you
mean that Miss Preston is going to marry some one else than yourself?"

"Yes."

"Soon?"

"Monday noon."

Dave Darrin whistled.

"So this is the meaning of your desperation?  Danny boy, if you're
stung, I'm sincerely sorry for you."

"I don't quite know whether I want any sympathy," Dan replied,
though he spoke rather gloomily.  "Perhaps I'm to be congratulated."

He laughed mirthlessly, then continued:

"When a girl will treat a fellow like that, isn't it just as well
to find out her disposition early?"

"Perhaps," nodded Darrin.  "But Danny, do you mean to say that
you attempted to pay your call without an appointment?"

"What was the need of an appointment?" demanded Dan.  "Miss Preston
invited me to call at any time---just drop in.  Now, she must
know that Saturday evening is a midshipman's only chance at this
time of the year."

"Nevertheless, you were wrong at that point, in the game," Dave
went on gravely.  "Unless you're on the best of terms with a young
lady, don't attempt to call on her without having learned that
your purpose will be agreeable to her.  And so Miss Preston, while
receiving your calls, has been engaged to some one else?"

Dan nodded, adding, "She might have given me some hint, I should
think."

"I don't know about that," Darrin answered thoughtfully.  "Another
good view of it would be that a young lady's private affairs are
her own property.  Didn't she ever mention the lucky fellow to you?"

"It seems that she did," Dalzell assented.  "But I thought, all
the time, that she was talking about her brother."

"Why should you especially think it was her brother whom she was
mentioning?"

"Because she seemed so mighty fond of the fellow," Dan grunted.

Dave choked a strong impulse to laugh.

"Danny boy," he remarked, "girls, very often, are mighty fond,
also, of the fellow to whom they're engaged."

"Why did she let me call?" demanded Dan gloomily.

"How often have you called?" inquired Midshipman Darrin.

"Once, before to-night."

"Only once?  Then, see here, Danny!  Don't be a chump.  When you
call on a girl once, and ask if you may call some other time,
how on earth is she to guess that you're an intended rival of
the man she has promised to marry?"

"But-----" That was as far as Midshipman Dalzell got.  He halted,
wondering what he really could say next.

"Dan, I'm afraid you've got an awful lot to learn about girls,
and also about the social proprieties to be observed in calling
on them.  As to Miss Preston receiving a call from you, and permitting
you to call again, that was something that any engaged girl might
do properly enough.  Miss Preston came to Annapolis, possibly
to learn something about midshipman life.  She met you and allowed
you to call.  Very likely she permitted others to call.  From
what you've told me I can't see that she treated you unfairly
in any way; I don't believe Miss Preston ever guessed that you
had any other than the merest social reasons for calling."

"And I'm not sure that I did have," grunted Dalzell.

Dave shot another swift look into his chum's face before he said:

"Danny boy, your case is a light one.  You'll recover speedily.
Your vanity has been somewhat stung, but your heart won't have
a scar in three days from now."

"What makes you think you know so much about that?" insisted Dan,
drawing himself up with a dignified air.

"It isn't hard to judge, when it's another fellow's case," smiled
Darrin.  "I believe that, at this minute, I understand your feelings
better than you do yourself."

"I don't know about my feelings," proclaimed Dan gloomily still,
"but I do know something about my experience and conclusions.
No more girls for me!"

"Good idea, Danny boy," cried Darrin, slapping his friend on the
back.  "That's the best plan for you, too."

"Why?"

"Because you haven't head enough to understand girls and their ways."

"I don't want to."

"Good!  I hope you will keep in that frame of mind.  And now,
let's talk of something serious."

"Of what, then?" inquired Dalzell, as the two started to walk
along together.

"Football."

"Is that more serious than girls?" demanded Dan Dalzell, suspicious
that his friend was making fun of him.

"It's safer, at any rate, for you.  Why, if a girl happens to
say, 'Delighted to meet you, Mr. Dalzell,' you expect her to give
up all other thoughts but you, and to be at home every Saturday
evening.  No, no, Danny.  The company of the fair is not for you.
Keep to things you understand better---such as football."

Dan Dalzell's eyes shot fire.  He was certain, now, that his chum
was poking fun at him, and this, in his present temper, Dan could
not quite endure.

"So, since we've dropped the subject of girls," Dave continued
placidly, "what do you think are our real chances for the balance
of this season?"

"They'd be a lot improved," grunted Dan, "if you'd get the grip
on yourself that you had at the beginning of the season."

"I know I'm not playing in as good form as I had hoped to," Dave
nodded.  "The worst of it is, I can't find out the reason."

"A lot of the fellows think you've lost interest since you found
that you won't have the great Prescott to play against in the
Army-Navy game," Dan hinted.

"Yes; I know.  I've heard that suspicion hinted at."

"Isn't it true?" challenged Dalzell.

"To the best of my knowledge and belief, it isn't.  Why, Danny,
it would be absurd to think that I couldn't play right now, just
because Dick isn't to be against us on Franklin Field."

"I know it would sound absurd," Dan replied.  "But let us put
it another way, Dave.  All along you've been working yourself
up into better form, because you knew that, otherwise, it was
very doubtful whether the Navy could beat the Army on the gridiron.
So you had worked yourself up to where you played a better game
than ever Dick Prescott thought of doing.  Then you hear that
poor Dick is in Coventry, and therefore not on the team.  You
haven't got the great Army man to beat, and, just for that reason,
you slack up on your efforts."

"I am not slacking up," retorted Dave with some spirit.  "I am doing
the best that is in me, though I admit I appear to have gone stale."

"And so something will happen," predicted Dan.

"What will that be?"

"Between now and the game with the Army, Prescott's comrades will
find what boobs they've been, and they'll lift the Coventry.
Prescott and Holmes will get into the Army team at the last moment,
and the fellows from West Point will ride rough-shod over the
Navy, just as they did last year."

"Do you really think that will happen?" demanded Darrin eagerly.
"Do you really believe that dear old Dick will get out of that
Coventry and back on the Army eleven?"

"Well," returned Midshipman Dalzell soberly, "I'll venture a prediction.
If you don't get a brace on your playing soon, then it'll be
regular Navy luck for Prescott to come to Philadelphia and put
on his togs.  Then the soldiers will drag us down the field to
the tune of 46 to 2."

"I'd sooner he killed on the field than see that happen!" cried
Midshipman Dave, his eyes flashing.

"Then don't let it happen!  You're the only star on our team, Dave,
that isn't up to the mark.  If we lose to the Army, this year,
Prescott or no Prescott, it will be your fault, Dave Darrin.
You're not one of our weak spots, really but you're not as strong
as you ought to be and can be if you'll only brace."

"Brace!" quivered Dave.  "Won't I, though?"

"Good! Just stick to that."

"Dan!" Darrin halted his chum before a store where dry goods and
notions were sold.  "Let's go in here-----"

"What, for?" Midshipman Dalzell asked in astonishment.

"I want to make a purchase," replied Dave soberly.  "Danny boy,
I'm going to buy you a hat pin---one at least ten inches long.
You're to slip it in, somewhere in your togs.  When you catch
me lagging---practice or game---just jab that hat pin into me
as far as you can send it."

"Bosh!" retorted Dan impatiently.  "Come along."

Dave submitted, in patient silence, to being led away from the
store.  For some moments the chums strolled along together in
silence.

"Now, speaking of Miss Preston," began Dan, breaking the silence
at last, "she-----"

"Drop that!  Get back to football, Danny---it's safer," warned
Dave Darrin.

"But-----"

"Hold on, I tell you!  You had almost recovered, Danny, in the
short space of five minutes.  Now, don't bring on a relapse by
opening up the old sore.  I shall soon begin to believe it was
your heart that was involved, instead of your vanity."

"Oh, hang girls, then!" exploded Dan.

"Couldn't think of it," urged Dave gently.  "That wouldn't be
chivalrous, and even a midshipman is required to be a gentleman
at all times.  So-----"

"Good evening, gentlemen," spoke a pleasant voice.  The midshipmen
glanced up, then promptly brought up their hands in salute to
an officer whom they would otherwise have passed without seeing.

That officer was Lieutenant Adams, discipline officer.

"Are you enjoying your stroll, Mr. Darrin?" asked Mr. Adams.

"Very much, sir; thank you."

"And you, Mr. Dalzell.  But let me see---wasn't your liberty
for the purpose of paying a visit?"

"Yes, sir," Dan answered, coloring.

"And you are strolling, instead?"

"Yes, sir; the person on whom I went to call was not there."

"Then, Mr. Darrin, you should have returned to Bancroft Hall,
and reported your return."

"Yes, sir; I should have done that," Dan confessed in confusion.
"The truth is, sir, it hadn't occurred to me."

"Return at once, Mr. Dalzell, and place yourself on report for
strolling without permission."

"Yes, sir."

Both midshipmen saluted, then turned for the shortest cut to Maryland
Avenue, and thence to the gate at the end of that thoroughfare.

"Ragged!" muttered Dan.  "And without the slightest intention of
doing anything improper."

"It was improper, though," Dave replied quickly, "and both you
and I should have thought of it in time."

"I really forgot."

"Forgot to think, you mean, Dan, and that's no good excuse in
bodies of men where discipline rules.  Really, I should have gone
on report, too."

"But you had liberty to stroll in town."

"Yes; but I'm guilty in not remembering to remind you of your
plain duty."

Lieutenant Adams had not in the least enjoyed ordering Dan to
place himself on report.  The officer had simply done his duty.
To the average civilian it may seem that Dan Dalzell had done
nothing very wrong in taking a walk when he found the purpose
of his call frustrated; but discipline, when it imposes certain
restrictions on a man, cannot allow the man himself to be the
judge of whether he may break the restrictions.  If the man himself
is to be the judge then discipline ceases to exist.

"So I've got to stick myself on pap, and accept a liberal handful
of demerits, all on account of a girl?" grumbled Dan, as the chums
turned into the road leading to Bancroft Hall."

"That is largely because you couldn't get the girl out of your
head," Dave rejoined.  "Didn't I tell you, Danny, that you hadn't
head enough to give any of your attention to the other sex?"

"It's tough to get those demerits, though," contended Dan.  "I
imagine there'll be a large allowance of them, and in his fourth
year a fellow can't receive many demerits without having to get
out of the Academy.  One or two more such scrapes, and I'll soon
be a civilian, instead of an officer in the Navy!"

"See here, Dan; I'll offer an explanation that you can make truthfully.
Just state, when you're called up, that you and I were absorbed
talking football, and that you really forgot to turn in the right
direction while your mind was so full of Navy football.  That may
help some."

"Yes; it will---not!"

Dan Dalzell passed into the outer room of the officer in charge,
picked up a blank and filled it out with the report against himself.

Dave was waiting outside as Dan came out from the disagreeable
duty of reporting himself.

"Hang the girls!" Dalzell muttered again disgustedly.




CHAPTER VII

DAN'S EYES JOLT HIS WITS


Dan Dalzell, on the point of stepping out of Bancroft Hall, wheeled
like a flash, and bounded back against Farley, Jetson and Page.

"Don't look!" whispered Dan hoarsely.  "Duck!"

"What on earth is the matter?" demanded Midshipman Darrin, eyeing
his chum sharply.

"I---I don't know what it is," muttered Dan, after he had backed
his friends some feet from the entrance.

"What does it look like?" asked Farley.

"Something like a messenger boy," returned Dan.

"Surely, you're not afraid of a messenger boy with a telegram,"
laughed Darrin.  "Little chance that the message is for you, at
any rate."

"But---it's got a Naval uniform on, I tell you," warned Dan.

"No; you hadn't told us.  What is it---another midshipman?"

"Not by a jugful!" Dan sputtered.  "It's wearing an officer's
uniform."

"Then undoubtedly you chanced to glance at an officer of the
Navy," Darrin replied, sarcastically soothing.  "Brace up, Dan."

"But he's only a kid!" remonstrated Dan.  "And he wear a lieutenant's
insignia!"

"Bosh!  Some officers are quite boyish-looking," remarked Farley.
"Come on out, fellows; I haven't forgotten how to salute an officer
when I see one."

The others, except Dan, started briskly for the entrance.  As for
Dalzell, he brought up the rear, grumbling:

"All right; you fellows go on out and see whether you see him.
If you don't, then I'm going to report myself at hospital without
delay.  Really, I can't swear that I saw---it."

But at that moment the object of Dan's alarm reached one of the
doors of the entrance of Bancroft Hall and stepped briskly inside.

This new-comer's glance fell upon the knot of midshipmen, and
he glanced at them inquiringly, as though to see whether these
young men intended to salute him.

Surely enough, the newcomer was decidedly boyish-looking, yet
he wore the fatigue uniform and insignia of a lieutenant of the
United States Navy.  If he were masquerading, here was a dangerous
place into which to carry his antics.

The five midshipmen brought their right hands hesitatingly to
the visors of their uniform caps.  The very youthful lieutenant
smartly returned their salutes, half smiled, then turned, in search
of the officer in charge.

"Scoot!  Skip!  Let's escape!" whispered Dan hoarsely, and all
five midshipmen were speedily out in the open.

"Now, did you fellows really see---it---or did I have a delusion
that I saw you all salute when I did?"

"I saw it," rejoined Farley, "and I claim it, if no one else
wants it."

"The service is going to the dogs," growled Page, "when they give
away a lieutenant's uniform with a pound of tea!"

"What ails you fellows?" rebuked Dave Darrin.  "The man who passed
us was a sure-enough lieutenant in the Navy."

"Him?" demanded Midshipman Dalzell, startled out of his grip on
English grammar.  "A lieutenant?  That---that---kid?"

"He's a lieutenant of the Navy, all right," Dave insisted.

"You're wrong," challenged Page.  "Don't you know, Dave, that
a man must be at least twenty-one years old in order to hold an
officer's commission in the Navy?"

"That man who received our salutes is a Naval, officer," Dave
retorted.  "I don't know anything about his age."

"Why, that little boy can't be a day over seventeen," gasped Dan
Dalzell.  "Anyway, fellows, I'm overjoyed that you all saw him!
That takes a load off my mind as to my mental condition."

"Whoever he is, he's a Navy officer, and he has trod the bridge
in many a gale," contended Dave.  "Small and young as he looks,
that man had otherwise every bit of the proper appearance of a
Navy officer."

"What a joke it will be on you," grinned Page, "when you find
the watchman dragging the little fellow away to turn over to the
doctors from the asylum!"

The midshipmen were on their way to report for afternoon football
work.  As they had started a few minutes early, and had time to
spare, they had now halted on the way, and were standing on the
sidewalk in front of the big and handsome barracks building.

"Can you fellows still use your eyes?" Dave wanted to know.  "If
you can, look toward the steps of Bancroft."

The officer in charge was coming out.  At his side was the very
youthful looking one in the lieutenant's uniform.

"The O.C. is decoying the stranger away to turn him over to the
watchmen without violence," guessed Midshipman Farley.

Three officers were approaching.  These the five midshipmen turned
and saluted.  In another moment all of the five save Dave Darrin
received a sharp jolt.  For the O.C. had halted and was introducing
the three Navy officers to the youthful one.

"This is Lieutenant Benson, the submarine expert of whom you have
heard so much," said the O.C., loudly enough for the amazed middies
to hear.

"Sub---sub----say, did you fellows hear that?" begged Dan hoarsely.

"Yes," assented Dave calmly.  "And say, you fellows are a fine
lot to be serving here.  You all remember Mr. Benson.  He was
here last year---he and his two submarine friends.  We didn't
see them, because our class didn't go out on the Pollard submarine
boat that was here last year.  But you remember them, just the
same.  You remember, too, that Mr. Benson and his friends were
hazed by some of the men in last year's youngster class.  You
heard about that?  A lot of the fellows came near getting ragged,
but Benson didn't take offense, and his quick wit pulled that
lot of last year's youngsters out of a bad fix."

"Then Benson and his mates are real people?" demanded Dan, still
doubtful, if his voice were an indication.

"Yes; and Benson is a real submarine expert, too, even if he is
a boy," Dave went on.

"Then he is only a boy?"

"He's seventeen or eighteen."

"Then how can he be a lieutenant?" demanded Dalzell, looking more
bewildered.

"He isn't," Dave answered simply.

"But the O.C. introduced him that way."

"And quite properly," answered Darrin, whereat his companions
stared at him harder than ever.

"Let's walk along," proposed Dave, "and I'll tell you the little
that I know, or think I know, about the matter.  Of course, you
fellows all know about the Pollard submarine boats?  The government
owns a few of them now, and is going to buy a lot more of the
Pollard craft."

"But that kid officer?" insisted Dan.

"If you'll wait I'll come to that.  Benson, his name is; Jack
Benson he's commonly called.  He and two boy friends got in on
the ground floor at the Farnum shipyard.  They were boys of
considerable mechanical skill, and they found their forte in the
handling of submarine boats.  They've done some clever, really
wonderful feats with submarines.  Farnum, the owner of the yard,
trusted these boys, after a while, to show off the fine points of
the craft to our Navy officers and others."

"But what has that to do with giving Benson a commission in the
Navy?" demanded Farley.

"I'm coming to that," Dave replied.  "As I've heard the yarn,
Benson and his two boy friends attracted attention even from the
European governments.  The Germans and some other powers even
made them good offers to desert this country and go abroad as
submarine experts.  Our Navy folks thought enough of Benson and
his chums to want to save them for this country.  So the Secretary
of the Navy offered all three the rank and command of officers
without the actual commissions.  As soon as these young men, the
Submarine Boys as they are called, are twenty-one, the Navy Department
will bestir itself to give them actual commissions and make them
real staff or line officers."

"So that those kids will rank us in the service?" grumbled Dan.

"Well, up to date," replied Dave quietly, "the Submarine Boys
have done more for their country than we have.  Of course, in
the end, we may be admirals in the Navy, even before they're captains.
Who can tell?"

"I wonder what Benson is doing here?" murmured Farley.

"Lieutenant Benson," Dave corrected him, "is probably here on
official business.  If you want exact details, suppose we stop
at the superintendent's house and ask him."

"Quit your kidding," grinned Farley.

"So I've got to say 'sir,' if that boy speaks to me?" asked Dan.

"I think it would be better," smiled Darrin, "if you're anxious
to escape another handful of demerits."

By the time that the football squad began to assemble on the football
field, Dan and his friends found that some of the midshipmen were
full of information about the famous Submarine Boys.  Readers
who may not be familiar with the careers of Lieutenant Jack Benson,
Ensign Hal Hastings, and Ensign Eph Somers are referred to the
volumes of the _Submarine Boys' Series_.  In _"The Submarine Boys
and the Middies"_ will be found the account of the hazing that Jack,
Hal and Eph had received at the hands of midshipmen.

Benson and his two friends, with a crew of four men, were now at
the Naval Academy, having arrived at two o'clock that afternoon,
for the purpose of giving the first classmen instruction aboard
the latest Pollard submarine, the "Dodger."

But play was called, and that stopped, for the time being, all talk
about the Submarine Boys.




CHAPTER VIII

THE PRIZE TRIP ON THE "DODGER"


The following afternoon, at the hour for instruction in the machine
shops, the entire first class was marched down to the basin, where
the "Dodger" lay.  Squad by squad the midshipmen were taken on
board the odd-looking little craft that was more at home beneath
the waves than on them.

While the exact place and scale of importance of submarine war
craft has not been determined as yet, boats of the Pollard type
are certainly destined to play a tremendously important part in
the Naval wars of the future.  Hence all of the midshipmen were
deeply interested in what they saw and were told.

Some of these first classmen were twenty-four years of age, others
from twenty to twenty-two.  Hence, with many of them, there was
some slight undercurrent of feeling over the necessity for taking
instruction from such very youthful instructors as Jack Benson,
Hal Hastings and Eph Somers.

Had any of this latter trio been inclined to put on airs there
might have been some disagreeable feeling engendered in the breasts
of some of the middies.  But Jack and his associates were wholly
modest, pleasant and helpful.

Beginning on the following day, it was announced, the "Dodger"
would take a squad of six midshipmen down Chesapeake Bay for practical
instruction in submarine work, both above and below the surface
of the water.  This instruction would continue daily, with squads
of six midshipmen on board, until all members of the first class
had received thorough drilling.

"That's going to be a mighty pleasant change from the usual routine
here," whispered Farley in Dave's ear.

"It surely will," Darrin nodded.  "It will be even better fun than
football."

"With no chance for the Army to beat us out on this game," Farley
replied slyly.

At last it came the turn of Dave, Dan, Farley, Page, Jetson and
Wolgast to go aboard the "Dodger."

"Gentlemen," announced Lieutenant Jack Benson, "Ensign Somers
will show you all that is possible about the deck handling and
the steering below the surface, and then Ensign Hastings will
explain the mechanical points of this craft.  When both are through,
if you have any questions.  I will endeavor to answer them."

In a few minutes the "showing" had been accomplished.

"Any questions, gentlemen?" inquired Lieutenant Benson.

Dave was ready with three; Farley had four and Jetson two.  Lieutenant
Benson looked particularly pleased as he answered.  Then, at last,
he inquired:

"What's your name?"

"Darrin, sir," Dave replied.

The other midshipmen present were asked their names, and gave them.

"Gentlemen," continued youthful Lieutenant Benson, "this present
squad impresses me as being more eager and interested in submarines
than any of the squads that have come aboard."

"Thank you, sir," Dave replied for himself and the others.

"Are you really exceptionally interested?" inquired Benson.

"I think we are, sir," Dave responded.

"On Saturday of each week, as long as the 'Dodger' is at Annapolis,"
went on Benson, "we intend to take out one of the best squads.
We shall drop down the Bay, not returning, probably before Sunday
noon.  Would you gentlemen like to be the first squad to go on the
longer cruise---next Saturday?"

The faces of all six midshipmen shone with delight for an instant,
until Dave Darrin answered mournfully:

"It would give us great delight, sir, but for one thing.  We play
Creighton University next Saturday, and we are all members of
the Navy team."

"None of you look forward to having to go to hospital during the
progress of the game, do you?" inquired Lieutenant Benson with
a slight smile.

"Hardly, sir."

"Then the 'Dodger' can sail an hour after the finish of the game,
and perhaps stay out a little later on Sunday.  Will that solve
the problem?"

"Splendidly, sir!"

"Then I will use such persuasion as I can with the superintendent
to have you six men detailed for the Saturday-Sunday detail this
week," promised Lieutenant Benson.  "And now I will write your
names down, in order that there may be no mistake about the squad
that reports to me late next Saturday afternoon.  Dismissed!"

As Dave and his friends stepped ashore even Dan Dalzell had a more
gracious estimate of "that kid, Benson."

That night, and for several nights afterwards, the "Dodger" and
her officers furnished a fruitful theme for discussion among the
midshipmen.  As the "Dodger" was believed to be the very finest
submarine craft anywhere among the navies of the world, the interest
grew rather than waned.

Dave and Dan, as well as their four friends, began to look forward
with interest to the coming cruise down the bay.

"Fellows," warned Wolgast, "you'll have to look out not to get your
heads so full of submarines that you lose to Creighton on Saturday."

"On the contrary," retorted Dave, "you can look for us to push
Creighton all over the field.  We'll do it just as a sheer vent
to our new animal spirits."

That was a decidedly boastful speech for Dave Darrin, yet on Saturday
he made good, or helped tremendously, for Creighton retired from the
field with the small end of an eight-to-two score.

"Now, hustle on the dressing," roared Wolgast, as they started
to un-tog and get under the showers, after the football victory.

"What's the need of rush?" demanded Peckham one of the subs.

"It doesn't apply to you," Wolgast shot back over his shoulder,
as he started on a run to the nearest shower.  "I'm talking only
to to-night's submarine squad."

The six midshipmen found many an envious look shot in their direction.

"Those extremely youthful officers seem to have a bad case of spoons
on you six," remarked Peckham almost sourly.

"Show some nearly human intelligence, and maybe you'll get a chance
at one of the Saturday cruises, Peckham," called back Farley, as he
began to towel down vigorously.

Dave and his friends were the first men of the team to be dressed
and ready to leave.

"Give our best regards to Davy Jones!" shouted one of the football
men.

"If you go down to the bottom of Chesapeake Bay, and can't get
up again, don't do anything to spoil the fishing," called another
middy.

By this time Dave Darrin and his mates were outside and on their
way to the basin.

Lieutenant Jack Benson was the only one of the "Dodger's" officers
on view when the midshipmen arrived alongside.  They passed aboard,
saluting Benson, who returned their salutes without affectation.

"All here?" said Benson.  "Mr. Somers, tumble the crew on deck!"

"Shall we go below, sir?" inquired Dave, again saluting.

"Not until so directed," Benson replied.  "I wish you to see every
detail of the boat handling."

At Lieutenant Jack's command the crew threw the hawsers aboard and
soon had them out of the way.

Benson gave the starting signal to Eph Somers.

No sooner had the "Dodger's" hawsers been cast aboard than the
submarine torpedo boat headed out.  It was a get-away swift
enough---almost to take the breath of the midshipmen.

"You see, gentlemen," Lieutenant Benson explained quietly, "we
act on the theory that in submarine work every second has its
value when in action.  So we have paid a good deal of attention
to the speedy start.  Another thing that you will note is that,
aboard so small a craft, it is important that, as far as is possible,
the crew act without orders for each move.  What do you note of the
crew just now?"

"That they performed their work with lightning speed, sir, and that
they have already gone below, without waiting for orders to that
effect."

"Right," nodded Jack Benson.  "Had the crew been needed on deck
I would have ordered them to remain.  As I did not so order they
have gone below, where they are out of the way until wanted.
A craft that fights always on the surface of the water should
have some men of the crew always on deck.  But here on a submarine
the men would be in the way, and we want a clear range of view
all over the deck, and seaward, in order that we may see everything
that it is possible to see.  Mr. Darrin, Mr. Dalzell and Mr. Farley
will remain on deck with me.  The other young gentlemen will go
below to study the workings of the engines under Ensign Hastings."

Though it was a true pleasure trip for all six of the midshipmen,
it was one of hard, brisk instruction all the time.

"Here, you see," explained Lieutenant Jack, leading his trio just
forward of the conning tower, "we have a deck wheel for use when
needed.  Mr. Somers, give up the wheel."

"Aye, aye, sir," and Ensign Eph, who had been sitting at the tower
wheel since the start, moved away and came on deck.

"Mr. Darrin, take the wheel," directed Benson.  "Are you familiar
with the Bay?"

"Not sufficiently, sir, to be a pilot."

"Then I will give you your directions from time to time.  How does
this craft mind her wheel?"

"With the lightest touch, sir, that I ever saw in a wheel."

"The builders of the 'Dodger' have been working to make the action
of the steering wheel progressively lighter with each boat that
they have built.  Men on a submarine craft must have the steadiest
nerves at all times, and steady nerves do not go hand in hand with
muscle fatigue."

Lieutenant Jack walked to the entrance to the conning tower.
"Mallock!" he called down to one of the crew.

"Aye, aye, sir."

"My compliments to Mr. Hastings, and ask him to crowd the speed
of the boat gradually."

"Aye, aye, sir."

The "Dodger" had been moving down the bay at a ten-knot pace.
Suddenly she gave a jump that caused Midshipman Dave Darrin to
wonder.  Then the submarine settled down to a rushing sixteen-knot
gait."

"I didn't know, sir," ventured Farley, "that submarines could
go quite so fast."

"The old types didn't," Lieutenant Jack answered.  "However, on
the surface a capable submarine must be able to show a good deal
of speed."

"For getting away, sir?"

"Oh, no.  Naturally, when a submarine is pursued she can drop under
the surface and leave no trail.  But suppose a single submarine
to be guarding a harbor, unaided by other fighting craft.  A twenty-or
twenty-two knot battleship is discovered, trying to make the harbor.
Even if the battleship steams away the submarine should be capable
of following.  The engines of the 'Dodger,' in favorable weather,
can drive her at twenty-six knots on the surface."

"She's as fast as a torpedo-boat destroyer, then, sir," hazarded Dan.

"Yes; and the submarine needs to be as fast.  With the improvement
of submarine boats the old style of torpedo boat will pass out
altogether.  Then, if the destroyer is retained the submarine
must be capable of attacking the destroyer on equal terms.  Undoubtedly,
after a few years more the river gunboat and the submarine torpedo
boat will be the only small fighting craft left in the navies of
the leading powers of the world."

Even while this brief conversation was going on the speed of the
"Dodger" had begun to increase again.  Ensign Hasting's head showed
through the opening in the conning tower.

"We're going now at a twenty-knot clip, sir," Hal reported.  "Do
you wish any more speed?"

"Not in Chesapeake Bay; navigating conditions are not favorable."

"Very good, sir." Hal vanished below.  Never very talkative, Hal
was content to stand by his engines in silence when there was no
need of talking.

From time to time, as the craft sped on down the bay, Lieutenant
Benson glanced at the chronometer beside the deck wheel.

"You don't have the ship's bell struck on this craft, sir?" inquired
Midshipman Darrin.

"Only when at anchor or in dock," replied Lieutenant Jack Benson.
"A submarine's natural mission is one of stealth, and it wouldn't
do to go about with a clanging of gongs.  Now, let me have the
wheel, Mr. Darrin.  You gentlemen go to the conning tower and
stand so that you can hear what goes on below."

While the three midshipmen stood as directed the speed of the
"Dodger" slackened.

Then, after a space of a full minute, the submarine returned to her
former twenty-knot speed.

"Did you hear any clanging or jangling of a signal bell or gong
when the speeds were changed?" questioned Lieutenant Benson.

"No, sir," Darrin answered.

"That was because no bells were sounded," explained Benson.  "From
deck or conning tower signals can be sent that make no noise.
On a dark night, or in a fog, we could manoeuvre, perhaps, within
a stone's throw of an enemy's battleship, and the only sound that
might betray our presence would be our wash as we moved along.
Take the wheel, Mr. Farley."

Then, after giving Farley a few directions as to the course to
follow, Lieutenant Benson added:

"Take command of the deck, Mr. Farley."

"Humph!" muttered Dan.  "The lieutenant doesn't seem to be afraid
that we'll run his craft into any danger."

"He knows as well as we do what would happen to me, if there were
any disaster, and I had to explain it before a court of inquiry,"
laughed Midshipman Farley.  "Hello!  Who slowed the boat down?"

Dan had done it, unobserved by his comrades, in an irrepressible
spirit of mischief.  He had reached over, touching the indicator,
and thus directing the engine-room man to proceed at less speed.
Dalzell, however, did not answer.

"I'd like to know if the speed were slackened intentionally,"
fussed Farley.  "Darry, do you mind going below and inquiring?"

"Not in the least," smiled Dave, "but is it good Naval etiquette
for one midshipman to use another midshipman as a messenger?"

"Oh, bother etiquette!" grunted Farley.  "What would you really
do if you were in command of the deck---as I am---and you wanted
to ask a question, with the answer down below?"

"I'll go to the conning tower and summon a man on deck, if you
wish," Dave offered.

Farley nodded, so Dave stepped over to the conning tower, calling
down:

"One man of the watch---on deck!"

Seaman Mallock was on deck in a hurry, saluting Midshipman Farley.

"Mallock, report to Lieutenant Benson, or the next ranking officer
who may be visible below.  Report with my compliments that the
speed of the craft has slackened, and inquire whether that was
intentional."

"Aye, aye, sir."

Mallock was soon back, saluting.

"Engine tender reports, sir, that he slowed down the speed in
obedience to the indicator."

"But I-----" Farley began.  Then he checked himself abruptly,
noting out of the corner of his eye that Dan Dalzell had wandered
over to the rail and stood looking off to seaward.  If Dan were
responsible for the slowing down of the speed, and admitted it
under questioning, then Farley, under the regulations, would be
obliged to report Dalzell, and that young man already had some
demerits against his name.

"Oh, very good, then, Mallock," was Midshipman Farley's rather
quick reply.  "Who is the ranking officer visible below at present?"

"Ensign Somers, sir."

"Very good.  My compliments to Mr. Somers, and ask at what speed
he wishes to run."

Seaman Mallock soon returned, saluting.

"Ensign Somers' compliments sir, and the ensign replies that Mr.
Farley is in command of the deck."

"Very good, then," nodded Midshipman Farley, and set the indicator
at the twenty mark.

Ten minutes later Lieutenant Benson reappeared on deck.  First
of all he noted the "Dodger's" position.  Then, as Ensign Eph
and Mallock appeared, Benson announced:

"Gentlemen, you will come down to Supper now.  Mr. Somers, you
will take command of the deck."

"Very good, sir," Eph responded.  "Mallock, take the wheel."

Lieutenant Benson seated himself at the head of the table, with
Ensign Hastings on his right.  The midshipmen filled the remaining
seats.

"We're necessarily a little crowded on a craft of this size,"
explained Benson.  "Also the service is not what it would be on
a battleship.  We can carry but few men, so the cook must also
act as waiter."

At once a very good meal was set on the table, and all hands were
busily eating when Eph Somers came down the stairs, saluted and
reported:

"Sir, we are on the bottom of Chesapeake Bay, with our nose in
the mud!"




CHAPTER IX

THE TREACHERY OF MORTON


To the midshipmen that was rather startling news to receive while
in the act of enjoying a very excellent meal.

Lieutenant Jack Benson, however, appeared to take the news very
coolly.

"May I ask," he inquired, "whether any of you young gentlemen
noticed anything unusual in our motion during the last two or
three minutes?"

All six of the midshipmen glanced at him quickly, then at Darrin
the other five looked, as though appointing him their spokesman.

"No, sir; we didn't note anything," replied Dave.  "We were too
busy with our food and with listening to the talk."

"But now you notice something?"

"Yes, sir."

"What?"

"That the boat appears motionless, as though speed had been stopped."

"And that is the case," smiled Benson.  "Mr. Somers, soon after
the soup was placed on the table, came in from the deck with the
one man of his watch, closed the tower and signaled for changing
to the electric motors.  Then he filled the forward tanks and
those amidships, at last filling the tanks astern.  We came below
so gently that you very intent young men never noticed the change.
We are now on the bottom---in about how many feet of water, Mr.
Somers?"

"About forty, sir," replied Eph.

The six midshipmen stared at one another, then felt a somewhat
uncomfortable feeling creeping over them.

"Had it been daylight," smiled Benson, "you would have been warned
by the disappearance of natural light and the increased brilliancy
of the electric light here below.  However, your experience serves
to show you how easily up-to-date submarines may be handled."

"What do you think of the way the trick was done?" asked Hal Hastings,
looking up with a quiet smile.

"It was marvelous," replied Midshipman Farley promptly.

"I would like to ask a question, sir, if I may," put in Midshipman
Jetson.

"Go ahead, sir."

"Were submarines ever handled anywhere near as neatly before you
three gentlemen began your work with the Pollard Company?"

"We didn't handle them as easily, at all events," replied Jack
with a smile.  "It has required a lot of work and practice, night
and day.  Steward, a plate for Mr. Somers."

"This is the way we generally manage at meal times," smiled Ensign
Eph, as he took his place at table.  "There's no use in keeping
an officer and a man on deck, or a tender at the engines, unless
we're going somewhere, in a hurry.  So, in a case like this, where
the deck officer wants his meal, we just sink into the mud and
rest easy until the meal is over."

"Are you giving instruction, or merely seeking to amuse your guests,
Mr. Somers?" Lieutenant Jack Benson asked quietly.

"Oh, I forgot," explained Eph, with another smile; "these young
gentlemen are not yet acquainted with me.  When they are they'll
know that no one ever takes me too seriously."

"A bad habit for a superior officer, isn't it?" inquired Benson,
looking around at his student guests.  "But Mr. Somers may be
taken very seriously indeed---when he's on duty.  He is unreliable
at table only."

"Unreliable at table?" echoed Eph, helping himself to a slice
of roast meat.  "Why, it seems to me that this is the one place
where I can be depended upon to do all that is expected of me."

The others now sat back, out of courtesy, looking on and chatting
while Ensign Eph Somers ate his meal.  "There may be a few
questions---or many---that you would like to ask," suggested
Lieutenant Jack Benson.  "If so, gentlemen, go ahead with your
questions.  For that matter, during your stay aboard, ask all the
questions you can think of."

"Thank you, sir," replied Midshipman Dave Darrin, with a slight
bow.  "I have been thinking of one point on which I would be glad
of information."

"And that is-----"

"The full complement of this craft appears to consist of three
officers and four enlisted men---that is, of course, outside of
your combined cook and steward."

"Yes," nodded Benson.

"One of the officers is commanding officer; another is deck officer
and the third engineer officer."

"Yes."

"Then, on a cruise," pursued Dave, "how can you divide watches
and thus keep going night and day?"

"Why, originally," Jack replied, "we put on long cruises with
only three aboard---the three who are at present officers.  With
a boat like the 'Dodger,' which carries so few men, the commanding
officer cannot stand on his dignity and refuse to stand watch.
I frequently take my trick at the wheel.  That gives Mr. Somers
his chance to go below and sleep."

"Yet Mr. Hastings is your only engineer officer."

"True, but two of our enlisted men are trained as engine-tenders.
Our engines are rather simple, in the main, and an enlisted
engine-tender can run our engine room for hours at a stretch under
ordinary conditions.  Of course, if anything out of the usual should
happen while Mr. Hastings were taking his trick in his berth, he
would have to be wakened.  But we can often make as long a trip as
from New York to Havana without needing to call Mr. Hastings once
from his berth during his hours of rest."

"Then you have two enlisted men aboard who thoroughly understand
your engines?" pressed Dave Darrin.

"Ordinarily," replied Hal Hastings, here breaking in.  "But one
of our engine-tenders reached the end of his enlisted period to-day,
and, as he wouldn't re-enlist, we had to let him go.  So the new
enlisted man whom we took aboard is just starting in to learn
his duties."

"Small loss in Morton," laughed Lieutenant Jack Benson.  "He was
enough of a natural genius around machinery, but he was a man
of sulky and often violent temper.  Really, I am glad that Morton
took his discharge to-day.  I never felt wholly safe while we
had him aboard."

"He was a bad one," Ensign Hal Hastings nodded.  "Morton might
have done something to sink us, only that he couldn't do so without
throwing away his own life."

"I don't know, sir, what I'd do, if I were a commanding officer
and found that I had such a man in the crew," replied Midshipman
Darrin.

"Why, in a man's first enlistment," replied Lieutenant Jack, "the
commanding officer is empowered to give him a summary dismissal
from the service.  Morton was in his second enlistment, or I surely
would have dropped him ahead of his time.  I'm glad he's gone."

Ensign Eph had now finished his meal and was sitting back in his
chair.  Lieutenant Jack therefore gave the rising sign.

"I want to show the midshipmen everything possible on this trip,"
said the very young commanding officer.  "So we won't lie here
in the mud any more.  Mr. Somers, you will return to the tower
steering wheel, and you,  Mr. Hastings, will take direct charge
of the engines.  I will gather the midshipmen around me here in
the cabin, and show the young gentlemen how easily we control the
rising of a submarine from the bottom."

Hal and Eph hurried to their stations.  The midshipmen followed
Jack Benson over to what looked very much like a switchboard.
The young lieutenant held a wrench in his right hand.

"I will now turn on the compressed air device," announced Lieutenant
Jack.  "First of all I will empty the bow chambers of water by
means of the compressed air; then the middle chambers, and, lastly,
the stern chambers.  On a smaller craft than this we would operate
directly with the wrench.  On a boat of the 'Dodger's' type we
must employ the wrench first, but the work must be backed up with
the performance of a small electric motor."

Captain Jack rapidly indicated the points at which the wrench
was to be operated, adding:

"I want you to note these points as I explain them, for after
I start with the wrench I shall have to work rapidly along from
bow to stern tanks.  Otherwise we would shoot up perpendicularly,
instead of going up on a nearly even keel.  Mr. Hastings, are
you all ready at your post?"

"Aye, aye, sir," came back the engineer officer's reply.

"On post, Mr. Somers?"

"Aye, aye, sir."

Lieutenant Jack applied the wrench, calling snappily:

"Watch me.  I've no time to explain anything now."

With that he applied one of the wrenches and gave it a turn.
Instantly one of the electric motors in the engine-room began
to vibrate.

Almost imperceptibly the bow of the "Dodger" began to rise.  Lieutenant
Jack, intent on preserving an even keel as nearly as possible,
passed on to the middle station with his wrench.

Just as he applied the tool the electric motor ceased running.

"What's the matter, Mr. Hastings?" Jack inquired quietly.  "Something
blow out of the motor?"

The submarine remained slightly tilted up at the bow.

"I don't know, sir, as yet, what has happened," Hal Hastings answered
back.  "I'm going over the motor now."

In a moment more he stepped into the cabin, a much more serious
look than usual on his fine face.

"This, looks like the man Morton's work," Hal announced holding
a small piece of copper up before the eyes of the midshipmen.
"Gentlemen, do you notice that the under side of this plate has
been filed considerably?"

"Yes, sir," nodded Dan Dalzell, a queer look crossing his face.
"Won't the motor operate without that plate being sound?"

"It will not."

The other midshipmen began to look and to feel strange.

"Then are we moored for good at the bottom of the bay?" asked
Jetson.

"No; for we carry plenty of duplicate parts for this plate," replied
Ensign Hal.  "Come into the engine room and I will show you how
I fit the duplicate part on."

Hal led the midshipmen, halting before a small work bench.  He
threw open a drawer under the bench.

"Every duplicate plate has been removed from this drawer," announced
Hastings quietly.  "Then, indeed, we are stuck in the mud, with
no chance of rising.  Gentlemen, I trust that the Navy will send
divers here to rescue us before our fresh air gives out!"




CHAPTER X

"WE BELONG TO THE NAVY, TOO!"


"You mean, sir," asked Midshipman Jetson, his voice hoarse in
spite of his efforts to remain calm, "that we are doomed to remain
here at the bottom of the bay unless divers reach us in time?"

"Yes," nodded Hal Hastings, his voice as quiet and even as ever.
"Unless we can find a duplicate plate---and that appears
impossible---the 'Dodger' is wholly unable to help herself."

"If the outlook is as black as it appears, gentlemen," spoke Jack
Benson from behind their backs, "I'm extremely sorry that such
a disaster should have happened when we had six such promising
young Naval officers aboard."

"Oh, hang us and our loss!" exploded Dave Darrin forgetting that
he was addressing an officer.  "I guess the country won't miss
us so very much.  But it surely will be a blow to the United States
if the Navy's three best submarine experts have to be lost to
the country to satisfy a discharged enlisted man's spite."

Eph Somers had come down from the tower.  He, too, looked extremely
grave, though he showed no demoralizing signs of fear.

As for the six midshipmen, they were brave.  Not a doubt but that
every one of them showed all necessary grit in the face of this
fearful disaster.  Yet they could not conceal the pallor in their
faces, nor could they hide the fact that their voices shook a
little when they spoke.

"Make a thorough search, Mr. Hastings," directed Lieutenant Jack
Benson, in a tone as even as though he were discussing the weather.
"It's barely possible that the duplicate plates have been only
mislaid---that they're in another drawer."

Hal Hastings turned with one of his quiet smiles.  He knew that
the system in his beloved engine room was so exact that nothing
there was ever misplaced.

"I'm looking, sir," Hastings answered, as he opened other drawers
in turn, and explored them.  "But I'm not at all hopeful of finding
the duplicate plates.  This damaged one had been filed thinner,
which shows that it was done by design.  The man who would do
that trick purposely wouldn't leave any duplicate plates behind."

The four enlisted men and the cook had gathered behind their officers.

"Morton---the hound!  This is his trick!" growled Seaman Kellogg
hoarsely.  "Many a time I've heard him brag that he'd get even
for the punishments that were put upon him.  And now he has gone
and done it---the worse than cur!"

"No; there are no duplicate parts here," announced Ensign Hastings
at last.

"See if you can't fit on the old, worn one," proposed Lieutenant
Jack.

"No such luck!" murmured Hal Hastings.  "Morton was too good a
mechanic not to know bow to do his trick!  He hasn't left us a
single chance for our lives!"

None the less Hal patiently tried to fit the plate back and make
the motor work, Lieutenant Jack, in the meantime, standing by
the board with the wrench in hand.  In the next ten minutes several
efforts were made to start the motor, but all of them failed.

"And all for want of a bit of copper of a certain size, shape
and thickness," sighed Midshipman Dan Dalzell.

"It does seem silly, doesn't it," replied Lieutenant Jack with a
wan smile.

"At least," murmured Midshipman Wolgast, "we shall have a chance
to show that we know how to die like men of the Navy."

"Never say die," warned Ensign Eph Somers seriously, "until you
know you're really dead!"

This caused a laugh, and it eased them all.

"Well," muttered Jetson, "as I know that I can't be of any use
here I'm going back into the cabin and sit down.  I can at least
keep quiet and make no fuss about it."

One after another the other midshipmen silently followed Jetson's
example.  They sat three on either side of the cabin, once in
a while looking silently into the face of the others.

Not until many minutes more had passed did the three officers of the
"Dodger" cease their efforts to find a duplicate plate for the motor.

Kellogg and another of the seamen, though they met their chance of
death with grit enough, broke loose into mutterings that must have
made the ears of ex-seaman Morton burn, wherever that worthy was.

"I wish I had that scoundrel here, under my heel," raged Seaman
Kellogg.

"It will be wiser and braver, my man," broke in Lieutenant Jack
quietly, "not to waste any needless thought on matters of violence.
It will be better for us all if every man here goes to his death
quietly and with a heart and head free from malice."

"You're right, sir," admitted Kellogg.  "And I wish to say, sir,
that I never served under braver officers."

"There won't be divers sent after us---at least, within the time
that we're going to be alive," spoke Midshipman Farley soberly.
"In the first place, Chesapeake Bay is a big place, and no Naval
officer would know where to locate us."

"Mr. Benson," broke in Jetson suddenly, "I heard once that you
submarine experts had invented a way of leaving a submarine boat
by means of the torpedo tube.  Why can't you do that now?"

"We could," smiled Lieutenant Jack Benson, "if our compressed
air apparatus were working.  We can't do the trick without compressed
air.  If we had any of that which we could use, we wouldn't need
to leave the boat and swim to the top.  We could take the boat to
the surface instead."

"Then it's impossible, sir, to leave the boat?" questioned Jetson,
his color again fading.

"Yes; if we opened the outer end of the torpedo tube, without
being able to throw compressed air in there first, then the water
would rush in and drown us."

"I'm filled with wonder," Dan Dalzell muttered to himself.  "Staring
certain death in the face, I can't understand how it happens that
I'm not going around blubbering and making a frantic jackanapes
of myself.  There's not a chance of living more than an hour or
two longer, and yet I'm calm.  I wonder how it happens?  It isn't
because I don't know what is coming to me.  I wonder if the other
fellows feel just as I do?"

Dan glanced curiously around him at the other midshipmen faces.

"Do you know," said Darrin quietly, "I've often wondered how other
men have felt in just such a fix as we're in now."

"Well, how do you feel, Darry?" Farley invited.

"I'm blessed if I really know.  Probably in an instant when I fail
briefly to realize all that this means my feeling is that I wouldn't
have missed such an experience for anything."

"You could have all my share of it, if I could make an effective
transfer," laughed Wolgast.

"If we ever do get out of this alive," mused Page aloud, "I don't
doubt we'll look back to this hour with a great throb of interest
and feel glad that we've had one throb that most men don't get in
a lifetime."

"But we won't get out," advanced Jetson.  "We're up hard against
it.  It's all over but the slow strangling to death as the air
becomes more rare."

"I wonder if it will be a strangling and choking," spoke Darrin
again in a strange voice; "or whether it will be more like an
asphyxiation?  In the latter case we may drop over, one at a time,
without pain, and all of us be finished within two or three minutes
from the time the first one starts."

"Pleasant!" uttered Wolgast grimly.  "Let's start something---a
jolly song, for instance."

"Want to die more quickly?" asked Dalzell.  "Singing eats up the
air faster."

Lieutenant Jack Benson came out of the engine room for a moment.
He took down the wrench and went back to the engine room.  But
first he paused, for a brief instant, shooting at the midshipmen
a look that was full of pity for them.  For himself, Jack Benson
appeared to have no especial feeling.  Then the young commanding
officer went back into the engine room, closing the door after him.

"What did he shut the door for?" asked Jetson.

"Probably they're going to do something, in there, that will call
for a good deal of physical exertion."

"Well, what of that?" demanded Jetson, not seeing the point.

"Why," Dave explained, "a man at laborious physical work uses up
more air than a man who is keeping quiet.  If the three officers
are going to work hard in there then they've closed the door in
order not to deprive us of air."

"We called them kids, at first," spoke Dan

Dalzell ruefully, "but they're a mighty fine lot of real men, those
three acting Naval officers."

Dave Darrin rose and walked over to the engine room, opening the
door and looking in.  Hal and Eph were hard at work over the motor,
while Lieutenant Jack Benson, with his hand in his pockets, stood
watching their efforts.

"I beg your pardon, sir," said Darrin, saluting, "but did you close
this door in order to leave more air to us?"

"Yes," answered Jack Benson.  "Go back and sit down."

"I hope you won't think us mutinous, sir," Darrin returned steadily,
"but we don't want any more than our share of whatever air is left
on board this craft.  We belong to the Navy, too."

From the after end of the cabin came an approving grunt.  It was
here that the cook and the four seamen had gathered.

With the door open the midshipmen could see what was going on
forward, and they watched with intense fascination.

Eph Somers had taken 'the too-thin copper' plate to the work-bench,
and had worked hard over it, trying to devise some way of making
it fit so that it would perform its function in the motor.  Now,
he and Hal Hastings struggled and contrived with it.  Every time
that the pair of submarine boys thought they had the motor possibly
ready to run Hal tried to start the motor.  Yet he just as often
failed to get a single movement from the mechanism.

"I reckon you might about as well give it up," remarked Lieutenant
Jack Benson coolly.

"What's the use of giving up," Eph demanded, "as long as there's
any life left in us?"

"I mean," the young lieutenant explained, "that you'd better give
up this particular attempt and make a try at something else."

"All right, if you see anything else that we can do," proposed
Eph dryly.  "Say, here's a quarter to pay for your idea."

Seemingly as full of mischief as ever, Eph Somers pressed a silver
coin into Jack Benson's hand.

But Jack, plainly impatient with such trifling, frowned slightly
as he turned and pitched the quarter forward.

"This isn't a twenty-five-cent proposition," Benson remarked.
"In fact, all the money on earth won't save us this time!"




CHAPTER XI

A QUARTER'S WORTH OF HOPE


"Until some one can think of something else, I'm going to keep
on trying the hopeless thing and endeavoring to make this old,
thin plate work," declared Hal Hastings, who was still bent over
the motor, studying it intently.

Benson had turned back to examine the work, after tossing the
coin away, but just as suddenly he glanced forward again.

At the extreme forward end of the engine room of the "Dodger"
was another bench.  Here were a vise and other heavier tools.
On the floor under this bench were stowed many mechanical odds
and ends---pieces of wood, coils of rope, even a bundle of tent-pegs,
though nothing was visible of a metallic nature.

"You fellows keep at work," Jack Benson shot back suddenly over
his shoulder.

"Where you going?" demanded Eph.

"Forward."

That much was evident, but Jack was now down on hands and knees
carefully yet feverishly moving the wooden articles, cordage and
such things from under the forward bench.

"What are you doing?" called Eph.  "Go ahead with your work---there's
no time to be lost," replied Lieutenant Jack.

"Hold this a moment, Eph," Hal Hastings requested, and Somers's
attention was forced back to the motor.

Sc-cratch!  Flare!  Jack Benson was using matches under that work
bench, now that be had made some clear space there.

"I wonder if Jack has gone clean daffy?" half chuckled Somers under
his breath.

"What are you talking about?" Hastings demanded.

"Jack's lighting matches up forward, under the other bench."

"What if he is?"

"Maybe he thinks he can explode some gasoline and blow us to the
surface."

"Quit your nonsense," returned Hal almost angrily, "and help me
with this job."

"I'm waiting to see if Jack is going to let out a maniac yell,"
grimaced Eph Somers.

"Quit your-----"

"Wow!  Whoop!" uttered young Benson excitedly.  "Never tell me
again that it's unlucky to throw money away!  Whoop!"

"What did I tell you?" demanded Eph.  "If Jack's making a noise
like that," retorted Hastings, as be straightened up and wheeled
about, "he's got a mighty good reason for it."

"Of course.  Every lunatic has loads of good reasons for anything
he does," muttered Eph.

"Look here, fellows!" ordered Jack Benson, almost staggering as
he approached them.

"Great Dewey!  Am I going crazy, too?" muttered Eph, staring hard.
"What I think I see in Jack's hands are some of the missing copper
plates."

"It's exactly what you do see," announced Jack Benson, his face
beaming.

"But how---"

"How they came to be there I don't know," Benson replied.  "But
when I threw away your quarter, Eph, it rolled under the bench.
There wasn't supposed to be anything metallic under the bench,
but I felt almost, sure that I had heard the silver strike against
something metallic.  Even then it seemed like a crazy notion to
me.  I didn't really expect to find anything, but some uncontrollable
impulse urged me to go hustling under the bench.  And so I found
these duplicate plates, wedged in behind a lot of junk and right
up against the partition."

Hal Hastings, in the meantime, had taken one of the plates from
Lieutenant Jack's hand, and was now quietly fitting it where it
belonged on the motor.

The six midshipmen, as soon as they realized what had happened,
had sprung eagerly to the door of the engine room and stood peering
in.  Behind them were the cook and crew of the "Dodger."

Presently Hal straightened up.

"Sir," he said gravely, "I have hopes that if you test the compressed
air apparatus you will find that this motor will do its share."

Midshipmen and crew drew back as Jack and Eph came out of the
engine room.  Lieutenant Jack had his wrench in hand, and went back
to his former post.

"Young gentlemen," the commanding officer announced coolly, "we
will take up, at the point where we were interrupted, the work
of expelling the water from the compartments Are you ready, Mr.
Hastings?"

"Right by my post, sir," came from Hal.

The six midshipmen gathered about Benson with a stronger sense
of fascination than ever.  Eph stepped past them to the stairs
leading---to the little conning tower.

With steady hand Jack Benson turned the wrench.  The motor began
to "mote" and there was a sense of being lifted.

"Going up!" sang Ensign Eph, with a grin.

Nor could Dan Dalzell help imitating the grin and calling out
jovially:

"Let me out at the top floor, please!"

Having set the compressed air at work on the forward tanks, Jack
Benson quickly shifted the wrench, and without a word, getting
at work on the midship's compartments.  Then the stern tanks were
emptied.

"May I come up, sir?" called Dan, his voice trembling with joy,
at the foot of the stairs.

"Very good," Eph sang back.  "Room for only one, though,"

So Dan Dalzell hastily mounted the iron stairs until he found
himself side by side with Eph Somers.

For a few seconds all was inky darkness on the other side of the
thick plate glass of the conning tower.  Then, all in a flash,
Dalzell caught sight of the twinkling stars as the dripping conning
tower rose above the top of the water.

"I have the honor to report that all's well again, and that we're
on earth once more," Dan announced, as he came down the steps
into the little cabin.

"Attention, gentlemen," called Lieutenant Jack Benson, as soon
as the "Dodger" was once more under way, her sea-going gasoline
engines now performing the work lately entrusted to the electric
motors.

At the word "attention" the six midshipmen became rigidly erect,
their hands dropping at their sides.

"Gentlemen," continued Benson, "I realize that the late strain
has been a severe one on us all.  We of the 'Dodger' have been
through the same sort of thing before.  You midshipmen have not.
If you feel, therefore, that you would prefer to have me head
about and return to the Naval Academy I give you my word that
I shall not think you weak-kneed for making the request."

"Thank you, sir," replied Dave Darrin, "but we belong to the United
States Navy and we have no business to suffer with nerves.  If our
wish alone is to be consulted, we prefer to finish the cruise as we
would any other tour of duty."

Dave's five comrades in the Brigade of Midshipmen loved him for
that answer!




CHAPTER XII

READY TO TRIM WEST POINT


"Have had an experience, sir, that we shall never forget, and one
that we wouldn't have missed!"

Thus spoke Dave Darrin the, following afternoon, as he saluted
the young officers of the "Dodger" before going over the side
as the boat lay alongside the wall of the basin.

To which the other midshipmen agreed.

"We have enjoyed having you aboard," replied Lieutenant Jack Benson.
"None of us will ever forget this cruise."

Then the six midshipmen strode briskly along the walks until they
reached Bancroft Hall.

It wasn't long ere news of the adventure of the night before got
whispered along the decks.  Then Dave and Dan, Farley and Page,
Jetson and Wolgast all had so much midshipman company that it
was a relief when the evening study hours came around.

All six of the midshipmen had to tell the story of their submarine
experience until all of them fairly hated to talk about the matter.
Seaman Morton was never heard from again, and so did not come
in for his share of the excitement. However, it was not destined
to last long, for the football season was at its height and every
blue-clad middy thought, talked and dreamed about the Navy team.

A good team it was, too, and a good year for the Navy.  The young
men of the Naval Academy played one of their most brilliant seasons
of football.

Dave, by a bigger effort than any one understood, forced back
his interest in the gridiron until he played a brilliant game.

The Navy won more victories than it had done before in any one
of fifteen seasons of football.

Yet report said that the Army, too, was playing a superb game,
considering that it had been deprived of its two best players,
Prescott and Holmes.

Up to the last Dave continued to hope that Cadet Dick Prescott
might be restored to the Army eleven.  Dick's letters from West
Point, however, appeared to indicate clearly that he was not to
play.  Therefore Greg Holmes wouldn't play.

At last came the fateful day, the Saturday after Thanksgiving.
Early the Brigade of Midshipmen was marched over to the trolley
line, where a long string of cars waited to receive them.

"We want an extra car to-night," one first classman called jovially
to the car inspector who was in charge of the transportation.
"We want that extra car to bring back the Army scalp in."

All the way to Baltimore and thence to Philadelphia, Dave Darrin
was unusually quiet.  Dalzell, on the other hand, made noise enough
for both of them.

"Darry hasn't the sulks over anything, has be?" Wolgast anxiously
asked Dalzell.

"Don't you believe it," Dan retorted.

"But he's so abominably quiet."

"Saving all his breath to use on the field."

"Are you sure Darry is in form?" persisted Wolgast.

"Yes.  Wait and see."

"I'll have to," sighed Wolgast, with another sidelong glance at
Darrin's emotionless face.

The Navy team and subs. arrived at dressing quarters nearly an
hour before it would be necessary to tog.

As the West Point men were on hand, also, Dave stepped outside.
Almost the first man he met was a tall, slim, soldierly looking
fellow in the cadet gray.

"Aren't you Fields?" asked Dave, holding out his hand.

"Yes," replied the cadet, giving his own hand.

"And you're Darrin---one of the few men we're afraid of."

"Does Prescott play to-day?" Dave asked eagerly.

The West Pointer's brow clouded.

"No," he replied.  "Mr. Prescott isn't a subject for conversation
at the Military Academy.  Mr. Prescott is in Coventry."

"Sad mistake," muttered Darrin.

"Eh?"

"A sad mistake.  You men have made a bad bungle; I know it."

"It is a matter of internal discipline in the corps," replied
the West Point cadet, speaking much more coldly.

"Yes, I know it," Dave replied quickly, "and I beg your pardon
for having seemed to criticise the action of the Corps of Cadets.
However, anything that unpleasantly affects Dick Prescott is
a sore subject with me.  Prescott is one of the best friends I
have in the world."

"Why, I've heard something about that," replied Fields in a less
constrained tone.  "You and Mr. Prescott are old school cronies."

"Of the closest kind," Dave nodded.  "That's why I feel certain
that Dick Prescott never did, and never could do, anything dishonorable.
You'll surely find it out before long, and then the Corps will make
full amends."

"I fear not," replied Cadet Fields.  "Mr. Prescott had every
opportunity given him to clear himself, and failed to do so to
the satisfaction of the Corps.  Therefore he'll never graduate
from the Military Academy.  It wouldn't do him any good to try.
He'd only be ostracized in the Army if he had the cheek to stay
in the Corps."

"Let's not talk about that part of it any more," begged Dave.
"But you'll miss Prescott from your fighting line to-day."

"That's very likely," assented the West Point man.  "I'm glad we
haven't Mr. Prescott here, but we'd be heartily glad if we had
some one else as good on the football field."

"And you haven't Holmes, either?" sighed Dave.

"That isn't any one's fault but Holmesy's," frowned Cadet Fields.
"We wanted Holmesy to play, and we gave him every chance, but-----"

"But he wouldn't," finished Dave.  "No more would I play on the
Navy team if the fellows had done anything unjust to Dalzell."

"Do you feel that you're going to have an easy walk-over with us
to-day?" demanded Cadet Fields cheerily.

"No; but we're prepared to fight.  We'll get the game if it's
in any way possible," Darrin assured his questioner.

"Are the bonfires back in Annapolis all ready to be lighted to-night?"
inquired Fields smilingly.

"They must be."

"What a lot of unnecessary labor," laughed the West Point man.

"Why?" challenged Dave.

"Because the Army is going to win again." That "again" caused Dave
Darrin to wince.  "We win almost every time, you know," Fields
explained.

"Almost every time?" challenged Dan Dalzell, joining the pair.
"Are you sure of your statistics?"

"Oh, I have the statistics, of course," Fields answered.  "That's
why I speak so confidently."

At this point three more West Point men approached.

"Hey, fellows," called Fields good-humoredly.  "Do you know of
an impression that I find to prevail among the middies to-day?"

"What is that?" inquired one of the gray-clad cadets, as the newcomers
joined the group.

"Why, the middies seem to think that they're going to take the
Army's scalp to-day."

"Is that really your idea of the matter?" asked one of the gray-clad
cadets.

"So Mr. Fields has said," Dave answered.

"But what do you say?"

"About the most that I feel like saying," Darrin answered as quietly
as ever, "is that the Navy prefers to do its bragging afterwards."

"An excellent practice," nodded one of the cadets.  "You've acquired
the habit through experience, I presume.  It has saved your having
to swallow a lot of your words on many occasions."

All laughed good-naturedly.  Though there was the most intense
rivalry between the two government military schools, yet all were
gentlemen, and the fun-making could not be permitted to go beyond
the limits of ordinary teasing.

"What's your line-up?" broke in Dan Dalzell.

"Haven't you fellows gotten hold of the cards yet?" asked one
of the West Point men. "Then take a look over mine."

Standing together Dave and Dan eagerly glanced down the printed
line-up of the Military Academy.

"I know a few of these names," ventured Darrin, "and they're the
names of good men.  Several of the other names I don't know at
all.  And you've left out the names of the two Army men that we're
most afraid of in a game of football."

"It seems queer to think of an Army line-up without Prescott and
Holmes," Dan declared musingly.

Over the faces of the cadets there crept a queer look, but none
of them spoke.

"So you've boycotted Prescott and Holmes?" pursued Dalzell.

"Yes," replied one of the cadets.  "Or, rather, Prescott is in
Coventry, and Holmes prefers to stand by his friend in everything.
Holmes, being Prescott's roommate, doesn't have to keep away from
Mr. Prescott."

"Humph!" laughed Dan.  "I think I can see Greg Holmes turning his
back upon Dick Prescott.  Why, Greg wouldn't do that even if he
had to get out of the Army in consequence."

"We did the only thing we could with the Prescott fellow," spoke
up another cadet.

Dave Darrin's dark eyes flashed somewhat.

"Gentlemen," he begged quietly, "will you do me the very great
favor not to refer to Prescott slightingly as a 'fellow.' He's
one of the noblest youngsters I've ever known, and I'm his friend
through thick and thin.  Of course, I don't expect you to know
it yet, but I feel positive that you've made a tremendous mistake
in sending to Coventry one of nature's noblemen."

"Hm!" muttered some of the cadets, and slight frowns were visible.

"And when you lose the game to-day," continued Dan Dalzell, "it
may be a comfort to you to know that you might possibly have won
it if you had had Prescott and Holmes in your battle front."

"Prescott isn't the only football player in the Army," returned
Cadet Fields.  "Nor are he and Holmes the only pair of 'em."

"You'll lose without that pair, though," ventured Dave.  "And
it must shake the confidence of your men, too, for you've come
here without your two best men."

"Of course, we have to manage our own affairs," interposed one
of the cadets.

"Gentlemen," spoke up Dave quickly, "of course, you have to manage
your own problems, and no one else is fitted to do so.  If I've
gone too far in what might have seemed like criticism, then I
beg you to forget it.  I don't want to be suspected of any disagreeable
intent.  If I spoke almost bitterly it was because Prescott is
my very dear friend.  I have another, and a real grievance---I
wanted to test myself out today against Dick Prescott, as any
two friends may contest to vanquish one another on the field of
sports."

"No one had any thought, I am sure, Mr. Darrin, of accusing you
of wishing to be disagreeable," spoke up Cadet Fields.  "We believe
you to be a prince of good and true fellows; in fact, we accept
you at the full estimate of the Brigade of Midshipmen.  Wade in
and beat us to-day, if you can---but you can't Prescott or no
Prescott."

"Better run inside and tog!" called Wolgast from a distance.

"You'll excuse us now, won't you?" asked Dave.  "Come along, Danny
boy."

As the two midshipmen lifted their caps and hastened away, Fields
gazed after them speculatively:

"There goes the Navy's strength in to-day's game," he announced.

"I wonder if we have done Prescott any wrong?" said another cadet
slowly.

"That question has been settled by formal class action," replied
another.  "It's a closed matter."

Then these West Point men strolled over to quarters to get into
togs.  As they were to play subs. they did not need to be as
early at togging as the members of the team.

Out on Franklin Field thousands and thousands of Americans, from
the President of the United States down, waited impatiently for
the excitement of the day to begin.

On either side of the field some hundreds of seats were still
left vacant.  The music of a band now floated out, proclaiming
that one set of seats was soon to be filled.  Then in, through
a gate, marched the Military Academy band at the head of the Corps
of Cadets.  Frantic cheers broke loose on the air, and there was
a great fluttering of the black and gray banners carried by the
Army's boosters in the audience.  Gray and steel-like the superb
corps marched in across the field, and over to the seats assigned
to them.

Barely had the Army band ceased playing when another struck up in
the distance.  It was now the turn of the fine Naval Academy band
to play the Brigade of Midshipmen on to the field.  Again the air
vibrated with the intensity of the loyal cheers that greeted the
middies.

Over in quarters, after the middies of the team had togged, a
few anxious minutes of waiting followed.  What was to be the fate
of the day?

"Darry," spoke Wolgast in a voice full of feeling, "you're not
woozy to-day, are you?"

"I don't believe I am," smiled Dave.

"Well, you know, old chap, you've been unaccountably stale---or
something---at times this season.  You haven't been the real
Darry---always.  You're feeling in really bully form today?"

"I'm pretty sure that I'm in good winning form," Dave replied.
"Will that be enough?"

Wolgast looked him over, then rejoined:

"Somehow, I think you're in pretty good form.  I'll feel better,
very likely, after we've played for ten minutes.  Darry, old fellow,
just don't forget how much the Navy depends upon you."

"Are you all right, Davy?" Dan Dalzell demanded in a more than
anxious undertone.

"I certainly am, Danny boy."

"But, you know-----"

"Yes; I know that, for a while, I showed signs of going fuzzy.
But I'm over that."

"Good!" chuckled Dan, as he caught the resolute flash in Darrin's
eyes.  "I was fearfully afraid that you'd go bad simply because
you didn't have Prescott to go up against.  For a good many days
that very fact seemed to prey upon your mind and make you indifferent."

"Danny boy, I am going to play my mightiest, just because Prescott
isn't with the Army!"

"What do you mean by that?"

"I mean that I'm going to make the West Point fellows most abominably
sorry that they didn't have Dick Prescott on their eleven.  And
you want to stand with me in that, Danny boy.  Keep hammering
the Army to-day, and with every blow just think it's another blow
struck for Dick Prescott and Greg Holmes.  Oh, we'll trim West
Point in their joint name!"




CHAPTER XIII

WHEN "BRACE UP, ARMY!" WAS THE WORD


"All out for practice!" called Wolgast.

Team men and subs. bunched, the Navy players trotted on to the
field, amid a tempest of wild cheering.

No sooner had Dave Darrin halted for an instant, when he broke
into a whirlwind of sprinting speed.  Dan Dalzell tried to keep
up with him, but found it impossible.

"Good old Darry!" yelled a hoarse voice from one of the grandstands.
"That's the way you'll go around the end to-day!"

Some of the other Navy players were kicking a ball back and forth.
The Army team was not yet on the field, but it came, a few moments
later, and received a tremendous ovation from its own solid ranks
of rooters.

This time Darrin barely glanced at any of the Army players.  He
knew that Prescott and Holmes were not there.  Whoever else might
be, he was not interested.

Only a very few minutes were allowed for practice.  During this
exercise the Army and Navy bands played alternately.

Then the referee signaled the bands to stop.

Tril-l-l-l! sounded the whistle, and Army and Navy captains trotted
to the center of the field to watch the toss of the coin.  Wolgast
won, and awarded the kick-off to the Army.

Then the teams jogged quickly to places, and in an instant all
was in readiness.

Over the spectators' seats a hush had fallen.  Even the Army and
Navy cheer leaders looked nearly as solemn as owls.  The musicians
of the two bands lounged in their seats and instruments had been
laid aside.  There would be no more noise until one team or the
other had started to do real things.

Quick and sharp came the signal.  West Point kicked and the ball
was in play.

Navy's quarterback, after a short run, placed himself to seize
the arching pigskin out of the air.  Then he ran forward, protected
by the Navy interference.

By a quick pass the ball came into Dave Darrin's hands.  Dalzell
braced himself as he hit the strong Army line.

It was like butting a stone wall, but Darrin got through, with
the aid of effective interference.

Army men bunched and tackled, but Dave struggled on.  He did not
seem to be exerting much strength, but his elusiveness was wonderful,

Then, after a few yards had been gained, Dave was borne to the
earth, the bottom of a struggling mass until, the referee's whistle
ended the scrimmage.

Annapolis players could not help shooting keen glances of satisfaction
at each other.  The test had been a brief one, but now they saw
that Darrin was in form, and that he could be depended upon to-day,
unless severe accident came to cripple him.

Again the ball was put in play, this time going over to Farley and
Page on the right end.

Only a yard did Farley succeed in advancing the ball, but that
was at least a gain.

Then again came the pigskin to the left flank, and Dave fought
it through the enemy's battle line for a distance of eight feet
ere he was forced to earth with it.

By this time the West Point captain was beginning to wonder what
ailed his men.  The cadet players themselves were worried.  If
the Navy could play like this through the game, it looked as though
Annapolis might wipe out, in one grand and big-scored victory,
the memory of many past defeats.

"Brace up, Army!" was the word passed through West Point's eleven.

"Good old Darry!" chuckled Wolgast, and, though he did not like
to work Darrin too hard at the outset, yet it was also worth while
to shake the Army nerve as much as possible.  So Wolgast signaled
quarterback to send the ball once more by Midshipman Dave.

Another seven yards was gained by Darrin.  The West Point men
were gasping, more from chagrin than from actual physical strain.
Was it going to prove impossible to stop these mad Navy rushes?

Then Wolgast reluctantly as he saw Dave limp slightly, decided
upon working Page and Farley a little harder just at present.
So back the ball traveled to the right flank was making, however,
the Navy cheermaster started a triumphant yell going, in which
nearly eight hundred midshipmen joined with all their lung power.

Of course, the Army cheermaster came back with a stirring West
Point yell, but one spectator, behind the side lines, turned and
bawled at the Army cheermaster:

"That's right, young man!  Anything on earth to keep up your crowd's
courage!"

In the laugh that followed many a gray-clad cadet joined simply
because he could not help himself.

"If we don't break at some point it's all ours to-day," Wolgast
was informing the players nearest him.  "I've never seen Darry
so wildly capable as he is right now.  The demon of victory seems
to have seized him."

Dave's limp had vanished.  He was ready for work---aching for
it.  Wolgast worked his left flank once more, and the Army was
sorely pressed.

"Brace up, Army!" was the word passing again among the West Point
men.  Douglass, captain of the Army team, was scolding under his
breath.

But straight on Darrin and Dalzell worked the ball.  It was when
Wolgast decided to rest his left that Farley and Page came in
for more work.  These two midshipmen were excellent football men,
but the Army's left was well defended.  The Navy lost the ball
on downs.  But the Army boys were sweating, for the Navy was now
within nine yards of goal line.

The Army fought it back, gaining just half a yard too little in
three plays, so the ball came back to the blue and gold ranks of
the Navy.

"Brace, Army!" was the word that Cadet Douglass passed.  "And
look out, on the right, for Darrin and Dalzell!"

There was a feint of sending the ball to Farley, but Darrin had
it instead.  The entire Army line, however, was alert for this
very trick.  Playing in sheer desperation, the cadets stopped
the midshipmen when but a yard and a half had been gained.  With
the next play the gain was but half a yard.  The third play was
blocked, and once more the cadets received the pigskin.

Both Army and Navy cheermasters now refrained from inviting din.
Those of the spectators who boosted for the Army were now silent,
straining their vision and holding their breath.  It began to
look, this year, as though the Navy could do with the Army as
it pleased.

Wolgast lined his men up for a fierce onslaught Darrin and Dalzell,
panting, looked like a pair who would die in their tracks ere
allowing the ball to go by them.

In a moment more the Army signal was being called out crisply.  The
whistle sounded, and both elevens were in instant action.

But the cadets failed to get through.  The middies were driving
them back.  In sheer desperation the cadet with the ball turned
and dropped behind the Army goal line---a safety.




CHAPTER XIV

THE NAVY GOAT GRINS


All at once the Navy band chopped out a few swift measures of
triumphant melody.

The entire Brigade of Midshipmen cheered under its cheermaster.
Thousands of blue and gold Navy banners fluttered through the
stands.

That safety had counted two on the score for the Navy.

Given breathing time, the Army now brought the ball out toward
midfield, and once more the savage work began.  The Navy had gained
ten yards, when the time-keeper signaled the end of the first
period.

As the players trotted off the Navy was exultant, the Army depressed.
Captain Douglass was scowling.

"You fellows will have to brace!" he snapped.  "Are you going
to let the little middies run over us?"

"I shall have no bad feeling, suh, if you think it well to put
a fresh man in my place, suh," replied Cadet Anstey.

"Hang it, I don't want a man in your place!" retorted Douglass
angrily.  "I want you, and every other man, Anstey, to do each
better work than was done in that period.  Hang it, fellows, the
middies are making sport of us."

Among the Navy players there was not so much talk.  All were deeply
contented with events so far.

"I've no remarks to make, fellows," Captain Wolgast remarked.
"You are all playing real football."

"At any rate Darry and his grinning twin are," chuckled Jetson.
"My, but you can see the hair rise on the Army right flank when
Darry and Danny leap at them!"

In the second period, which started off amid wild yelling from
the onlookers, the Army fought hard and fiercely, holding back
the Navy somewhat.  During the period two of the cadets were so
badly hurt that the surgeons ordered them from the field.  Two
fresh subs. came into the eleven, and after that the Army seemed
endowed with a run of better luck.  The second period closed with
no change in the score, though at the time of the timekeeper's
interference the Navy had the ball within eleven yards of the
Army goal line.

"We've got the Navy stopped, now, I think," murmured Douglass
to his West Point men.  "All we've got to do now is to keep 'em
stopped."

"If they don't break our necks, or make us stop from heart failure,
suh," replied Cadet Anstey, with a grimace.

"We've got the Army tired enough.  We must go after them in the
third period," announced Captain Wolgast.

But this did not happen until the third time that the Navy got
the pigskin.  Then Darrin and Dalzell, warned, began to run the
ball down the field.  Here a new feint was tried.  When the Navy
started in motion every Army man was sure that Wolgast was going
to try to put through a center charge.  It was but a ruse, however.
Darrin had the pigskin, and Dalzell was boosting him through.
The entire Navy line charged with the purpose of one man.  There
came the impact, and then the Army line went down.  Darrin was
charging, Dalzell and Jetson running over all who got in the way.
The halfback on that side of the field was dodged.  Dalzell and
Jetson bore down on the victim at the same instant, and Dave,
running to the side like a flash, had the ball over the line.

Wolgast himself made the kick to follow, and the score was now
eight to nothing.

The applause that followed was enough to turn wiser heads.  When
play was resumed the Army was fighting mad.  It was now victory
or death for the soldier boys.  The West Point men were guilty
of no fouls.  They played squarely and like gentlemen, but they
cared nothing for snapping muscles and sinews.  Before the mad
work the Navy was borne back.  Just before the close of the third
period, the Navy was forced to make a safety on its own account.

"But Wolgast was satisfied, and the Navy coaches more than pleased.

"There's a fourth period coming," Wolgast told himself.  "But
for Darry and his splendid interference the Army would get our
scalp yet.  Darry looks to be all right, and I believe he is.
He'll hold out for the fourth."

Eight to two, and the game three quarters finished.  The Army
cheermaster did his duty, but did it half dejectedly, the cadets
following with rolling volumes of noise intended to mask sinking
hearts.  When it came the Navy's turn to yell, the midshipmen
risked the safety of their windpipes.  The Naval Academy Band
was playing with unwonted joy.

"Fellows, nothing on earth will save us but a touchdown and a
kick," called Douglass desperately, when he got his West Point
men aside.  "That will tie the score.  It's our best chance to-day."

"Unless, suh," gravely observed Anstey, "We can follow that by
driving the midshipmen into a safety."

"And we could do even that, if we had Prescott and Holmesy here,"
thought Douglass, with sinking heart to himself.  He was careful
not to repeat that sentiment audibly.

"Holmesy ought to be here to-day, and working," growled one of
the Army subs.  "He's a sneak, just to desert on Mr. Prescott's
account."

"None of that!" called Doug sharply.

The Army head coach came along, talking quietly but forcefully
to the all but discouraged cadets.  Then he addressed himself
to Douglass, explaining what he thought were next to the weakest
points in the Navy line.

"You ought to be able to save the score yet, Mr. Douglass," wound
up coach.

"I wish some one else had the job!" sighed Doug to himself.

"Fellows, the main game that is left," explained Wolgast to the
midshipmen, "is to keep West Point from scoring.  As to our own
points, we have enough now---though more will be welcome."

Play began in the fourth period.  At first it was nip and tuck,
neck and neck.  But the Army braced and put the pigskin within
sixteen yards of the Navy's goal line.  Then the men from Annapolis
seemed suddenly to wake up.  Darrin, who had had little to do
in the last few plays, was now sent to the front again.  Steadily,
even brilliantly, he, Dalzell and Jetson figured in the limelight
plays.  Yard after yard was gained, while the Army eleven shivered.
At last it came to the inevitable.  The Army was forced to use
another safety.  Stinging under the sense of defeat, the cadet
players put that temporary chance to such good advantage that
they gradually got the pigskin over into Naval territory.  But
there the midshipmen held it until the timekeeper interposed.

The fourth period and the game were over.  West Point had gone
down in a memorable, stinging defeat.  The Navy had triumphed,
ten to two.

What a crash came from the Naval Academy Band!  Yet the Military
Academy Band, catching the spirit and the tune, joined in, and
both bands blared forth, the musicians making themselves heard
faintly through all the tempest of huzzas.

Dave Darrin smiled faintly as he hurried away from the field.
All his personal interest in football had vanished.  He had played
his last game of football and was glad that the Navy had won;
that was about all.

Yet he was not listless---far from it.  On the contrary Dave fairly
ran to dressing quarters, hustled under a shower and then began
to towel and dress.

For out in the audience, well he knew, had sat Belle Meade and
her mother.

"Darry, you're a wonder!" cried Wolgast.  "Every time to-day we
called upon you you were ready with the push."

But Dave, rushing through his dressing, barely heard this and
other praise that was showered on him.

"I'll get along before assembly time, Davy," whispered Dan Dalzell.

"Come along now," Dave called back.

"Oh, no!  I know that you and Belle want some time to yourselves,"
murmured Dalzell wisely.  "I'll get along at the proper time."

Dave didn't delay to argue.  He stepped briskly outside, then
into the field, his eyes roving over the thousands of spectators
who still lingered.  At last a waving little white morsel of a
handkerchief rewarded Darrin's search.

"Oh, you did just splendidly to-day," was Belle's enthusiastic
greeting, as Dave stepped up to the young lady and her mother.
"I've heard lots of men say that it was all Darrin's victory."

"Yes; you're the hero of Franklin Field, this year," smiled Mrs.
Meade.

"Laura Bentley and her mother didn't come over?" Dave inquired
presently.

"No; of course not----after the way that the cadets used Dick
Prescott," returned Belle.  "Wasn't it shameful of the cadets
to treat a man like Dick in that fashion?"

"I have my opinion, of course," Dave replied moodily, "but it's
hardly for a midshipman to criticise the cadets for their own
administration of internal discipline in their own corps.  The
absence of Prescott and Holmes probably cost the Army the game
to-day."

"Not a bit of it!" Belle disputed warmly.  "Dave, don't belittle
your own superb work in that fashion!  The Army would have lost
to-day if the West Point eleven had been made up exclusively of
Prescotts and Holmeses!"

As Belle spoke thus warmly her gaze wandered, resting, though
not by intent, on the face of a young Army officer passing at
that moment.

"If the remark was made to me, miss," smiled the Army officer,
"I wish to say that I wholly agree with you.  The Navy's playing
was the most wonderful that I ever saw."

Dave, in the meantime, had saluted, then stood at attention until
the Army officer had passed.

"There!" cried Belle triumphantly.  "You have it from the other
side, now---from the enemy."

"Hardly from the enemy," replied Dave, laughing.  "Between the
United States Army and the United States Navy there can never
be a matter of enmity.  Annually, in football, the Army and Navy
teams are opponents---rivals, perhaps---but never enemies."

Mrs. Meade had strolled away for a few yards, the better to leave
the young people by themselves.

"Dave," announced Belle almost sternly, "you've simply got to
say something savage about the action of the West Point men in
sending Dick Prescott to Coventry."

"The West Point men didn't do it," rejoined Dave.  "It was all
done by the members of the first class alone."

"Well, then, you must say something very disagreeable about the
first class at the Military Academy."

"But why?" persisted Dave Darrin.  He was disgusted enough over
the action of the first class cadets, but, being in the service
himself, he felt it indelicate in him to criticise the action
of the cadets of the United States Military Academy.

"Why?" repeated Belle.  "Why, simply because Laura Bentley will
insist on asking me when I get home what you had to say about
Dick's case.  If I can't tell Laura that you said something pretty
nearly awful, then Laura will be terribly hurt."

"Shall I swear?" asked Dave innocently.

Belle opened her eyes wide in amazement.

"No, you won't swear," Belle retorted.  "Profanity isn't the
accomplishment of a gentleman.  But you must say something about
Dick's case which will show her that all of Dick's friends are
standing by the poor fellow."

"But, Belle, you know it isn't considered very manly for a fellow
in one branch of the service to say anything against fellows in
the other branch."

"Not even---for Laura's sake?"

"Oh, well," proposed Midshipman Darrin, squirming about between
the horns of the dilemma, "you just think of whatever will please
Laura most to hear from me."

"Yes-----?" pressed Miss Meade.

"Then tell it to her and say that I said it."

"But how can I say that you said it if you didn't say it?" demanded
Belle, pouting prettily.

"Easiest thing in the world, Belle.  I authorize you, fully, to
say whatever you like about Dick, as coming from me.  If I authorize
you to say it, then you won't be fibbing, will you?"

Belle had to think that over.  It was a bit of a puzzle, as must
be admitted.

"Now, let's talk about ourselves," Darrin pressed her.  "I see
Danny boy coming, with that two-yard grin of his, and we won't
have much further chance to talk about ourselves."

The two young people, therefore, busied themselves with personal
talk.  Dan drifted along, but merely raised his cap to Belle,
then stationed himself by Mrs. Meade's side.

It was not until Dave signaled quietly that Dalzell came over
to take Belle's proffered hand and chat for a moment.

The talk was all too short for all concerned.  A call of the bugle
signaled the midshipmen to leave friends and hasten back for assembly.

It was not until the train had started away from Philadelphia
that Dave and Dan were all but mobbed by way of congratulation.
Wolgast, Jetson, Farley, Page and others also came in for their
share of good words.

"And to think, Darry, that you can never play on the Navy eleven
again!" groaned a second classman.

"You'll have some one else in my place," laughed Dave.

"The Navy never before had a football player like you, and we'll
never have one again," insisted the same man.  "Dalzell's kind
come once in about every five years, but your kind, Darry, never
come back---in the Navy!"




CHAPTER XV

DAN FEELS AS "SOLD" AS HE LOOKS


It was the first hop after the New Year.

"Tell me one thing Dave," begged Belle Meade, who, with Laura
Bentley, and accompanied by Mrs. Meade, had come down to Annapolis
for this dance.

"I'll tell you two things, if I know how," Darrin responded promptly.

"Dan has danced a little with Laura, to be sure, but he introduced
Mr. Farley to her, and has written down Farley's name for a lot of
dances on Laura's card."

"Farley is a nice fellow," Dave replied.  "But why didn't Dan
want more of the dances with Laura, instead of turning them over
to Mr. Farley?" followed up Belle.  "And---there he goes now."

"Farley?"

"No, stupid!  Dan."

"Well, why shouldn't he move about?" Midshipman Darrin inquired.

"But with---By the way, who is that girl, anyway?"

The girl was tall, rather stately and of a pronounced blonde type.
She was a girl who would have been called more than merely pretty
by any one who had seen her going by on Midshipman Dalzell's arm.

"I don't really know who she is," Dave admitted.

"Have you seen her here before?"

"Yes; I think I have seen the young lady half a dozen times before
to-night."

"Then it's odd that you don't know who she is," pursued Miss Meade.

"I've never been introduced to her, you see."

"Oh!  I imagined that you midshipmen were always being presented
to girls."

"That's a fairy tale," said Dave promptly.  "The average midshipman
has about all he can do to hold his place here, without losing
any time in running around making the acquaintances of young women
who probably don't care at all about knowing him."

"What I'm wondering about," Belle went on, "is whether the young
woman we have been discussing is any one in whom Dan Dalzell is
seriously interested."

"I'll ask Dan."

"Oh!  And I suppose you'll tell him that it's I who really want
to know."

"I'll tell him that, too, if you wish it."

"Dave, you won't even mention my name to Dan in connection with
any topic so silly."

"All right, Belle.  All I want is my sailing orders.  I know how
to follow them."

"You're teasing me," Miss Meade went on, pouting.  "I don't mean
to be curious, but I noticed that Dan appears to be quite attentive
to the young lady, and I was wondering whether Dan had met his
fate---that's all."

"I don't know," smiled Midshipman Darrin, "and I doubt if Dan
does, either.  He's just the kind of fellow who might ignore girls
for three years, then be ardently attentive to one for three
days---and forget all about her in a week."

"Is Dan such a flirt as that?" Belle demanded, looking horrified.

"Dan---a flirt!" chuckled Dave.  "I shall have to tell that to
some of the fellows; it will amuse them.  No; I wouldn't call
Dan a flirt.  He's anything but that.  Dan will either remain
a bachelor until he's past forty, or else some day he'll marry
suddenly after having known the girl at least twenty-four hours.
Dan hasn't much judgment where girls are concerned."

"He appears to be able to tell a pretty girl when he sees one,"
argued Belle Meade, turning again to survey Dan's companion.

Belle, with the sharp eyes and keen intuition of her sex, was
quite justified in believing that Midshipman Dalzell realized
fully the charms of the girl with whom he was talking.

Miss Catharine Atterly was the only daughter of wealthy parents,
though her father had started life as a poor boy.  Daniel Atterly,
however, had been shrewd enough to know the advantages of a better
education than he had been able to absorb in his boyhood.  Miss
Catharine, therefore, had been trained in some of the most expensive,
if not the best, schools in the country.  She was a buxom, healthy
girl, full of the joy of living, yet able to conceal her enthusiasm
under the polish that she had acquired in the schools she had
attended.  Miss Atterly, on coming to Annapolis, had conceived
a considerable liking for the Naval uniform, and had attracted
Dan to her side within the last three days.  And Dan had felt
his heart beating faster when nearing this pretty young creature.

Now, he was endeavoring to display himself to the best advantage
before her eyes.

"You midshipmen have a very graceful knack of being charmingly
attentive to the ladies," Miss Atterly suggested coyly.

"We receive a little bit of training in social performance, if
that is what you mean, Miss Atterly," Dan replied.

"And that enables you to be most delightfully attentive to every
girl that comes along?"

"I don't know," Midshipman Dalzell replied slowly.  "I haven't
had much experience."

Miss Atterly laughed as though she felt certain that she knew
better.

"Do you say that to every girl?" she asked.

"I don't get many chances," Dan insisted.  "Miss Atterly, all
the hops that I've attended could be counted on your fingers,
without using the thumbs?"

"Oh, really?"

"It is the truth, I assure you.  Some of the midshipmen attend
many hops.  Most of us are too busy over our studies as a rule."

"Then you prefer books to the society of girls?"

"It isn't that," replied Dan, growing somewhat red under Miss
Atterly's amused scrutiny.  "The fact is that a fellow comes here
to the Naval Academy for the purpose of becoming an officer in
the Navy."

"To be sure."

"And, unless the average fellow hugs his books tightly he doesn't
have any show to get through and become an officer.  There are
some fellows, of course, to whom the studies come easily.  With
most of us it's a terrible grind.  Even with the grind about forty
per cent. of the fellows who enter the Naval Academy are found
deficient and are dropped.  If you are interested in knowing,
I had a fearful time in keeping up with the requirements."

"Oh, you poor boy!" cried Miss Atterly half tenderly.

"I never felt that I wanted any sympathy," Dan declared stoutly.
"If I couldn't keep up, then the only thing to do was to go back
to civil life and find my own level among my own kind."

"Now, that was truly brave in you!" declared Miss Atterly, admiration
shining in her eyes.

"There's the music starting," Dan hastily reminded her.  "Our
dance."

"Would it seem disagreeable in me if I asked you to sit out this
number with me?" inquired the girl.  "The truth is, I can dance
any evening, but you and your brave fight here, Mr. Dalzell, interest
me---oh, more than I can tell you!"

Under this line of conversation Midshipman Dalzell soon began
to feel highly uncomfortable.  Miss Atterly, however, in getting
Dan to talk of the midshipman and the Naval life, soon had him
feeling at his ease.  Nor could Dalzell escape noticing the fact
that Miss Atterly appeared to enjoy his company hugely.

Then Dan was led on into talking of the life of the Naval officer
at sea, and he spoke eloquently.

"A life of bravery and daring," commented Miss Atterly thoughtfully.
"Yet, after all, I would call it rather a lonely life."

"Perhaps it will prove so," Dalzell assented.  "Yet it is all the
life that I look forward to.  It's all the life that I care about."

"Despite the loneliness---or rather, because of it---it will seem
all the finer and more beautiful to come home to wife and children,"
said Miss Atterly after a pause.  "Nearly all Naval officers marry,
don't they?"

"I---I believe they do," Dalzell stammered.  "I---I never asked
any Naval officers for statistics."

"Now, you are becoming droll," cried Miss Atterly, her laughter
ringing out.

"I didn't mean to be," Dan protested.  "I beg your pardon."

Whereat Miss Atterly laughed more than ever.

"I like you even better when you're droll," Miss Atterly informed
him.

Something in the way that she said it pleased Midshipman Dalzell
so immensely that he began to notice, more than before, what a
very fine girl Miss Atterly was.  Then, to win her applause, Dan
made the mistake of trying to be funny, whereat the girl was extremely
kind.

"Dave," whispered Belle soon after the music had stopped, "I can't
get away from the belief that Dan's companion is leading him on.
See!  Dan now looks at her almost adoringly."

Laura Bentley, too, had noticed Dan's preoccupation, but she merely
smiled within herself.  She did not believe that Dan could really
be serious where girls were concerned.  Now, as Laura's midshipman
partner led her to a seat, and soon left her, Dan, tearing himself
away from Miss Atterly, came to remind Laura that his name was
written on her card for the next dance.

"Very fine girl I've been talking with, Laura," Dan confided in
the straightforward way that he had always used with Miss Bentley,
who was such a very old school friend.

"She certainly is very pretty," Laura nodded.

"And---er---distinguished looking, don't you think?" Dan ventured.

"Yes, indeed."

"But I was speaking more of her character---at least, her disposition.
Miss Atterly is highly sympathetic.  I wish you'd meet her, Laura."

"I shall be delighted to do so, Dan."

"After this dance, then?  And I want Belle to meet her, too.
Miss Atterly has noticed you both, and was much interested when
she learned that you were old school-day friends of mine."

So, after the music had ceased, Dan escorted Laura over to where
Dave and Belle were chatting.

"Belle," asked Dan in his most direct way, "will you come and
be introduced to Miss Atterly?"

"The young lady you've been dancing with so much?" Miss Meade
inquired.  "The tall, stately blonde?"

"Yes," Dan nodded.

"I shall be glad to meet Miss Atterly.  But how about her?  Do
you think she could stand the shock?"

"Miss Atterly is very anxious to meet you both," Dalzell assured
Belle.

"Take me over and shock her, then," laughed Belle.

Dan stood gazing about the scene.  "I---I wonder where Miss Atterly
is?" Dan mused aloud.

"Oh, I can tell you," Belle answered.  "A moment ago she went
through the entrance over yonder."

"Alone?"

"No; an older woman, probably Miss Atterly's mother, was with
her."

"Oh!  Let's look them up, then, if you don't mind."

As Belle rose, taking Dave's arm, Dan and Laura took the lead.

Just beyond the entrance that Belle had indicated no one else
was in sight when the four young friends reached the spot.  There
was a clump of potted tropical shrubbery at one side.

On the other side of this shrubbery sat Mrs. and Miss Atterly,
engaged in conversation.

"Why do you prefer to sit in this out-of-the-way place, Catharine?"
her mother inquired, just as the young people came up.

"I want to get away from two rather goodlooking but very ordinary
girls that Mr. Dalzell wants to present to me, mamma," she replied.

"If they are midshipmen's friends are they too ordinary to know?"
inquired Mrs. Atterly.

"Mamma, if I am going to interest Mr. Dalzell, I don't want other
girls stepping in at every other moment.  I don't want to know
his girl friends."

"Are you attracted to Mr. Dalzell, Cathy?" asked her mother.

"Not especially, I assure you, mamma."

"Oh, then it is not a serious affair."

"It may be," laughed the girl lightly.  "If I can learn to endure
Mr. Dalzell, then I may permit him to marry me when he is two
years older and has his commission."

"Even if you don't care much for him?" asked Mrs. Atterly, almost
shocked.

"If I marry," pouted Miss Atterly, "I don't want a husband that
leaves the house every morning, and returns every evening."

"Cathy!"

"Well, I don't!  In some ways I suppose it's nice to be a married
woman.  One has more freedom in going about alone.  Now, a Naval
officer, mamma, would make the right sort of husband for me.
He'd be away, much of the time, on long cruises."

"But I understand, Cathy, that sometimes a Naval officer has a
year or two of shore duty."

"If that happened," laughed the girl, "I could take a trip to
Europe couldn't I?  And the social position of a Naval officer
isn't a bad one.  His wife enjoys the same social position, you
know, mamma."

"Yet why Mr. Dalzell, if you really don't care anything about
him?"

"Because he's so simple, mamma.  He would be dreadfully easy to
manage!"

The four young people looking for the Atterlys had unavoidably
heard every word.  They halted, Dan violently red in the face.
Then Laura, with quick tact, wheeled about and led the way back
to the ball room floor.

"Better luck next time, Dan," whispered Belle, gripping Dalzell's
arm.

"Don't you think twice is enough for a simpleton like me?" blurted
Midshipman Dan.




CHAPTER XVI

THE DAY OF MANY DOUBTS


Busy days followed, days which, for some of the first classmen,
were filled with a curious discontent.

Some, to be sure, among these midshipmen soon to graduate, took
each day as it came, with little or no emotion.  To them the Naval
life ahead was coming only as a matter of course.  There were
others, however---and Dave Darrin was among them---who looked
upon a commission as an officer of the Navy as a sacred trust
given them by the nation.

Dave Darrin was one of those who, while standing above the middle
of his class, yet felt that he had not made sufficiently good
use of his time.  To his way of thinking there was an appalling
lot in the way of Naval duties that he did not understand.

"I may get through here, and out of here, and in another couple
of years be a line or engineer officer," Midshipman Darrin confided
to his chum and roommate one day.  "But I shall be only a half-baked
sort of officer."

"Well, are cubs ever anything more?" demanded Dan.

"Yes; Wolgast, for instance, is going to be something more.  So
will Fenton and Day, and several others whom I could name."

"And so is Darrin," confidently predicted Midshipman Dalzell.

But Dave shook his head.

"No, no, Danny boy.  The time was when I might have believed extremely
well of myself, but that day has gone by.  When I entered the
Naval Academy I probably thought pretty well of myself.  I've tried
to keep up with the pace here-----"

"And you've done it, and are going to do it right along," interjected
Midshipman Dalzell.

"No; it almost scares me when I look over the subjects that I'm
not really fit in.  It's spring, now, and I'm only a few weeks
away from graduation, only something like two years this side
of a commission as ensign, and---and---Dan, I wonder if I'm honestly
fit to command a rowboat."

"You've got a brief grouch against yourself, Davy," muttered Dan.

"No; but I think I know what a Naval officer should be, and I
also know how far short I fall of what I should be."

"If you get your diploma," argued Midshipman Dalzell, "the faculty
of the Naval Academy will testify on the face of it that you're
a competent midshipman and on your way to being fit to hold an
ensign's commission presently."

"But that's just the point, Danny.  I shall know, myself, that
I'm only a poor, dub sort of Naval officer.  I tell you, Danny,
I don't know enough to be a good Naval officer."

"Then that's a reflection on your senior officers who have had
your training on hand," grinned Dalzell.  "If you talk in the
same vein after you've gotten your diploma, it will amount to
a criticism of the intelligence of your superior officers.  And
that's something that's wisely forbidden by the regulations."

Dan picked up a text-book and opened it, as though he believed
that he had triumphantly closed the discussion.  Midshipman Darrin,
however, was not to be so easily silenced.

"Then, if you're not fitted to be a Naval officer," blurted Dalzell,
"what on earth can be said of me?"

"You may not stand quite as high as I do, on mere markings," Dave
assented.  "But there are a lot of things, Danny, that you know
much better than I do."

"Name one of them," challenged Dalzell.

"Well, steam engineering, for instance.  Now, I'm marked higher
in that than you are, Danny.  Yet, when the engine on one of the
steamers goes wrong you can hunt around until you get the engine
to running smoothly.  You're twice as clever at that as I am."

"Not all Naval officers are intended to be engineer officers,"
grunted Midshipman Dalzell.  "If you don't feel clever enough
in that line, just put in your application for watch officer's
work."

"Take navigation," Dave continued.  "I stand just fairly well
in the theory of the thing.  But I've no real knack with a sextant."

"Well, the sextant is only a hog-yoke," growled Dalzell.

"Yes; but I shiver every time I pick up the hog-yoke under the
watchful gaze of an instructor."

"Humph!  Only yesterday I heard Lieutenant-Commander Richards
compliment you for your work in nav."

"Yes; but that was the mathematical end.  I'm all right on the
paper end and the theoretical work, but it's the practical end
that I'm afraid of."

"You'll get plenty of the practical work as soon as you graduate
and get to sea," Dan urged.

"Yes; and very likely make a chump of myself, like Digby, of last
year's class.  Did you hear what he did in nav.?"

"No," replied Dalzell, looking up with real interest this times
"If Digby made a fool of himself I'll be glad to hear about it,
for Dig was always just a little bit too chesty to suit me."

"Well, Dig wasn't a bit chesty the first day that he was ordered
to shoot the sun," Dave laughed.  "Dig took the sextant, and made
a prize shot, or thought he did.  After he had got the sun, plumb
at noon, he lowered the instrument and made his reading most carefully.
Then he went into the chart room, and got busy with his calculations.
The longer Dig worked the worse his head ached.  He stared at
his figures, tore them up and tried again.  Six or eight times
he worked the problem over, but always with the same result.
The navigating officer, who had worked the thing out in two minutes,
sat back in his chair and looked bored.  You see, Dig's own eyes
had told him that the ship was working north, and about five miles
off the coast of New Jersey.  But his figures told him that the
ship was anchored in the old fourth ward of the city of Newark.
Try as he would, Dig couldn't get the battleship away from that
ward."

Dan Dalzell leaned back, laughing uproariously at the mental picture
that this story of Midshipman Digby brought up in his mind.

"It sounds funny, when you hear it," Dave went on.  "But I sometimes
shiver over the almost certainty that I'm going to do something
just as bad when I get to sea.  If I get sent to the engine room
I'll be likely to fill the furnaces with water and the boilers
with coal."

"Rot!" objected Dan.  "You're not crazy---not even weak-minded."

"Or else, if I'm put to navigating, I'm fairly likely to bring
the battleship into violent collision with the Chicago Limited,
over in Ohio."

"Come out of that funk, Davy!" ordered his chum.

"I'm trying to, Danny boy; but there's many an hour when I feel
that I haven't learned here all that I should have learned, and
that I'll be miles behind the newest ensigns and lieutenants."

"There's just about one thing for you to do, then," proposed Dan.

"Resign?" queried Darrin, looking quizzically at his chum.

"Not by a long sight.  Just go in for a commission as second lieutenant
of marines.  You can get that and hold it.  A marine officer doesn't
have to know anything but the manual of arms and a few other little
simple things."

"But a marine officer isn't a real sailor, Danny.  He lives and
works on a warship, to be sure, but he's more of a soldier.  Now,
as it happens, my whole heart and soul are wrapped up in being
a Naval officer---a real Naval officer."

"With that longing, and an Annapolis diploma," teased Dalzell,
"there is just one thing to do."

"What?"

"Beat your way to the realization of your dream.  You've got a
thundering good start."

Midshipman Dave Darrin was not the kind to communicate his occasional
doubts to anyone except his roommate.  Had Darrin talked on the
subject with other members of his class he would have found that
many of his classmates were tortured by the same doubts that assailed
him.  With midshipmen who were destined to get their diplomas
such doubts were to be charged only to modesty, and were therefore
to their credit.  Yet, every spring dozens of Annapolis first
classmen are miserable, instead of feeling the joyous appeal of
the budding season.  They are assailed by just such fears as had
reached Dave Darrin.

Dalzell, on the other hand, was tortured by no such dreads.  He
went hammering away with marvelous industry, and felt sure, in
his own mind, that he would be retired, in his sixties, an honored
rear admiral.

Had there been only book studies some of the first classmen would
have broken down under the nervous strain.  However, there was
much to be done in the shops---hard, physical labor, that had
to be performed in dungaree clothing; toil of the kind that plastered
the hard-worked midshipmen with grime and soot.  There were drills,
parades, cross-country marches.  The day's work at the Naval Academy,
at any season of the year, is arranged so that hard mental work
is always followed by lively physical exertion, much of it in
the open air.

Dalzell, returning one afternoon from the library encountered
Midshipman Farley, who was looking unaccountably gloomy.

"What's the trouble, Farl---dyspepsia?" grinned Dan, linking one
arm through his friend's.  "Own up!"

"Danny, I'm in the dumps," confessed Farley.  "I hate to acknowledge
it, but I've been fearfully tempted, for the last three days, to send
in my resignation."

"What's her name?" grinningly demanded Dalzell, who had bravely
recovered from his own two meetings with Venus.

"It isn't a girl---bosh!" jeered Farley.  "There's only one girl
in the world I'm interested in---and she's my kid sister."

"Then why this talk of resigning."

"Danny, I'm simply afraid that I'm not made of the stuff to make
a competent Naval officer.  My markings are all right, but I know
that I don't know enough to take a sailboat out and bring it back."

"Oh, is that all?" cried Dalzell laughingly.  "Then I know just
what you want."

"What?"

"Drop into our room and have a talk with Darry.  Dave knows just
how to comfort and cheer a fellow who has that glum bug in his
head of cabbage.  Come right along!"

Dan almost forced Farley to the door of the room, opened it and
shoved the modest midshipman inside.

"Darry," Dan called joyously, "here's a case for your best talents.
Farley has a pet bee in his bonnet that he isn't fit to be a
Naval officer.  He doesn't know enough.  So he's going to resign.
I've told him you'll know just how to handle his case.  Go after
him, now!"

Midshipman Dalzell pulled the door shut, chuckling softly to himself,
and marched back to the library.  It was just before the call
for supper formation when Dan returned from "boning" in the library.

"Did you brace Farl up, Davy?" demanded Dan.

"You grinning idiot!" laughed Darrin.  "What on earth made you bring
him to me?"

"Because I thought you needed each other."

"Well, perhaps we did," laughed Midshipman Darrin.  "At any rate
I've been hammering at Farl all the time that he wasn't hammering
at me.  I certainly feel better, and I hope that he does."

"You both needed the same thing," declared Dan, grinning even
more broadly as he picked up his hair brushes.

"What did we need?"

"You've both been studying so hard that your brain cells are clogged."

"But what did Farley and I both need?" insisted Midshipman Darrin.

"Mental exercise---brain-sparring," rejoined Dalzell.  "You both
needed something that could take you out of the horrible daily
grooves that you've been sailing in lately.  You both needed something
to stir you up---and I hope you gave each other all the excitement
you could."

In the way of a stirring-up something was about to happen that
was going to stir up the whole first class---if not the entire
brigade.

Nor was Dave Darrin to escape being one of the central figures
in the excitement.

Here is the way in which the whole big buzzing-match got its start
and went on to a lively finish.




CHAPTER XVII

MR. CLAIRY DEALS IN OUTRAGES


"Mr. Darrin!"

With that hail proceeded sharply from the lips of a first classman,
who on this evening happened to be the midshipman in charge of
the floor.

Clairy sat at his desk in the corridor, his eyes on a novel until
Dave happened along.  As he gave the sharp hail Mr. Clairy thrust
his novel under a little pile of text-books.

"Well, sir?" inquired Dave, halting.  "Mr. Darrin, what do you
mean by coming down the corridor with both shoes unlaced."

"They are not unlaced," retorted Dave, staring in amazement at
Midshipman Clairy.

"They are not now---true."

"And they haven't been unlaced, sir, since I first laced them
on rising this morning."

"Don't toy with the truth, Mr. Darrin!" rang Clairy's voice sternly.

"If my shoes had been unlaced, they would still be unlaced, wouldn't
they, sir?" demanded Dave.

"No; for you have laced them since I spoke to you about it!"

This was entirely too much for Darrin, who gulped, gasped, and
then stared again at the midshipman in charge of the floor.

Then, suddenly, a light dawned on Dave.  He grinned almost as
broadly as Dan Dalzell could have done.

"Come, come, now, Clairy!" chided Dave.  "What on earth is the
joke---and why?"

Midshipman Clairy straightened himself, his eyes flashing and
his whole appearance one of intense dignity.

"Mr. Darrin, there is no joke about it, as you are certainly aware,
sir.  And I must call your attention to the fact that it is bad
taste to address a midshipman familiarly when he is on official
duty."

"Why, hang you---" Dave broke forth utterly aghast.

"Stop, sir!" commanded Mr. Clairy, rising.  "Mr. Darrin, you will
place yourself on report for strolling along the corridor with
both shoes unlaced.  You will also place yourself on report for
impertinence in answering the midshipman in charge of the floor."

"But-----"

"Go at once, sir, and place yourself on report"

Dave meditated, for two or three seconds, over the advisability
of knocking Mr. Clairy down.  But familiarity with the military
discipline of the Naval Academy immediately showed Darrin that
his only present course was to obey.

"I wonder who's loony now?" hummed Dave to himself, as he marched
briskly along on his way to the office of the officer in charge.
There be picked up two of the report slips, dipping a pen in ink.

First, in writing, he reported himself on the charge of having
his shoes unlaced.  In the space for remarks Darrin wrote tersely:

"Untrue."

Against the charge of unwarranted impertinence to the midshipman
in charge of the floor Dave wrote the words:

"Impertinence admitted, but in my opinion entirely warranted."

So utterly astounded was Darrin by this queer turn of affairs,
that he forgot the matter that had taken him from his room.  On
his way back he met Midshipman Page.  On the latter's face was
a look as black as a thundercloud.

"What on earth is wrong, Page?" Darrin asked.

"I've got the material for a first-class fight on my hands," Page
answered, his eyes flashing.

"What---"

"Clairy has ordered me to report myself."

"What does he say you were doing that you weren't doing?" inquired
Midshipman Darrin, a curious look in his eyes.

"Clairy has the nerve to state that I was coming along the corridor
with my blouse unbuttoned.  He ordered me to button it up, which
I couldn't do since it was already buttoned.  But he declared
that I buttoned it up while facing him, and so I'm on my way to
place myself on report for an offense that I didn't commit."

"Clairy just sent me to the O.C. to frap the pap for having my
shoes unlaced," remarked Dave, his face flushing darkly.

"What on earth is Clairy up to?" cried Page.

"I don't know.  I can't see his game clearly.  But he's certainly
hunting trouble."

"Then-----"

"See here, Page, we've no business holding indignation meetings
in study hours.  But come to my room just as soon as release
sounds---will you?"

"You can wager that I will," shot back Midshipman Page as he started
along the corridor.

"Hello," hailed Midshipman Dalzell, looking up as his chum entered.
"Why, Darry, you're angry---really angry.  Who has dared throw
spitballs at you?"

"Quit your joking, Dan!" returned Dave Darrin, his voice quivering.
"Clairy is hunting real trouble, I imagine, and I fancy he'll have
to be obliged."

Dave thereupon related swiftly what had happened, Dan staring
in sheer amazement.  Then Dalzell jumped up.

"Where are you going?" Darrin answered.

"To interview Clairy."

"You'd better not, Dan.  The trouble is thick enough already."

"I'm going to interview Clairy---perhaps," retorted Midshipman
Dalzell.  "I've just thought of a perfectly good excuse for being
briefly out of quarters during study hours.  I'll be back
soon---perhaps with some news."

Off Dan posted.  In less than ten minutes he returned, looking
even more indignant than had his chum.

"Davy," broke forth Dalzell hotly, "that idiot is surely hunting
all the trouble there is in Annapolis."

"He went after you, then?"

"I was making believe to march straight by the fellow's desk,"
resumed Dan, "when Clairy brought me up sharply.  Told me to frap
the pap for strolling with my hands in my pockets.  I didn't do
anything like that."

In another hour indignation was running riot in that division.
Midshipman Clairy had ordered no less than eight first classmen
to put themselves on report for offenses that none of them would
admit having committed.

Oh, but there was wrath boiling in the quarters occupied by those
eight first classmen.

Immediately after release had sounded, Page and Farley made a
bee-line for Dave's room.

"Did Clairy wet you, Farley?" demanded Darrin.

"No; I haven't been out of my room until just now."

"Page," continued Darrin, "circulate rapidly in first class rooms
on this deck and find out whether Clairy improperly held up any
more of the fellows.  Dan was a victim, too."

Page had five first classmen on the scene in a few minutes.  The
meeting seemed doomed to resolve itself into a turmoil of angry
language.

"Clairy is a hound!"

"A liar in my case!"

"He's hunting a fight!"

"Coventry would do him more good."

"Yes; we'll have to call the class to deal with this."

"The scoundrel!"

"The pup!"

"He's trying to pile some of us up with so many demerits that we
won't be able to graduate."

"Oh, well," argued Page, "Fenwick has hit it.  We can't fight
such a lying hound.  All we can do is to get the class out and
send the fellow to Coventry."

"What do you imagine it all means, Darry?" questioned Fenwick.

Dave's wrath had had time to simmer down, and he was cooler now.

"I wish I knew what to think, fellows," Dave answered slowly.
"Clairy has never shown signs of doing such things before."

"He has always been a sulk, and never had a real friend in the
class," broke in Farley.

"He has always been quiet and reticent," Dave admitted.  "But
we never before had any real grievance against Mr. Clairy."

"We have a grievance now, all right!" glowered Page.  "Coventry,
swift and tight, is the only answer to the situation."

"Let's not be in too much haste, fellows," Darrin urged.

"You---you give such advice as that?" gasped Midshipman Dalzell.
"Why, Davy, the fellow went for you in fearful shape.  He insulted
you outrageously."

"I know he did," Darrin responded.  "That's why I believe in going
slowly in the matter."

"Now, why?" hissed Page.  "Why on earth---why?"

"Clairy must have had some motive behind his attack," Dave urged.

"It couldn't have been a good motive, anyway," broke in another
midshipman hotly.

"Never mind that part of it, just now," Dave Darrin retorted.
"Fellows, I, for one, don't like to go after Mr. Clairy too hastily
while we're all in doubt about the cause of it."

"We don't need to know the cause," stormed indignant Farley.
"We know the results, and that's enough for us.  I favor calling
a class meeting to-morrow night."

"We can do just as much, and act just as intelligently, if we
hold the class-meeting off for two or three nights," Midshipman
Darrin maintained.

"Now, why on earth should we bold off that long?" insisted Fenwick.
"We know, now, that Mr. Clairy has insulted eight members of
our class.  We know that he has lied about them, and that the
case is so bad as to require instant attention.  All I'm sorry
for is that it's too late to hold the class meeting within the
next five minutes."

Dave found even his own roommate opposed to delay in dealing with
the preposterous case of the outrageous Mr. Clairy.

Yet such was Darrin's ascendency over his classmates in matters
of ethics and policy, that he was able, before taps, to bring
the rest around to his wish for a waiting programme for two or
three days.

"There'll be some explanation of this," Dave urged, when he had
gotten his comrades into a somewhat more reasonable frame of mind.

"The explanation will have to be sought with fists," grumbled
Fenwick.  "And there are eight of us, while Clairy has only two
eyes that can be blackened."

The news had spread, of course, and the first class was in a fury
of resentment against one of its own members.

Meanwhile Midshipman Clairy sat at his desk out in the corridor,
clearly calm and indifferent to all the turmoil that his acts
had stirred up in the brigade.




CHAPTER XVIII

THE WHOLE CLASS TAKES A HAND


"Then, Mr. Darrin, you admit the use of impertinent language to
Mr. Clairy, when the midshipman was in charge of the floor?"

This question was put to Dave, the following morning, by the commandant
of midshipmen.

"It would have been an impertinence, sir, under ordinary conditions,"
Darrin answered.  "Under the circumstances I believed, sir, that I
had been provoked into righteous anger."

"You still assert that Mr. Clairy's charge that your shoes were
unlaced when you approached him was false?"

"Absolutely false, sir."

"Do you wish any time to reflect over that answer, Mr. Darrin?"

"No, sir."

"You are willing your answer should go on record, then?"

"My denial of the charge of having my shoes unlaced is the only
answer that I can possibly make, sir."

The commandant reflected.  Then he directed that Midshipman Clairy
be ordered to report to him.  Clairy came, almost immediately.
The commandant questioned him closely.  Clairy still stuck resolutely
to his story that Dave Darrin had been passing through the corridor
with his shoes unlaced; and, furthermore, that Darrin, when rebuked
and ordered to place himself on report, had used impertinent language.

During this examination the midshipmen did not glance toward each
other.  Both stood at attention, their glances on the commandant's
face.

"I do not know what to say," the officer admitted at last.  "I
will take the matter under advisement.  You may both go."

Outside, well away from the office, Dave Darrin halted, swinging
and confronting Clairy sternly.

"You lying scoundrel!" vibrated Darrin, his voice shaking with
anger.

"It constitutes another offense, Mr. Darrin, to use such language
for the purpose of intimidating a midshipman in the performance
of his duty," returned Midshipman Clairy, looking back steadily
into Dave's eyes.

"An offense?  Fighting is another, under a strict interpretation
of the rules," Dave replied coldly.

"And I do not intend to fight you," replied Clairy, still speaking
smoothly.

"Perhaps I should know better than to challenge you," replied
Midshipman Darrin.  "The spirit of the brigade prohibits my fighting
any one who is not a gentleman."

"If that is all you have to say, Mr. Darrin, I will leave you.
You cannot provoke me into any breach of the regulations."

Clairy walked away calmly, leaving Dave Darrin fuming with anger.

Page was sent for next, then Dalzell.  Both denied utterly the
charges on which Clairy had ordered them to report themselves.
Again Mr. Clairy was sent for, and once more he asserted the
complete truthfulness of his charges.

It was so in the cases of the five remaining midshipmen under
charges, though still Mr. Clairy stuck to the correctness of the
report.

Action in all of the eight cases was suspended by the commandant,
who went post-haste to the superintendent.  That latter official,
experienced as he was in the ways of midshipmen, could offer no
solution of the mystery.

"You see, my dear Graves," explained the superintendent, "it is
the rule of custom here, and a safe rule at that, to accept the
word of a midshipman as being his best recollection or knowledge
of the truth of any statement that he makes.  In that case, we
would seem to be bound to accept the statements of Mr. Clairy."

On the other hand, we are faced with the fact that we must accept
the statements made by Mr. Darrin, Mr. Page, Mr. Dalzell, Mr.
Fenwick and others.  We are on the horns of a dilemma, though
I doubt not that we shall find a way out of it."

"There appears, sir, to be only the statement of one midshipman
against the word of eight midshipmen," suggested the commandant.

"Not exactly that," replied the superintendent.  "The fact is
that Mr. Clairy's charges do not concern the eight midshipmen
collectively, but individually.  Had Mr. Clairy charged all eight
of the midshipmen of an offense committed at the same time and
together, and had the eight midshipmen all denied it, then we
should be reluctantly compelled to admit the probability that
Mr. Clairy had been lying.  But his charges relate to eight different
delinquencies, and not one of the eight accused midshipmen is
in a position to act as witness for any of the other accused men."

"Then what are we going to do, sir?"

"I will admit that I do not yet know," replied the superintendent.
"Some method of getting at the truth in the matter is likely
to occur to us later on.  In the meantime, Graves, you will not
publish any punishments for the reported delinquencies."

"Very good, sir," nodded the commandant.

"Keep your wits at work for a solution of the mystery, Graves."

"I will, sir."

"And I will give the matter all the attention that I can," was the
superintendent's last word.

If anger had been at the boiling point before, the situation was
even worse now.

Page and Fenwick openly challenged Clairy to fight.  He replied,
in each case, with a cool, smiling refusal.

"We've got to hold that class meeting!" growled Farley.

"Why?" inquired Dave.  "The class can't do anything more to Clairy
than has already been done.  His refusals to fight will send him
to Coventry as securely as could action by all four of the classes.
No fellow here can refuse to fight, unless he couples with his
refusal an offer to submit the case to his own class for action.
No one, henceforth, will have a word to say to Clairy."

"Perhaps not; but I still insist that the class meeting ought
to be called."

This was the general sentiment among the first classmen.  Darrin
was the only real dissenter to the plan.

"Oh, well, go ahead and call the class together, if you like,"
agreed Dave.  "My main contention is that such a meeting will
be superfluous.  The action of the class has really been taken
already."

"Will you come to the meeting, Darry?" asked Fenwick.

"Really, I don't know," Dave answered thoughtfully.  "My presence
would do neither good nor harm.  The action of the class has already
been decided.  In fact, it has been put into effect."

"Then you won't be there?" spoke up Farley.

"I don't know.  I'll come, however, if it will please any of you
especially."

"Oh, bother you, Darry!  We're not going to beg your presence
as a favor."

At formation for dinner, when the brigade adjutant published the
orders, every midshipman in the long ranks of the twelve companies
waited eagerly to learn what had been done in the cases of the
eight midshipmen.  They were doomed to disappointment, however.

At brigade formation for supper notice of a meeting of the first
class in Recreation Hall was duly published.  There was rather
an unwonted hush over the tables that night.

Immediately afterwards groups of midshipmen were seen strolling
through the broad foyer of Bancroft Hall, and up the low steps
into Recreation Hall.  Yet it was some ten minutes before there
was anything like a full gathering of the first class.

"Order!" rapped the class president Then, after glancing around:

"Is Mr. Clairy present?"

He was not.

"Where's Darry?" buzzed several voices.

But Dave Darrin was not present either.

"Where is he?" several demanded of Dan.

"Blessed if I know," Dan answered.  "I wish I did, fellows."

"Isn't Darry going to attend?"

"I don't know that, either."

Midshipman Gosman now claimed the floor.  He spoke a good deal
as though he had been retained as advocate for the eight accused
midshipmen.  In a fiery speech Mr. Gosman recited that eight different
members of the class had been falsely accused by Mr. Clairy.

"There are not eight liars in our class," declared Midshipman
Gosman, with very telling effect.

Then, after more fiery words aimed at Clairy, Mr. Gosman demanded:

"Why is not Mr. Clairy here to speak for himself?  Let him who
can answer this!  Further, Mr. Clairy has been challenged to fight
by some of those whom be accused.  Now, sir and classmates, a
midshipman may refuse to fight, but if he does he must submit
his case to his class, and then be guided by the class decision
as to whether he must fight or not.  Mr. Clairy has not done this."

"He's a cur!" shouted a voice.

"I accept the remark," bowed Mr. Gosman, "if I am permitted to
express the class's apology to all dogs for the comparison."

"Good!" yelled several.

"Mr. President and classmates," continued the angry orator, "I
believe we are all of one mind, and I believe that I can express
the unanimous sentiment of the first class."

"You can!"

"You bet you can!"

"Go ahead!"

"Mr. President, I take it upon myself to move that the first class
should, and hereby does, send Mr. Clairy to Coventry for all time
to come!"

"Second the motion!" cried several voices.

Then a diversion was created.

One of the big doors opened and a midshipman stepped into the
room, closing the door.

That midshipman was Dave Darrin.  Every first classman in the
room felt certain that Darrin had entered for the express purpose
of saying something of consequence.




CHAPTER XIX

MIDSHIPMAN DARRIN HAS THE FLOOR


But Dave did not speak at first.  Advancing only a short distance
into the hall he stood with arms folded, his face well-nigh
expressionless.

For a moment the class president glanced at Darrin, then at the
assemblage.

"Gentlemen," announced the class president, "you have heard the
motion, that Mr. Clairy be sent to Coventry for all time to come.
The motion has been duly seconded.  Remarks are in order."

"Mr. President!"

It was Dave who had spoken.  All eyes were turned in his direction
at once.

"Mr. Darrin," announced the chair.  "Mr. President, and classmates,
I, for one, shall vote against the motion."

An angry clamor rose, followed by calls of, "Question!  Put the
motion!"

"Do any of you know," Darrin continued, "why Mr. Clairy is not
here this evening?"

"He's afraid to come!"

"Did any of you note that Mr. Clairy was not at supper?"

"The hound hadn't any appetite," jeered Fenwick angrily.

"You have observed, of course, that Mr. Clairy was not here at
the meeting?"

"He didn't dare come!" cried several voices.

"If you have any explanation to make, Mr. Darrin, let us have
it," urged the chair.

"Mr. President and classmates," Midshipman Darrin continued, "all
along I have felt that there must be some explanation to match
Mr. Clairy's most extraordinary conduct.  I now offer you the
explanation.  The officer in charge sent for me, to impart some
information that I am requested to repeat before this meeting."

"Go on!" cried several curious voices when Dave paused for a moment.

"Fellows, I hate to tell you the news, and you will all be extremely
sorry to hear it.  You will be glad, however, that you did not
pass the motion now before the class.  Mr. President, I have to
report, at the request of the officer in charge, the facts in
Mr. Clairy's case.

"From the peculiar nature of the case both the superintendent and
the commandant of midshipmen were convinced that there was
something radically wrong with Mr. Clairy."

"Humph!  I should say so!" uttered Penwick, with emphasis.

"Mr. Clairy was not at our mess at supper," resumed Dave Darrin,
"for the very simple reason that he had been taken to hospital.
There he was examined by three surgeons, assisted by an outside
specialist.  Mr. President and classmates, I know you will all
feel heartily sorry for Clairy when I inform you that he has been
pronounced insane."

Dave ceased speaking, and an awed silence prevailed.  It was the
chair who first recovered his poise.

"Clairy insane!" cried the class president.  "Gentlemen, now we
comprehend what, before, it was impossible to understand."

In the face of this sudden blow to a classmate all the midshipmen
sat for a few minutes more as if stunned.  Then they began to
glance about at each other.

"I think this event must convince us, sir," Darrin's voice broke
in, "that we young men don't know everything, and that we should
learn to wait for facts before we judge swiftly."

"Mr. President!"

It was Gosman, on his feet.  In a husky voice that midshipman
begged the consent of his seconders for his withdrawing the motion
he had offered sending Midshipman Clairy to Coventry.  In a twinkling
that motion had been withdrawn.

"Will Mr. Darrin, state, if able, how serious Clairy's insanity
is believed to be?" inquired the chair.

"It is serious enough to ruin all his chances in the Navy," Dave
answered, "though the surgeons believe that, after Clairy has
been taken by his friends to some asylum, his cure can eventually
be brought about."

The feeling in the room was too heavy for more discussion.  A
motion to adjourn was offered and carried, after which the first
classmen hurried from the room.

Of course no demerits were imposed as a result of the crazy reports
ordered by Midshipman Clairy on that memorable night.  Three days
later the unfortunate young man's father arrived and had his son
conveyed from Annapolis.  It may interest the reader to know that,
two years later, the ex-midshipman fully recovered his reason, and
is now successfully engaged in business.

Spring now rapidly turned into early summer.  The baseball squad
had been at work for some time.  Both Darrin and Dalzell had been
urged to join.

"Let's go into the nine, if we can make it---and we ought to,"
urged Dan.

"You go ahead, Danny boy, if you're so inclined," replied Dave.

"Aren't you going in?"

"I have decided not to."

"You're a great patriot for the Naval Academy, Davy."

"I'm looking out for myself, I'll admit.  I want to graduate as
high in my class as I can, Danny.  Yet I'd sacrifice my own desires
if the Naval Academy needed me on the nine.  However, I'm not
needed.  There are several men on the nine who play ball better
than I but don't let me keep you off the nine, Dan."

"If you stay off I guess I will," replied Dalzell.  "If the nine
doesn't need you then it doesn't need me."

"But I thought you wanted to play."

"Not unless you and I could be the battery, David, little giant.
I'd like to catch your pitching, but I don't want to stop any
other fellow's pitching."

So far the nine had gone on without them.  Realizing how much
Dan wanted to play with the Navy team in this, their last year,
Dave changed his mind, and both joined.  A very creditable showing
was made after their entrance into the nine.  That year the Navy
captured more than half the games played, though the Navy was
fated to lose to the Army by a score of four to three.  This game
is described in detail in "_Dick Prescott's Fourth Year At West
Point_."

With the approach of graduation time Dave's heart was gladdened
by the arrival in Annapolis of Belle Meade and her mother, who
stopped at the Maryland House.  Dave saw them on the only days
when it was possible---that is to say, on Saturdays and Sundays.
He had many glimpses of his sweetheart, however, at other times,
for Belle, filled with the fascination of Naval life, came often
with her mother to watch the outdoor drills.

When Dave saw her at such times, however, he was obliged to act as
though he did not.  Not by look or sign could he convey any
intimation that he was doing anything but pay the strictest heed
to duty.

Then came the Saturday before examination.  Dave Darrin, released
after dinner, would gladly have hurried away from the Academy
grounds to visit his sweetheart in town, but Belle willed it otherwise.

"These are your last days here, Dave," whispered Belle, as she
and her handsome midshipman strolled about.  "If I'm to share
your life with you, I may as well begin by sharing the Naval Academy
with you to-day."

"Shall we go over to the field and watch the ball game when it
starts?" Darrin asked.

"Not unless you very especially wish to," Miss Meade replied.
"I'd rather have you to myself than to share your attention with
a ball game."

So, though Midshipman Dave was interested in the outcome of the
game, he decided to wait for the score when it had been made.

"Where's Dan to-day?" Belle inquired.

"Over at the ball game."

"Alone?"

"No; the brigade is with him, or he's with the brigade," laughed
Darrin.

"Then he's not there with a girl?"

"Oh, no; I think Danny's second experience has made him a bit
skeptical about girls."

"And how are you, on that point, Mr. Darrin?" teased Belle, gazing
up at him mirthfully.

"You know my sentiments, as to myself, Belle.  As for Dan---well,
I think it beyond doubt that he will do well to wait for several
years before he allows himself to be interested in any girls."

"Why?"

"Well, because Danny's judgment is bad in that direction.  And
he's pretty sure to be beaten out by any determined rival.  You
see, when Danny gets interested in a girl, he doesn't really know
whether he wants her.  From a girl's point of view what do you
think of that failing, Belle?"

"I am afraid the girl is not likely to feel complimented."

"So," pursued Dave, "while Danny is really interested in a girl,
but is uneasily unable to make up his mind, the girl is pretty
sure to grow tired of him and take up with the more positive rival."

"Poor Dan is not likely to have a bride early in life," sighed
Belle.

"Oh, yes; one very excellent bride for a Naval officer to have."

"What is that?"

"His commission.  Dan, if he keeps away from too interesting girls,
will have some years in which to fit himself splendidly in his
profession.  By that time he'll be all the better equipped for
taking care of a wife."

"I wonder," pondered Belle, "what kind of wife Dan will finally
choose."

"He won't have anything to do with the choosing," laughed Darrin.
"One of these days some woman will choose him, and then Dan will
be anchored for life.  It is even very likely that he'll imagine
that he selected his wife from among womankind, but he won't have
much to say about it."

"You seem to think Dan is only half witted," Belle remarked.

"Only where women are concerned, Belle.  In everything else he's
a most capable young American.  He's going to be a fine Naval
officer."

In another hour Belle had changed her mind.  She had seen all
of the Academy grounds that she cared about for a while, and now
proposed that they slip out through the Maryland Avenue gate for
a walk through the shaded, sweet scented streets of Annapolis.
As Darrin had town liberty the plan pleased him.

Strolling slowly the young people at last neared State Circle.

"I thought midshipmen didn't tell fibs," suddenly remarked Belle.

"They're not supposed to," Dave replied.

"But you said Dan was at the ball game."

"Isn't he?"

"Look there!" Belle exclaimed dramatically.




CHAPTER XX

DAN STEERS ON THE ROCKS AGAIN


Just entering Wiegard's were Midshipman Dalzell and a very pretty
young woman.

Dan had not caught sight of his approaching friends.

"Why, that fellow told me he was going to see if he couldn't be
the mascot for a winning score to-day," Dave exclaimed.

"But he didn't say that the score was to be won in a ball game,
did he?" Belle queried demurely.

"Now I think of it, he didn't mention ball," Darrin admitted.
"But I thought it was the game down on the Academy athletic field."

"No; it was very different kind of game," Belle smiled.  "Dave,
you'll find that Dan is incurable.  He's going to keep on trying
with women until-----"

"Until he lands one?" questioned Dave.

"No; until one lands him.  Dave, I wonder if it would be too terribly
prying if we were to turn into Wiegard's too?"

"I don't see any reason why it should be," Darrin answered.  "Mr.
Wiegard conducts a public confectioner's place.  It's the approved
place for any midshipman to take a young lady for ice cream.
Do you feel that you'd like some ice cream?"

"No," Belle replied honestly.  "But I'd like to get a closer look
at Dan's latest."

So Dave led his sweetheart into Wiegard's.  In order to get a
seat at a table it was necessary to pass the table at which Dan
and his handsome friend were seated.  As Dalzell's back was toward
the door he did not espy his friends until they were about to pass.

"Why, hello, Darry!" cried Dan, rising eagerly, though his cheeks
flushed a bit.  "How do you do, Miss Meade?  Miss Henshaw, may
I present my friends?  Miss Meade and Mr. Darrin."

The introduction was pleasantly acknowledged all around.  Miss
Henshaw proved wholly well-bred and at ease.

"Won't you join us here?" asked Dalzell, trying hard to conceal
the fact that he didn't want any third and fourth parties.

"I know you'll excuse us," answered Dave, bowing, "and I feel
certain that I am running counter to Miss Meade's wishes.  But
I have so little opportunity to talk to her that I'm going to
beg you to excuse us.  I'm going to be selfish and entice Miss
Meade away to the furthest corner."

That other table was so far away that Dave and Belle could converse
in low tones without the least danger of being overheard.  There
were, at that time, no other patrons in the place.

"Well, Belle, what do you think of the lady, now that you've seen
her?"

"You've named her," replied Belle quietly.  "Dan's new friend
is beyond any doubt a lady."

"Then Dan is safe, at last."

"I'm not so sure of that," Belle answered.

"But, if she's really a lady, she must be safe company for Dan."

Belle smiled queerly before she responded:

"I'm afraid Dan is in for a tremendous disappointment."

"In the lady's character?" pressed Darrin.

"Oh, indeed, no."

"Wait and see."

"But I'd rather know now."

"I'll tell you what I mean before you say good-bye this afternoon,"
Belle promised.

"By Jove, but I am afraid that is going to be too late," murmured
Midshipman Darrin.  "Unless I'm greatly misled as to the meaning
of the light that has suddenly come into Danny's eyes, he's proposing
to her now!"

"Oh!" gasped Belle, and the small spoonful of cream that was passing
down her throat threatened to strangle her.

"Dave, how old do you think Miss Henshaw is?" asked Miss Meade,
as soon as she could trust herself to speak.

"Twenty, I suppose."

"You don't know much about women's ages, then, do you?" smiled
Belle.

"I don't suppose I've any business to know."

"Miss Henshaw is a good many years older than Dan."

"She doesn't look it," urged Dave.

"But she is.  Trust another woman to know!"

"There, by Jove!" whispered Dave.  "It has started.  Danny is
running under the wire!  I can tell by his face that he has just
started to propose."

"Poor boy!  He'll have an awful fall!" muttered Belle.

"Why do you say that?  But, say!  You're right, Belle.  Dan's
face has turned positively ghastly.  He looks worse than he could
if he'd just failed to graduate."

"Naturally," murmured Belle.  "Poor boy, I'm sorry for him."

"But what's the matter?"

"Did you notice Miss Henshaw's jewelry?"

"Not particularly.  I can see, from here, that she's wearing a
small diamond in each ear."

"Dave, didn't you see the flat gold band that she wears on the
third finger of her left hand?" Belle demanded in a whisper.

"No," confessed Midshipman Darrin innocently.  "But what has that
to do with---"

"Her wedding ring," Belle broke in.  "Dan has gotten her title
twisted.  She's Mrs. Henshaw."

"Whew!  But what, in that case, is she doing strolling around
with a midshipman?  That's no proper business for a married woman,"
protested Dave Darrin.

"Haven't you called on or escorted any married women since you've
been at Annapolis?" demanded Belle bluntly.

"Yes; certainly," nodded Dave.  "But, in every instance they were
wives of Naval officers, and such women looked upon midshipmen
as mere little boys."

"Isn't there an Admiral Henshaw in the Navy?" inquired Belle.

"Certainly."

"That's Mrs. Henshaw," Belle continued.

"How do you know?"

"I don't, but I'm certain, just the same.  Now, Dan has met Mrs.
Henshaw somewhere down at the Naval Academy.  He heard her name
and got it twisted into Miss Henshaw.  It's his own blundering
fault, no doubt.  But Admiral Henshaw's young and pretty wife
is not to be blamed for allowing a boyish midshipman to stroll
with her as her escort."

"Whew!" whistled Dave Darrin under his breath.  "So Dan has been
running it blind again?  Oh, Belle, it's a shame!  I'm heartily
sorry that we've been here to witness the poor old chap's Waterloo."

"So am I," admitted Belle.  "But the harm that has been done is
due to Dan's own blindness.  He should learn to read ordinary
signs as he runs."

No wonder Dan Dalzell's face had gone gray and ashy.  For the
time being he was feeling keenly.  He had been so sure of "Miss"
Henshaw's being a splendid woman---as, indeed, she was---that
he decided on this, their third meeting, to try his luck with
a sailor's impetuous wooing.  In other words, he had plumply asked
the admiral's wife to marry him;

"Why, you silly boy!" remonstrated Mrs. Henshaw, glancing up at
him with a dismayed look.  "I don't know your exact age, Mr. Dalzell,
but I think it probable that I am at least ten years older than---"

"I don't care," Dan maintained bravely.

"Besides, what would the admiral say?"

"Is he your father or your brother?" Dan inquired.

"My husband!"

Then it was that Midshipman Dalzell's face had gone so suddenly
gray.  He fairly gasped and felt as though he were choking.

"Mr. Dalzell," spoke Mrs. Henshaw, earnestly, "let us both forget
that you ever spoke such unfortunate words.  Let us forget it
all, and let it pass as though nothing had happened at all.  I
will confess that, two or three times, I thought you addressed
me as 'miss.' I believed it to be only a slip of the tongue.
I didn't dream that you didn't know.  Even if I were a single
woman I wouldn't think of encouraging you for a moment, for I
am much---much---too old for you.  And now, let us immediately
forget it all, Mr. Dalzell.  Shall we continue our stroll?"

Somehow the dazed midshipman managed to reply gracefully, and
to follow his fair companion from Wiegard's.

"Poor Dan!" sighed Dave.  "I'll wager that's the worst crusher
that Dalzell ever had.  But how do you read so much at a glance,
Belle?"

"By keeping my eyes moderately well opened," that young woman
answered simply.

"I wonder where poor Dan's adventures in search of a wife are
going to end up?" mused Darrin.

"He'd better accept the course that you outlined for him a little
while ago," half smiled Belle.  "Dan's very best course will be
to devote his thoughts wholly to his profession for a few years,
and wait until the right woman comes along and chooses him for
herself.  You may tell Dan, from me, some time, if it won't hurt
his feelings, that I think his only safe course is to shut his
eyes and let the woman do the choosing."

"I must be a most remarkably fine fellow myself," remarked Midshipman
Darrin modestly.

"Why do you think that?"

"Why, a girl with eyes as sharp as yours, Belle, would never have
accepted me if there had been a visible flaw on me anywhere."

"There are no very pronounced flaws except those that I can remedy
when I take charge of you, Dave," replied Belle with what might
have been disconcerting candor.

"Then I'm lucky in at least one thing," laughed Darrin good-humoredly.
"When my turn comes I shall be made over by a most capable young
woman.  Then I shall be all but flawless."

"Or else I shall take a bride's privilege," smiled Belle demurely,
"and go back to mother."

"You'll have plenty of time for that," teased Dave.  "A Naval
officer's time is spent largely at sea, and he can't take his
wife with him."

"Don't remind me of that too often," begged Belle, a plaintive
note in her voice.  "Your being at sea so much is the only flaw
that I see in the future.  And, as neither of us will be rich,
I can't follow you around the world much of the time."

When Midshipman Dave Darrin reentered his quarters late that afternoon
be found Dan Dalzell sitting back in a chair, his hands thrust
deep into his pockets.  His whole attitude was one of most unmilitary
dejection.

"Dave, I've run the ship aground again," Dan confessed ruefully.

"I know you have, Danny," Darrin replied sympathetically.

Dan Dalzell bounded to his feet.

"What?" he gasped.  "Is the story going the rounds?"

"It can't be."

"Then did you hear what we were saying this afternoon in Wiegard's?"

"No; we were too far away for that.  But I judged that you had
succeeded in making Mrs. Henshaw feel very uncomfortable for a
few moments."

"Then you knew she was a married woman, Dave?"

"No; but Belle did."

"How, I---wonder?"

"She saw the wedding ring on Mrs. Henshaw's left hand."

Dan Dalzell looked the picture of amazement.  Then he whistled
in consternation.

"By the great Dewey!" he groaned hoarsely.  "I never thought of
that!"

"No; but you should have done so."

"Dave, I'm the biggest chump in the world.  Will you do me a supreme
favor---kick me?"

"That would be too rough, Dan.  But, if you can stand it, Belle
offered me some good advice for you in your affairs with women."

"Thank her for me, when you get a chance, but I don't need it,"
replied Dan bitterly.  "I'm through with trying to find a sweetheart,
or any candidate to become Mrs. Dalzell."

"But you'd better listen to the advice," Dave insisted, and repeated
what Belle had said.

"By Jove, Dave, but you're lucky to be engaged to a sensible girl
like Belle!  I wish there was another like her in the world."

"Why?"

"If there were another like Belle I'd be sorely tempted to try my \
luck for the fourth time."

"Dan Dalzell!" cried Dave sternly.  "You're not safe without a
guardian!  You'll do it again, between now and graduation."

"You can watch me, if you want, then; but I'll fool you," smiled
Dan.  "But say, Dave!"

"Well?"

"You don't suppose Belle will say anything about this back in
Gridley, do you?  By Jove, if she does I'd feel-----

"You'll feel something else," warned Dave snappily, "if you don't
at once assure me that you know Belle too well to think that she'd
make light of your misfortunes."

"But sometimes girls tell one another some things-----"

"Belle Meade doesn't," interrupted Dave so briskly that Dalzell,
after a glance, agreed:

"You're right there, David, little giant.  I've known Belle ever
since we were kids at the Central Grammar School.  If Belle ever
got into any trouble through too free use of her tongue, then I
never heard anything about it."

"Dan, do you want a fine suggestion about the employment of the
rest of your liberty time while we're at Annapolis?"

"Yes."

"You remember Barnes's General History, that we used to have in
Grammar school?"

"Yes."

"Devote your liberty time to reading the book through again."




CHAPTER XXI

IN THE THICK OF DISASTER


Examination week---torture of the "wooden" and seventh heaven of
the "savvy!"

For the wooden man, he who knows little, this week of final
examinations is a period of unalloyed torture.  He must go before
an array of professors who are there to expose his ignorance.

No "wooden" man can expect to get by.  The gates of hope are closed
before his face.  He marches to the ordeal, full of a dull misery.
Whether he is fourth classman or first, he knows that hope has
fled; that he will go below the saving 2.5 mark and be dropped
from the rolls.

But your "savvy" midshipman---he who knows much, and who is sure
and confident with his knowledge, finds this week of final examinations
a period of bliss and pride.  He is going to "pass"; he knows that,
and nothing else matters.

Eight o'clock every morning, during this week, finds the midshipman
in one recitation room or another, undergoing his final.  As it
is not the purpose of the examiners to wear any man out, the afternoon
is given over to pleasures.  There are no afternoon examinations,
and no work of any sort that can be avoided.  Indeed, the "savvy"
man has a week of most delightful afternoons, with teas, lawn
parties, strolls both within and without the walls of the Academy
grounds, and many boating parties.  It is in examination week
that the young ladies flock to Annapolis in greater numbers than
ever.

Sometimes the "wooden" midshipman, knowing there is no further hope
for him, rushes madly into the pleasures of this week, determined to
carry back into civil life with him the memories of as many
Annapolis pleasures as possible.

A strong smattering there is of midshipmen who, by no means "savvy,"
are yet not so "wooden" but that they hope, by hard study at the
last to pull through on a saving margin in marks.

These desperate ones do not take part in the afternoon pleasures,
for these midshipmen, with furrowed brows, straining eyes, feverish
skin and dogged determination, spend their afternoons and evenings
in one final assault on their text-books in the hope of pulling
through.

Dave Darrin was not one of the honor men of his class, but he
was "savvy" just the same.  Dan Dalzell was a few notches lower
in the class standing, but Dan was as sure of graduation as was
his chum.

"One thing goes for me, this week," announced Dan, just before
the chums hustled out to dinner formation on Monday.

"What's that?" Dave wanted to know.  "No girls; no tender promenades!"
grumbled Midshipman Dalzell.

"Poor old chap," muttered Dave sympathetically.

"Oh, that's all right for you," grunted Dan.  "You have one of
the 'only' girls, and so you're safe."

"There are more 'only' girls than you've any idea of, Dan Dalzell,"
Dave retorted with spirit.  "The average American girl is a mighty
fine, sweet, wholesome proposition."

"I'll grant that," nodded Dan, with a knowing air.  "But I've
made an important discovery concerning the really fine girls."

"Produce the discovery," begged Darrin.  "The really fine girl,"
announced Dan, in a hollow voice, "prefers some other fellow to me."

"Well, I guess that'll be a fine idea for you to nurse---until
after graduation," reflected Darrin aloud.  "I'm not going to
seek to undeceive you, Danny boy."

So Dave went off to meet Belle and her mother, while Dan Dalzell
hunted up another first classman who also believed that the girls
didn't particularly esteem him.  That other fellow was Midshipman
Jetson.

"Mrs. Davis is giving a lawn party this afternoon," announced
Dave, after he had lifted his cap in greeting of Mrs. Meade and
her daughter.  "I have an invitation from Mrs. Davis to escort
you both over to her house.  Of course, if you find the tea and
chatter a bit dull over there, we can go somewhere else presently."

"I never find anything dull that is a part of the life here,"
returned Belle, little enthusiast for the Navy.  "It will suit
you, mother?"

"Anything at all will suit me," declared Mrs. Meade amiably.
"David, just find me some place where I can drop into an armchair
and have some other middle-aged woman like myself to talk with.
Then you young people need pay no further heed to me.  Examination
week doesn't last forever."

"It doesn't," laughed Darrin, "and many of our fellows are very
thankful for that."

"How are you going to come through?" Belle asked, with a quick
little thrill of anxiety.

"Nothing to worry about on that score," Dave assured her.  "I'm
sufficiently 'savvy' to pull sat. all right."

"Isn't that fine?  And Dan?"

"Oh, he'll finish sat., too, if he doesn't sight another craft
flying pink hair ribbons."

"Any danger of that?" asked Belle anxiously, for Dan was a townsman
of hers.

"Not judging by the company that Dan is keeping to-day," smiled
Darrin.

"Who is his companion to-day, then?"

"Jetson, a woman hater."

"Really a woman hater?" asked Belle.

"Oh, no; Jet wouldn't poison all girls, or do anything like that.
He isn't violent against girls.  In fact, he's merely shy when
they're around.  But in the service any fellow who isn't always
dancing attendance on the fair is doomed to be dubbed a woman
hater.  In other words, a woman hater is just a fellow who doesn't
pester girls all the time."

"Are you a woman hater?" Belle asked.

"Except when you are at Annapolis," was Dave's ready explanation.

That afternoon's lawn party proved a much more enjoyable affair
than the young people had expected.  Belle met there, for the
first time, five or six girls with whom she was to be thrown often
later on.

When it was over, Dave, having town liberty as well, proudly escorted
his sweetheart and her mother back to the hotel.

There were more days like it.  Dave, by Thursday, realizing that
he was coming through his morning trials with flying colors, had
arranged permission to take out a party in one of the steamers.

As the steamer could be used only for a party Darrin invited Farley
and Wolgast to bring their sweethearts along.  Mrs. Meade at first
demurred about going.

"You and Belle have had very little time together," declared that
good lady, "and I'm not so old but that I remember my youth.
With so large a party there's no need of a chaperon."

"But we'd immensely like to have you come," urged Dave; "that
is, unless you'd be uncomfortable on the water."

"Oh, I'm never uncomfortable on the water," Belle's mother replied.

"Then you'll come, won't you?" pleaded Dave.  Belle's mother made
one of the jolly party.

"You'd better come, too, Danny boy," urged Dave at the last moment.
"There'll be no unattached girl with the party, so you'll be
vastly safer with us than you would away from my watchful eye."

"Huh!  A fine lot your watchful eye has been on me this week,"
retorted Midshipman Dalzell.  "Jetson has been my grandmother
this week."

It was a jolly party that steamed down Chesapeake Bay in the launch
that afternoon.  There was an enlisted man of the engineer department
at the engine, while a seaman acted as helmsman.

"Straight down the bay, helmsman," Dave directed, as the launch
headed out.

"Aye, aye, sir," replied the man, touching his cap.

After that the young people---Mrs. Meade was included under that
heading---gave themselves over to enjoyment.  Belle, with a quiet
twinkle in her eyes that was born of the love of teasing, tried
very hard to draw Mr. Jetson out, thereby causing that young man
to flush many times.

Dan, from the outset, played devoted squire to Mrs. Meade.  That
was safe ground for him.

"What's that party in the sailboat yonder?" inquired Mrs. Meade,
when the steamer had been nearly an hour out.  "Are the young
men midshipman or officers?"

Dave raised to his eyes the glasses with which the steamer was
equipped.

"They're midshipmen," he announced.  "Gray and Lambert, of our
class, and Haynes and Whipple of the second class."

"They've young ladies with them."

"Certainly."

"Isn't it rather risky for midshipmen to have control of the boat,
then, with no older man along?" asked Mrs. Meade.

"It ought not to be," Dave replied.  "Midshipmen of the upper
classes are expected to be familiar with the handling of sailboats."

"Those fellows are getting careless, at any rate," muttered Dan
Dalzell.  "Look at the way that sail is behaving.  Those fellows
are paying too much attention to the girls and too little heed
to the handling of the craft!"

Even as Dalzell spoke the helm was jammed over and the boat started
to come about.

"Confound Lambert!  He ought to ease off his sheet a good bit,"
snapped Midshipman Dalzell.

"Helmsman, point our boat so as to pass under the other craft's
stern," spoke Darrin so quietly that only Dan and Belle overheard
him.

"Aye, aye, sir," murmured the helmsman, in a very low voice.
Dave signaled the engineman silently to increase the speed.

"There the boat goes, the sail caught by a cross current of air!"
called Midshipman Dalzell almost furiously.

The girls aboard the sailboat now cried out in alarm as they felt
the extreme list of the boat under them.  All too late Midshipman
Gray Sprang for the sheet to ease it off.

Too late!  In another moment the sailboat had capsized, the mast
nearly snapping in the blow over.

"Make haste---do!" cried Mrs. Meade, rising in the steamer.

But the steamer was already under increased headway, and the helmsman
had to make but a slight turn to bear down directly to the scene
of the disaster.

Three midshipmen could be seen floundering in the water, each
steadily supporting the head of a girl.  But the fourth, midshipman
was floundering about wildly.  Then he disappeared beneath the
water.

"That young man has given up and gone down!" cried Mrs. Meade,
whom Dave had just persuaded to resume her seat.

"No," Dave assured her.  "Gray isn't drowning.  But his girl companion
is missing, and he has dived to find her."

"Then the girl is lost!" quivered Mrs. Meade.

"No; I think not.  Gray is a fine swimmer, and will find Miss
Butler before she has been under too long a time."

Then Dave rose, for he was commander here.  "Danny boy, throw
off your shoes and blouse and cap.  The rest stand by the boat
to give such aid as you can.  Ladies, you'll excuse us."

Thereupon Dave Darrin doffed his own cap, blouse and shoes.  He
and Dalzell were the two best swimmers in the party, and it looked
as though there would be work ahead for them to do.

In another moment the steamer was on the scene, and speed was
shut off.  Lambert, Haynes and Whipple, with their girl companions,
were speedily reached and hauled aboard.

Then Gray came up, but alone.

"Hasn't Pauline come up?" he gasped in terror.

"No," Darrin replied shortly, but in a voice laden with sympathy.

"Then I've got to down again," replied Gray despairingly.  "I'd
better stay down, too."

He sank instantly, a row of bubbles coming up at the spot where
he had vanished.

"The poor, unfortunate fellow!  He won't really attempt to drown
himself, will he, if he doesn't find his young woman friend?"
inquired Mrs. Meade.

"No," Dave answered without turning.  "And we wouldn't allow him
to do so, either."

Dave waited but a brief interval, this time.  Then, as Midshipman
Gray did not reappear, he called:

"Danby!"

"Yes, sir," replied the enlisted man by the engine.

"Hustle forward and rig a rope loop to the anchor cable.  How
long is the anchor?"

"About three feet, sir."

"Then rig the loop two feet above the mudhook."

"Yes, sir."

"Hustle!"

"Yes, sir."

"Is Gray trying to stay under?  Trying to drown himself as a sign
of his repentance?" whispered Wolgast in Dave's ear.  But Darrin
shook his head.  An instant later Gray shot up to the surface---alone!

"Come aboard," ordered Dave Darrin, but he did not rely entirely
on coaxing.  Snatching up a boat-hook he fastened it in Gray's
collar and drew that midshipman alongside, where many ready hands
stretched out and hauled him aboard.

Two of the rescued young women were now sobbing almost hysterically.

"If you won't let me stay in the water, won't some of the rest of
you do something?" demanded Midshipman Gray hoarsely.

"We're going to," nodded Dave.  "Danby!"

"Yes, sir."

"Let go the anchor."

"Very good, sir."

"Follow me, Dan," directed Dave.  The anchor went overboard while
the two midshipmen were hustling forward.

"I'm going down first, Danny," explained Dave.  "Follow whenever
you may think you need to, but don't be in too big a hurry.  Use
good judgment."

"Trust me," nodded Dan hoarsely.

With that Dave seized the visible part of the anchor cable and
went down, forcing himself toward the bottom by holding to the
cable.  It was a difficult undertaking, as, after he had gone
part of the way, the buoyancy of the water fought against his
efforts to go lower.  But Midshipman Darrin still gripped hard
at the cable, fighting foot by foot.  His eyes open, at last he
sighted the loop near the anchor.  With a powerful effort he reached
that loop, thrusting his left arm through it.  The strain almost
threatened to break that arm, but Dave held grimly, desperately on.

Now he looked about him.  Fortunately there was no growth of seaweed
at this point, and he could see clearly for a distance of quite
a few yards around him.

"Queer what can have become of the body!" thought Darrin.  "But
then, the boat has drifted along slightly, and Miss Butler may
have sunk straight down.  She may be lying or floating here just
out of my range of vision.  I wish I could let go and strike out,
but I'd only shoot up to the surface after a little."

Many a shadow in the deep water caused Darrin to start and peer
the harder, only to find that he had been deceived.

At that depth the weight of the water pressed dangerously upon
his head and in his ears.  Dave felt his senses leaving him.

"I'd sooner die than give up easily!" groaned the young midshipman,
and he seemed about to have his wish.




CHAPTER XXII

THE SEARCH AT THE BOTTOM OF THE BAY


By the strongest effort of the will that he could make, Darrin
steadied himself and forced his eyes once more open.

Drifting toward him, two feet above his head, was what looked like
another shadow.  It came closer.

At the first thought Darrin was inclined not to believe his senses.

"I'll have to go up, after all, and let Dan have his chance.  I'm
seeing things," Dave decided.

For, though the object floating toward him had some of the semblance
of a skirt-clad figure, yet it looked all out of proportion---perhaps
twice the size of Pauline Butler.

That was a trick of the scanty light coming through the water
at an angle---this coupled with Darrin's own fatigue of the eyes.

Closer it came, and looked a bit smaller.

"It is a girl---a woman---some human being!" throbbed Dave internally.

Now, though his head seeming bursting, Dave hung on more tightly
than ever.  The drift of the water was bringing the body slowly
nearer to him.  He must hold on until he could let himself strike
upward, seizing that body in his progress.

At last the moment arrived.  Dave felt a hard tug at the cable,
but he did not at that instant realize that Dan Dalzell had just
started down from the steamer.

Dave judged that the right instant had come.  He let go of the
loop, and was shot upward.  But, as he moved, his spread arms
caught hold of the floating figure.

Up to within a few feet of the surface Darrin and his burden moved
easily.  Then he found it necessary to kick out hard with his
feet.  Thus he carried the burden clear, to the open air above,
though at a distance of some forty feet from the steamer.

"There they are!" Farley's voice was heard calling, and there
was a splash.

"Bully for you, old fellow!  Hold her up, and I'm with you!" hailed
Midshipman Farley.

In another moment Dave Darrin had been eased of his human burden,
and Farley was swimming to the steamer with the senseless form
of Pauline Butler.

Darrin tried to swim, and was astounded at finding himself so
weak in the water.  He floated, propelling himself feebly with
his hands, completely exhausted.

Just at that moment nearly every eye was fixed on Farley and his
motionless burden, and many pairs of hands stretched out to receive
them.

Yet the gaze of one alert pair of eyes was fixed on Darrin, out
there beyond.

"Now, you'd better look after Dave," broke in the quiet, clear
voice of Belle Meade.  "I think he needs help."

Wolgast went over the side in an instant, grappling with Midshipman
Darrin and towing him to the side of the boat.

"All in!" cried Midshipman Gray jubilantly.

"Except Dan.  Where's he?" muttered Dave weakly, as he sat on
one of the side seats.

"I'll signal him," muttered Wolgast, and hastened forward to the
anchor cable.  This he seized and shook clumsily several times.
The vibrated motion must have been imparted downward, for soon
Dan Dalzell's head came above water.

"Everyone all right?" called Dan, as soon as he had gulped in
a mouthful of air.

"O.K." nodded Wolgast.  "Come alongside and let me haul you in."

"You let me alone," muttered Dalzell, coming alongside and grasping
the rail.  "Do you think a short cold bath makes me too weak to
attend to myself?"

With that Dan drew himself aboard.  Back in the cockpit Mrs. Meade
and some of the girls were in frenzied way doing their best to
revive Pauline Butler, who, at the present moment, showed no signs
of life.

"Let me take charge of this reviving job.  I've taken several
tin medals in first aid to the injured," proclaimed Farley modestly.

In truth the midshipman had a decided knack for this sort of work.
He assailed it with vigor, making a heap of life preservers,
and over these placing Miss Butler, head downward.  Then Farley
took vigorous charge of the work of "rolling" out the water that
Miss Butler must have taken into her system.

"Get anchor up and start the steamer back to Annapolis at the
best speed possible," ordered Dave, long before he could talk
in a natural voice.

Wolgast and Dan aided Danny in hoisting the anchor.  Steam was
crowded on and the little craft cut a swift, straight path for
Annapolis.

"Pauline is opening her eyes!" cried Farley, after twenty minutes
more of vigorous work in trying to restore the girl.

The girl's eyes merely fluttered, though, as a slight sigh escaped
her.  The eyelids fell again, and there was but a trace of motion
at the pulse.

"We mustn't lose the poor child, now that we've succeeded in proving
a little life there," cried Mrs. Meade anxiously.

"Now, that's what I call a reflection on the skill of Dr. Farley,"
protested that midshipman in mock indignation.  It was necessary,
at any amount of trouble, to keep these women folks on fair spirits
until Annapolis was reached.  Then, perhaps, many of them would
faint.

All of the dry jackets of midshipmen aboard had been thrown
protectingly around the girls who had been in the water.

"Torpedo boat ahead, sir," reported the helmsman.

"Give her the distress signal to lie to," directed Dave.

The engine's whistle sent out the shrieking appeal over the waters.
The destroyer was seen to heave about and come slowly to meet
the steamer.

Long before the two craft had come together Dave Darrin was standing,
holding to one of the awning stanchions, for he was not yet any too
strong.

"Destroyer, ahoy!" he shouted as loudly as he could between his
hands.  "Have you a surgeon aboard?"

"Yes," came back the answer.

"Let us board you, sir!"

"What's-----"

But Dave had turned to the helmsman with:

"Steam up alongside.  Lose no time."

In a very short space of time the destroyer was reached and the
steamer ran alongside.  The unconscious form of Miss Butler was
passed up over the side, followed by the other members of the
sailboat party.  Mrs. Meade followed, in case she could be of
any assistance.

"You may chaperon your party of young ladies in the steamer, Belle,"
smiled Mrs. Meade from the deck of the destroyer.  "I give you
express authority over them."

Farley's and Wolgast's sweethearts laughed merrily at this.  All
hands had again reached the point where laughter came again to
their lips without strong effort.  Pauline Butler was safe under
the surgeon's hands, if anywhere.

Then the destroyers pulled out again, hitting a fast clip for
Annapolis.

"That's the original express boat; this is only a cattle-carrier,"
muttered Dave, gazing after the fast destroyer.

"Calling us cattle, are you?" demanded Belle.  "As official chaperon
I must protest on behalf of the young ladies aboard."

"A cattle boat often carries human passengers," Dave returned.
"I call this a cattle boat only because of our speed."

"We don't need speed now," Belle answered.  "Those who do are
on board the destroyer."

By the time that the steamer reached her berth at the Academy
wall, and the young people had hastened ashore, they learned that
Pauline Butler had been removed to a hospital in Annapolis; that
she was very much alive, though still weak, and that in a day
or two she would again be all right.

With a boatswain's mate in charge, another steamer was despatched
down the bay to recover and tow home the capsized sailboat.

Examination week went through to its finish.  By Saturday night
the first classmen knew who had passed.  But two of the members
of the class had "bilged."  Dave, Dan and all their close friends
in the class had passed and had no ordeal left at Annapolis save
to go through the display work of Graduation Week.

"You still have your two years at sea, though, before you're sure
of your commission," sighed Belle, as they rested between dances
that Saturday night.

"Any fellow who can live through four years at Annapolis can get
through the two years at sea and get his commission at last,"
laughed Dave Darrin happily.  "Have no fears, Belle, about my
being an ensign, if I have the good fortune to live two years
more."




CHAPTER XXIII

GRADUATION DAY---AT LAST


Graduation Week!

Now came the time when the Naval Academy was given over to the
annual display of what could be accomplished in the training of
midshipmen.

There were drills and parades galore, with sham battles in which
the sharp crack of rifle fire was punctured by the louder, steadier
booms of field artillery.  There were gun-pointing contests aboard
the monitors and other practice craft.

There were exhibitions of expert boat-handling, and less picturesque
performances at the machine shops and in the engine and dynamo
rooms.  There were other drills and exhibitions---enough of them
to weary the reader, as they doubtless did weary the venerable
members of a Board of Visitors appointed by the President.

On Wednesday night came the class german.  Now our young first
classmen were in for another thrill---the pleasure of wearing
officers' uniforms for the first time.

On graduation the midshipman is an officer of the Navy, though
a very humble one.  The graduated midshipman's uniform is a more
imposing affair than the uniform of a midshipman who is still
merely a member of the brigade at the Naval Academy.

On this Wednesday evening the new uniforms were of white, the
summer and tropical uniform of the Navy.  These were donned by
first classmen only in honor of the class german, which the members
of the three lower classes do not attend.

All the young Women attending were also attired wholly in white,
save for simple jewelry or coquettish ribbons.

Dave Darrin, of course, escorted Belle Meade with all the pride
in the world.  Most of the other midshipmen "dragged" young women
on this great evening.

Dan Dalzell did not.  He attended merely for the purpose of looking
on, save when he danced with Belle Meade.

On the following evening, after another tiresome day spent in
boring the Board of Visitors, came the evening promenade, a solemnly
joyous and very dressy affair.

Then came that memorable graduation morning, when so many dozens
of young midshipmen, since famous in the Navy, received their
diplomas.

Early the young men turned out.

"It seems queer to be turning out without arms, doesn't it?" grumbled
Dan Dalzell.

But it is the rule for the graduating class to turn out without
arms on this one very grand morning.  The band formed on the right
of line.  Next to them marched to place the graduating class,
minus arms.  Then the balance of the brigade under arms.

When the word was given a drum or two sounded the step, and off
the brigade marched, slowly and solemnly.  A cornet signal, followed
by a drum roll, and then the Naval Academy Band crashed into the
joyous march, consecrated to this occasion, "Ain't I glad I'm
out of the wilderness!"

"Amen!  Indeed I'm glad," Dave Darrin murmured devoutly under
his breath.  "There has been many a time in the last four years
when I didn't expect to graduate.  But now it's over.  Nothing
can stop Dan or myself!"

Crowds surrounded the entrance to the handsome, classic chapel,
though the more favored crowds had already passed inside and filled
the seats that are set apart for spectators.

Inside filed the midshipmen, going to their seats in front. The
chaplain, in the hush that followed the seating, rose, came forward
and in a voice husky with emotion urged:

"Friends, let us pray for the honor, success, glory and steadfast
manhood through life of the young men who are about to go forth
with their diplomas."

Every head was bowed while the chaplain's petition ascended.

When the prayer was over the superintendent, in full dress uniform,
stepped to the front of the rostrum and made a brief address.
Sailors are seldom long-winded talkers.  The superintendent's
address, on this very formal occasion, lasted barely four minutes.
But what he said was full of earnest manhood and honest patriotism.

Then the superintendent dropped to his chair.  There were not
so very many dry eyes when the choir beautifully intoned:

"God be with you till we meet again!"

But now another figure appeared on the rostrum.  Though few of
the young men had ever seen this new-comer, they knew him by instinct.
At a signal from an officer standing at the side of the chapel,
the members of the brigade broke forth into thunderous hurrahs.
For this man, now about to address them, was their direct chief.

"Gentlemen and friends," announced the superintendent, "I take
the greatest pleasure that may come to any of us in introducing
our chief---the Secretary of the Navy."

And now other officers appeared on the rostrum, bearing diplomas
and arranging them in order.

The name of the man to graduate first in his class was called.
He went forward and received his diploma from the Secretary,
who said:

"Mr. Ennerly, it is, indeed, a high honor to take first place
in such a class as yours!"

Ennerly, flushed and proud, returned to his seat amid applause
from his comrades.

And so there was a pleasant word for each midshipman as he went
forward.

When the Secretary picked up the seventeenth diploma he called:

"David Darrin!"

Who was the most popular man in the brigade of midshipmen?  The
midshipmen themselves now endeavored to answer the question by
the tremendous explosions of applause with which they embarrassed
Dave as he went forward.

"Mr. Darrin," smiled the Secretary, "there are no words of mine
that can surpass the testimonial which you have just received
from your comrades.  But I will add that we expect tremendous
things from you, sir, within the next few years.  You have many
fine deeds and achievements to your credit here, sir.  Within
the week you led in a truly gallant rescue human life down the
bay.  Mr. Darrin, in handing you your well-earned diploma, I take
upon myself the liberty of congratulating your parents on their
son!"

As Dave returned to his seat with his precious sheepskin the elder
Darrin, who was in the audience, took advantage of the renewed
noises of applause to clear his throat huskily several times.
Dave's mother honestly used her handkerchief to dry the tears of
pride that were in her eyes.

Another especial burst of applause started when Daniel Dalzell,
twenty-first in his class, was called upon to go forward.

"I didn't believe Danny Grin would ever get through," one first
classman confided behind his hand to another.  "I expected that
the upper classmen would kill Danny Grin before he ever got over
being a fourth classman."

But here was Dan coming back amid more applause, his graduation
number high enough to make it practically certain that he would
be a rear admiral one of these days when he had passed the middle
stage of life in the service.

One by one the other diplomas were given out, each accompanied
by some kindly message from the Secretary of the Navy, which,
if remembered and observed, would be of great value to the graduate
at some time in the future.

The graduating exercises did not last long.  To devote too much
time to them would be to increase the tension.

Later in the day the graduated midshipmen again appeared.  They
were wearing their new coats now, several inches longer in the
tail, and denoting them as real officers in the Navy.  A non-graduate
midshipman must salute one of these graduates whenever they meet.

In their room, to be occupied but one night more, Dave and Dan
finished dressing in their new uniforms at the same moment.

"Shake, Danny boy!" cried Dave Darrin, holding out his hand.
"How does it seem, at last, to know that you're really an officer
in the Navy?"

"Great!" gulped Dalzell.  "And I don't mind admitting that, during
the last four years, I've had my doubts many a time that this great
day would ever come for we.  But get your cap's and let's hustle
outside."

"Why this unseemly rush, Danny?"

"I want to round up a lot of under classmen and make them tire
their arms out saluting me."

"Your own arm will ache, too, then, Danny.  You are obliged, as
of course you know, to return every salute."

"Hang it, yes!  There's a pebble in every pickle dish, isn't there?"

"You're going to the graduation ball tonight, of course?"

"Oh, surely," nodded Dalzell.  "After working as I've worked for
four years for the privilege, I'd be a fool to miss it.  But I'll
sneak away early, after I've done a friend's duty by you and Belle.
No girls for me until I'm a captain in the Navy!"

The ball room was a scene of glory that night.  Bright eyes shone
unwontedly, and many a heart fluttered.  For Belle Meade was not
the only girl there who was betrothed to a midshipman.  Any graduate
who chose might marry as soon as he pleased, but nearly all the
men of the class preferred to wait until they had put in their
two years at sea and had won their commissions as ensigns.

"This must be a night of unalloyed pleasure to you," murmured
Belle, as she and her young officer sweetheart sat out one dance.
"You can look back over a grand four years of life here."

"I don't know that I'd have the nerve to go through it all again,"
Darrin answered her honestly.

"You don't have to," Belle laughed happily.  "You put in your
later boyhood here, and now your whole life of manhood is open
before you."

"I'll make the best use of that manhood that is possible for me,"
Dave replied solemnly.

"You must have formed some wonderful friendships here."

"I have."

"And, I suppose," hesitated Belle, "a few unavoidable enmities."

"I don't know about that," Dave replied promptly and with energy.
"I can't think of a fellow here that I wouldn't be ready and
glad to shake hands with.  I hope---I trust---that all of the
fellows in the brigade feel the same way about me."




CHAPTER XXIV

CONCLUSION


There was one more formation yet---one more meal to be eaten under
good old Bancroft Hall.

But right after breakfast the graduates, each one now in brand-new
cit. attire, began to depart in droves.

Some went to the earliest train; others stopped at the hotels
and boarding houses in town to pick up relatives and friends with
whom the gladsome home journey was to be made.

"I don't like you as well in cits.," declared Belle, surveying
Dave critically in the hotel parlor.

"In the years to come," smiled Dave, "you'll see quite enough
of me in uniform."

"I don't know about that," Belle declared, her honest soul shining
in her eyes.  "Do you feel that you'll ever see enough of me?"

"I know that I won't," Dave rejoined.  "You have one great relief
in prospect," smiled Belle.  "Whenever you do grow tired of me
you can seek orders to some ship on the other side of the world."

"The fact that I can't be at home regularly," answered Midshipman
Darrin, "is going to be the one cloud on our happiness.  Never
fear my seeking orders that take me from home---unless in war
time.  Then, of course, every Naval officer must burn the wires
with messages begging for a fighting appointment."

"I'm not afraid of your fighting record, if the need ever comes,"
replied Belle proudly.  "And, Dave, though my heart breaks, I'll
never show you a tear in my eyes if you're starting on a fighting
cruise."

Mrs. Meade and Dave's parents now entered the room, and soon after
Danny Grin, who had gone in search of his own father and mother,
returned with them.

"What are we going to do now?" asked Mr. Darrin.  "I understand
that we have hours to wait for the next train."

"We can't do much, sir," replied Dave.  "Within another hour this
will be the deadest town in the United States."

"I should think you young men would want to spend most of the
intervening time down at the Naval Academy, looking over the familiar
spots once more," suggested Mrs. Dalzell.

"Then I'm afraid, mother, that you don't realize much of the way
that a midshipman feels.  The Naval Academy is our alma mater,
and a beloved spot.  Yet, after what I've been through there during
the last few years I don't want to see the Naval Academy again.
At least, not until I've won a solid step or two in the way of
promotion."

"That's the feeling of all the graduates, I reckon," nodded Dave
Darrin.  "For one, I know I don't want to go back there to-day."

"Some day you will go back there, though," observed Danny Grin.

"Why are you so sure?" Dave asked.

"Well, you were always such a stickler for observing the rules
that the Navy Department will have to send you there for some
post or other.  Probably you'll go back as a discipline officer."

"I would have one advantage over you, then, wouldn't I?" laughed
Darrin.  "If I had to rebuke a midshipman I could do it with a
more serious face than you could."

"I can't help my face," sighed Danny Grin.

"You see, Dave," Mr. Dalzell observed, with a smile, "Dan inherited
his face."

"From his father's side of the family," promptly interposed Mrs.
Dalzell.

Here Mr. Farley, also in cits., entered the parlor in his dignified
fashion.

"Darry, and you, too, Danny Grin, some of the fellows are waiting
outside to see you.  Will you step out a moment?"

"Where are the fellows?" asked Dave unsuspectingly.

"You'll find them on the steps outside the entrance."

Dave started for the door.

"You're wanted, too, Danny Grin, as I told you," Farley reminded
him.

"I'll be the Navy goat, then.  What's the answer?" inquired Midshipman
Dalzell.

"Run along, like a good little boy, and your curiosity will soon
be gratified."

Danny Grin looked as though he expected some joke, but he went
none the less.

Dave, first to reach the entrance, stepped through into the open.
As he did so he saw at least seventy-five of his recent classmates
grouped outside.

The instant they perceived their popular comrade the crowd of
graduates bellowed forth:

"N N N N,
A A A A,
V V V V,
Y Y Y Y,
NAVY!
Darrin!
Darrin!
Darrin!"

In another moment Danny Grin showed himself.  Back in his face
was hurled the volley:

"N N N N,
A A A A,
V V V V,
Y Y Y Y,
NAVY!
Grin!
Grin!
Grin!"

"Eh?" muttered Danny, when the last line reached him.  They were
unexpected.  Then, as be faced the laughing eyes down in the street,
Dalzell justified his nickname by one of those broad smiles that
had made him famous at the Naval Academy.

Dave Darrin waved his hand in thanks for the "Four-N" yell, the
surest sign of popularity, and vanished inside.  When he returned
to the parlor be found that Farley had conducted his parents and
friends to one of the parlor windows, from which, behind drawn
blinds, they had watched the scene and heard the uproar without
making themselves visible.

At noon the hotel dining room was overrun with midshipmen and
their friends, all awaiting the afternoon train.

But at last the time came to leave Annapolis behind in earnest.
Extra cars had been put on to handle the throng, for the "train,"
for the first few miles of the way, usually consists of but one
combination trolley car.

"You're leaving the good old place behind," murmured Belle, as
the car started.

"Never a graduate yet but was glad to leave Annapolis behind,"
replied Dave.

"It seems to me that you ought not to speak of the Naval Academy
in that tone."

"You'd understand, Belle, if you had been through every bit of
the four-year grind, always with the uncertainty ahead of you
of being able to get through and grad."

"Perhaps the strict discipline irked you, too," Miss Meade hinted.

"The strict discipline will be part of the whole professional
life ahead of me," Darrin responded.  "As to discipline, it's
even harder on some ships, where the old man is a stickler for
having things done just so."

"The old man?" questioned Belle.

"The 'old man' is the captain of a warship."

"It doesn't sound respectful."

"Yet it has always been the name given to the ship's captain,
and I don't suppose it will be changed in another hundred years.
How does it feel, Danny boy, going away for good?"

"Am I really going away for good?" grinned Dalzell.  "I thought
it was only a dream."

"Well, here's Odenton.  You'll be in Baltimore after another little
while, and then it will all seem more real."

"Nothing but Gridley will look real to me on this trip," muttered
Dan.  "Really, I'm growing sick for a good look at the old home
town."

"I wish you could put in the whole summer at home, Dan," sighed
his mother.  "But, of course, I know that you can't."

"No, mother; I'll have time to walk up and down the home streets
two or three times, and then orders will come from the Navy Department
to report aboard the ship to which I'm to be assigned.  Mother,
if you want to keep a boy at home you shouldn't allow him to go
to a place where he's taught that nothing on earth matters but
the Navy!"

Later in the afternoon the train pulled in at Baltimore.  It was
nearing dusk when the train pulled out of Philadelphia on its
way further north.

Yet the passage of time and the speeding of country past the ear
windows was barely noticed by the Gridley delegation.  There was
too much to talk about---too many plans to form for the next two
or three weeks of blissful leave before duty must commence again.

Here we will take leave of our young midshipmen for the present,
though we shall encounter them again as they toil on upward through
their careers.

We have watched Dave and Dan from their early teens.  We met them
first in the pages of the _"Grammar School Boys' Series."_  We know
what we know of them back in the days when they attended the Central
Grammar School and studied under that veteran of teachers, "Old
Dut," as he was affectionately known.

We saw them with the same chums, of Dick & Co., when that famous
sextette of schoolboys entered High School.  We are wholly familiar
with their spirited course in the High School.  We know how all
six of the youngsters of Dick & Co. made the name of Gridley famous
for clean and manly sports in general.

Our readers will yet hear from Dave and Dan occasionally.  They
appear in the pages of the _"Young Engineers' Series,"_ and also
in the volumes of the _"Boys of the Army Series."_

In this latter series our young friends will learn just how the
romance of Dave Darrin and Belle Meade developed; and they will
also come across the similar affair of Dick Prescott and Laura
Bentley.

Dave and Dan had, as they had expected, but a brief stay in the
home town.

Bright and early one morning a postman handed to each a long,
official envelope from the Navy Department.  In each instance
the envelope contained their orders to report aboard one of the
Navy's biggest battleships.

Our two midshipmen were fortunate in one respect.  Both were ordered
to the same craft, their to finish their early Naval educations
in two years of practical work as officers at sea ere they could
reach the grade of ensign and step into the ward-room.



***END OF THE PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK DAVE DARRIN'S FOURTH YEAR AT
ANNAPOLIS***


******* This file should be named 12775.txt or 12775.zip *******


This and all associated files of various formats will be found in:
http://www.gutenberg.net/1/2/7/7/12775



Updated editions will replace the previous one--the old editions
will be renamed.

Creating the works from public domain print editions means that no
one owns a United States copyright in these works, so the Foundation
(and you!) can copy and distribute it in the United States without
permission and without paying copyright royalties.  Special rules,
set forth in the General Terms of Use part of this license, apply to
copying and distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works to
protect the PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm concept and trademark.  Project
Gutenberg is a registered trademark, and may not be used if you
charge for the eBooks, unless you receive specific permission.  If you
do not charge anything for copies of this eBook, complying with the
rules is very easy.  You may use this eBook for nearly any purpose
such as creation of derivative works, reports, performances and
research.  They may be modified and printed and given away--you may do
practically ANYTHING with public domain eBooks.  Redistribution is
subject to the trademark license, especially commercial
redistribution.



*** START: FULL LICENSE ***

THE FULL PROJECT GUTENBERG LICENSE
PLEASE READ THIS BEFORE YOU DISTRIBUTE OR USE THIS WORK

To protect the Project Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting the free
distribution of electronic works, by using or distributing this work
(or any other work associated in any way with the phrase "Project
Gutenberg"), you agree to comply with all the terms of the Full Project
Gutenberg-tm License (available with this file or online at
http://gutenberg.net/license).


Section 1.  General Terms of Use and Redistributing Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic works

1.A.  By reading or using any part of this Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work, you indicate that you have read, understand, agree to
and accept all the terms of this license and intellectual property
(trademark/copyright) agreement.  If you do not agree to abide by all
the terms of this agreement, you must cease using and return or destroy
all copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in your possession.
If you paid a fee for obtaining a copy of or access to a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work and you do not agree to be bound by the
terms of this agreement, you may obtain a refund from the person or
entity to whom you paid the fee as set forth in paragraph 1.E.8.

1.B.  "Project Gutenberg" is a registered trademark.  It may only be
used on or associated in any way with an electronic work by people who
agree to be bound by the terms of this agreement.  There are a few
things that you can do with most Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works
even without complying with the full terms of this agreement.  See
paragraph 1.C below.  There are a lot of things you can do with Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works if you follow the terms of this agreement
and help preserve free future access to Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.  See paragraph 1.E below.

1.C.  The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation ("the Foundation"
or PGLAF), owns a compilation copyright in the collection of Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works.  Nearly all the individual works in the
collection are in the public domain in the United States.  If an
individual work is in the public domain in the United States and you are
located in the United States, we do not claim a right to prevent you from
copying, distributing, performing, displaying or creating derivative
works based on the work as long as all references to Project Gutenberg
are removed.  Of course, we hope that you will support the Project
Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting free access to electronic works by
freely sharing Project Gutenberg-tm works in compliance with the terms of
this agreement for keeping the Project Gutenberg-tm name associated with
the work.  You can easily comply with the terms of this agreement by
keeping this work in the same format with its attached full Project
Gutenberg-tm License when you share it without charge with others.

1.D.  The copyright laws of the place where you are located also govern
what you can do with this work.  Copyright laws in most countries are in
a constant state of change.  If you are outside the United States, check
the laws of your country in addition to the terms of this agreement
before downloading, copying, displaying, performing, distributing or
creating derivative works based on this work or any other Project
Gutenberg-tm work.  The Foundation makes no representations concerning
the copyright status of any work in any country outside the United
States.

1.E.  Unless you have removed all references to Project Gutenberg:

1.E.1.  The following sentence, with active links to, or other immediate
access to, the full Project Gutenberg-tm License must appear prominently
whenever any copy of a Project Gutenberg-tm work (any work on which the
phrase "Project Gutenberg" appears, or with which the phrase "Project
Gutenberg" is associated) is accessed, displayed, performed, viewed,
copied or distributed:

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.net

1.E.2.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is derived
from the public domain (does not contain a notice indicating that it is
posted with permission of the copyright holder), the work can be copied
and distributed to anyone in the United States without paying any fees
or charges.  If you are redistributing or providing access to a work
with the phrase "Project Gutenberg" associated with or appearing on the
work, you must comply either with the requirements of paragraphs 1.E.1
through 1.E.7 or obtain permission for the use of the work and the
Project Gutenberg-tm trademark as set forth in paragraphs 1.E.8 or
1.E.9.

1.E.3.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is posted
with the permission of the copyright holder, your use and distribution
must comply with both paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 and any additional
terms imposed by the copyright holder.  Additional terms will be linked
to the Project Gutenberg-tm License for all works posted with the
permission of the copyright holder found at the beginning of this work.

1.E.4.  Do not unlink or detach or remove the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License terms from this work, or any files containing a part of this
work or any other work associated with Project Gutenberg-tm.

1.E.5.  Do not copy, display, perform, distribute or redistribute this
electronic work, or any part of this electronic work, without
prominently displaying the sentence set forth in paragraph 1.E.1 with
active links or immediate access to the full terms of the Project
Gutenberg-tm License.

1.E.6.  You may convert to and distribute this work in any binary,
compressed, marked up, nonproprietary or proprietary form, including any
word processing or hypertext form.  However, if you provide access to or
distribute copies of a Project Gutenberg-tm work in a format other than
"Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other format used in the official version
posted on the official Project Gutenberg-tm web site (www.gutenberg.net),
you must, at no additional cost, fee or expense to the user, provide a
copy, a means of exporting a copy, or a means of obtaining a copy upon
request, of the work in its original "Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other
form.  Any alternate format must include the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License as specified in paragraph 1.E.1.

1.E.7.  Do not charge a fee for access to, viewing, displaying,
performing, copying or distributing any Project Gutenberg-tm works
unless you comply with paragraph 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

1.E.8.  You may charge a reasonable fee for copies of or providing
access to or distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works provided
that

- You pay a royalty fee of 20% of the gross profits you derive from
     the use of Project Gutenberg-tm works calculated using the method
     you already use to calculate your applicable taxes.  The fee is
     owed to the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark, but he
     has agreed to donate royalties under this paragraph to the
     Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation.  Royalty payments
     must be paid within 60 days following each date on which you
     prepare (or are legally required to prepare) your periodic tax
     returns.  Royalty payments should be clearly marked as such and
     sent to the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation at the
     address specified in Section 4, "Information about donations to
     the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation."

- You provide a full refund of any money paid by a user who notifies
     you in writing (or by e-mail) within 30 days of receipt that s/he
     does not agree to the terms of the full Project Gutenberg-tm
     License.  You must require such a user to return or
     destroy all copies of the works possessed in a physical medium
     and discontinue all use of and all access to other copies of
     Project Gutenberg-tm works.

- You provide, in accordance with paragraph 1.F.3, a full refund of any
     money paid for a work or a replacement copy, if a defect in the
     electronic work is discovered and reported to you within 90 days
     of receipt of the work.

- You comply with all other terms of this agreement for free
     distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm works.

1.E.9.  If you wish to charge a fee or distribute a Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work or group of works on different terms than are set
forth in this agreement, you must obtain permission in writing from
both the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation and Michael
Hart, the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark.  Contact the
Foundation as set forth in Section 3 below.

1.F.

1.F.1.  Project Gutenberg volunteers and employees expend considerable
effort to identify, do copyright research on, transcribe and proofread
public domain works in creating the Project Gutenberg-tm
collection.  Despite these efforts, Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works, and the medium on which they may be stored, may contain
"Defects," such as, but not limited to, incomplete, inaccurate or
corrupt data, transcription errors, a copyright or other intellectual
property infringement, a defective or damaged disk or other medium, a
computer virus, or computer codes that damage or cannot be read by
your equipment.

1.F.2.  LIMITED WARRANTY, DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES - Except for the "Right
of Replacement or Refund" described in paragraph 1.F.3, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the owner of the Project
Gutenberg-tm trademark, and any other party distributing a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work under this agreement, disclaim all
liability to you for damages, costs and expenses, including legal
fees.  YOU AGREE THAT YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE, STRICT
LIABILITY, BREACH OF WARRANTY OR BREACH OF CONTRACT EXCEPT THOSE
PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH F3.  YOU AGREE THAT THE FOUNDATION, THE
TRADEMARK OWNER, AND ANY DISTRIBUTOR UNDER THIS AGREEMENT WILL NOT BE
LIABLE TO YOU FOR ACTUAL, DIRECT, INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE OR
INCIDENTAL DAMAGES EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH
DAMAGE.

1.F.3.  LIMITED RIGHT OF REPLACEMENT OR REFUND - If you discover a
defect in this electronic work within 90 days of receiving it, you can
receive a refund of the money (if any) you paid for it by sending a
written explanation to the person you received the work from.  If you
received the work on a physical medium, you must return the medium with
your written explanation.  The person or entity that provided you with
the defective work may elect to provide a replacement copy in lieu of a
refund.  If you received the work electronically, the person or entity
providing it to you may choose to give you a second opportunity to
receive the work electronically in lieu of a refund.  If the second copy
is also defective, you may demand a refund in writing without further
opportunities to fix the problem.

1.F.4.  Except for the limited right of replacement or refund set forth
in paragraph 1.F.3, this work is provided to you 'AS-IS', WITH NO OTHER
WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO
WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTIBILITY OR FITNESS FOR ANY PURPOSE.

1.F.5.  Some states do not allow disclaimers of certain implied
warranties or the exclusion or limitation of certain types of damages.
If any disclaimer or limitation set forth in this agreement violates the
law of the state applicable to this agreement, the agreement shall be
interpreted to make the maximum disclaimer or limitation permitted by
the applicable state law.  The invalidity or unenforceability of any
provision of this agreement shall not void the remaining provisions.

1.F.6.  INDEMNITY - You agree to indemnify and hold the Foundation, the
trademark owner, any agent or employee of the Foundation, anyone
providing copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in accordance
with this agreement, and any volunteers associated with the production,
promotion and distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works,
harmless from all liability, costs and expenses, including legal fees,
that arise directly or indirectly from any of the following which you do
or cause to occur: (a) distribution of this or any Project Gutenberg-tm
work, (b) alteration, modification, or additions or deletions to any
Project Gutenberg-tm work, and (c) any Defect you cause.


Section  2.  Information about the Mission of Project Gutenberg-tm

Project Gutenberg-tm is synonymous with the free distribution of
electronic works in formats readable by the widest variety of computers
including obsolete, old, middle-aged and new computers.  It exists
because of the efforts of hundreds of volunteers and donations from
people in all walks of life.

Volunteers and financial support to provide volunteers with the
assistance they need, is critical to reaching Project Gutenberg-tm's
goals and ensuring that the Project Gutenberg-tm collection will
remain freely available for generations to come.  In 2001, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation was created to provide a secure
and permanent future for Project Gutenberg-tm and future generations.
To learn more about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation
and how your efforts and donations can help, see Sections 3 and 4
and the Foundation web page at http://www.pglaf.org.


Section 3.  Information about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive
Foundation

The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation is a non profit
501(c)(3) educational corporation organized under the laws of the
state of Mississippi and granted tax exempt status by the Internal
Revenue Service.  The Foundation's EIN or federal tax identification
number is 64-6221541.  Its 501(c)(3) letter is posted at
http://pglaf.org/fundraising.  Contributions to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation are tax deductible to the full extent
permitted by U.S. federal laws and your state's laws.

The Foundation's principal office is located at 4557 Melan Dr. S.
Fairbanks, AK, 99712., but its volunteers and employees are scattered
throughout numerous locations.  Its business office is located at
809 North 1500 West, Salt Lake City, UT 84116, (801) 596-1887, email
business@pglaf.org.  Email contact links and up to date contact
information can be found at the Foundation's web site and official
page at http://pglaf.org

For additional contact information:
     Dr. Gregory B. Newby
     Chief Executive and Director
     gbnewby@pglaf.org

Section 4.  Information about Donations to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation

Project Gutenberg-tm depends upon and cannot survive without wide
spread public support and donations to carry out its mission of
increasing the number of public domain and licensed works that can be
freely distributed in machine readable form accessible by the widest
array of equipment including outdated equipment.  Many small donations
($1 to $5,000) are particularly important to maintaining tax exempt
status with the IRS.

The Foundation is committed to complying with the laws regulating
charities and charitable donations in all 50 states of the United
States.  Compliance requirements are not uniform and it takes a
considerable effort, much paperwork and many fees to meet and keep up
with these requirements.  We do not solicit donations in locations
where we have not received written confirmation of compliance.  To
SEND DONATIONS or determine the status of compliance for any
particular state visit http://pglaf.org

While we cannot and do not solicit contributions from states where we
have not met the solicitation requirements, we know of no prohibition
against accepting unsolicited donations from donors in such states who
approach us with offers to donate.

International donations are gratefully accepted, but we cannot make
any statements concerning tax treatment of donations received from
outside the United States.  U.S. laws alone swamp our small staff.

Please check the Project Gutenberg Web pages for current donation
methods and addresses.  Donations are accepted in a number of other
ways including including checks, online payments and credit card
donations.  To donate, please visit: http://pglaf.org/donate


Section 5.  General Information About Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.

Professor Michael S. Hart is the originator of the Project Gutenberg-tm
concept of a library of electronic works that could be freely shared
with anyone.  For thirty years, he produced and distributed Project
Gutenberg-tm eBooks with only a loose network of volunteer support.

Project Gutenberg-tm eBooks are often created from several printed
editions, all of which are confirmed as Public Domain in the U.S.
unless a copyright notice is included.  Thus, we do not necessarily
keep eBooks in compliance with any particular paper edition.

Most people start at our Web site which has the main PG search facility:

     http://www.gutenberg.net

This Web site includes information about Project Gutenberg-tm,
including how to make donations to the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation, how to help produce our new eBooks, and how to
subscribe to our email newsletter to hear about new eBooks.
